Great concept but! Very cool, both in concept and function. Makes remembering fun and easy.please support older IOS I have a factory refurbished older iPad and it cannot run IOS 7.  Can't you make a "legacy" Dropbox app available for those of us that don't have brand new equipment?iPhone 5s :-( Really? )-: Did not work on my new iPhone 5s. Only showed sliding logo'sNo Longer Print Spreadsheets I went in to print out my schedule request form, so I clicked the "print" icon but it crashed on every attempt.  When I went in to print a word document it worked just fine.  Otherwise I love the app, and it's very handy for college students, such as myself.  I can log in at the library on campus and continue working on the documents I started at home.iOS 7 Love the iOS 7 design. Their website looks amazing now too. No more cartoon style.Amazing To Do App Please keep updating/evolving the app!Simple, in a good way So simple and beautifully designed. I also love how it's synced to my desktop app.Works great! People need to stop complaining about their iPad 1, who even owns one of those? You'll get better resolution from a potato. Glad that Dropbox is building their product for the future and not becoming crippled by legacy products.The best to do app Great app, really handy.Great app I love having all my photos backed up automatically and not having to keep them on my phone.Annoyed Randomly erased 500 pictures that I don't even have saved anywhere else. WTHA BIG Step Backward You know what I liked most about the old version? That the last file I had open STAYED OPEN when I tabbed out of the app and came back. I use Dropbox to save paper on things i reference frequently. This update always starts the app at the root folder and I have to click back through to get the same file open. Favorited/starred and it still takes 5 seconds or so to open a PDF. I miss when I could just leave the file open. At this rate, I might as well screenshot the file and uninstall. 

Also hate the tap to hide and show the file drawer. To easy to hit and it zooms out my file to an unreadable scale. 

No thanks.Buggy and Limited The following issues are: 
Stability  
Notification bug
Slow!!!!
Menu disappears
Can't rename files
Moving files sometime fails and without a cited reason. 
Memory Hog!

FYI: previous versions of Dropbox work for older iPads. iTunes will prompt you to download the last compatible version of Dropbox.I don't want background uploads The app works fine for me. But every time I upload photos it asks me if I want background uploading. Why keep on asking when I already said no? Second, why not use background update feature of ios7 to do it, rather than the awkward location based method?Crashes at start up *fixed* ?? App opens and then shows the loading sign, it has had 14 pending files for days!! It wont even let me change tabs, then crashes. All this since last update last week.
***deleted app and reinstalled and now works fine. So glad!!! ??????I can't log in since updating After updating, it logged me out and every time I try to log in, it crashes immediately.Unresponsive Use Google Drive or Skydrive instead. The dropbox app is a joke.Can't get through a day without it. I don't even know how I lived life without this app.Reliable. Period Have been using Google Drive for a few months, paid account - the desktop app was totally unreliable and failed to sync just too often. So came back to Dropbox, always syncing smartly and reliably.

A bit pricey though - almost twice as expensive as competitions if you want the extra space.Not a fan ..in fact drop box perpetuates habits that annoy me. Drop box as a service is rather annoying as it seems to be made for old people who haven't made the jump to collaborating in real time in the cloud.Looks like crap!! What is wrong with you people?? Why are you following Apple's lead with the crappy, dull, uninspired look? Everything is washed out and looks like crap. WTH??Broken Doesn't open since updateKicked to the curb I have been an avid Dropbox user and supporter for a few years now. But with this new upgrade requiring iOS 7 (which I don't have), and many apps supporting other cloud storage providers, I find I may have to switch to Box, SugarSync, Mega, Mozy, or any of the other cloud storage sites who aren't forcing me to upgrade to iOS 7.Horrible update Ever since iOS 7 update, Dropbox has not worked; constantly crashes, when it does run it is EXTREMELY slow, and there are problems with camera uploading. PLEASE FIX ASAP.Needs work Movies should be separated out from videos, just like in the Photos app. I?d also like to be able to turn off movie uploading. I never want movies on Dropbox unless I manually upload them. I do put movies on Dropbox sometimes, but I never want them auto-uploaded.Superb AND Simple At long last this app feels complete!Needs improvement Why I can't I upload photos from my camera roll one at a time instead of the entire camera roll?  Please change this.  Thanks.Not good Doesn't work all the time.APP DOESNT WORK!!!???? When I first heard I of this app I raved to everybody that it was awesome. Now with the updates it no longer works. When I go into the app it just says that it's loading but nothing ever comes up and the whole app freezes and shuts down. I have uninstalled many times but that hasn't fixed the problem. I even set up a different box to try and fix it thinking my original box was the problem. It's sad that it's garbage now.It's a pretty cool app It is just great, and name says it all "fantastical". Thinking about using this as default calendar.Won't open Seriously? I can't do anything. The app won't load. It just keeps foreclosing. What a shame.Will not load documents over cellular connection I can load documents on wifi but on cellular connection the documents don't load quickly. The mobile website works better then this app.Doesn't work Flat out will not open on a new iPad AirUseful program! Keep everything straight and in order. Get it done and cross it off. I'm a happy user of this app.poor Downloaded this app this morning &amp; it has completely locked up the screen for my ipad App Store. I cannot access anything else in the App Store. Very frustrating.Best App for storing everyone that is rating 1 star is using an old iOS version or they have an old device that can't keep up to date, this is my favorite app I use it for school I can open assignments in class with the app easily. hasn't let me down yet (:No longer works Since the last update the files no longer sync with  my iPad.  What happened?Shut up Stop asking me if I want to enable background uploads. I've said no about twenty times now, figure it out. I can turn it on by myself if I want to.Should be more space I would give 5 start if the space be improving, because 4 Gb is too small... Improve that please!!Almost perfect All these updates, and I still can't rename things? That's really important...Very white and poor video player Now to use the video player I have to go out of full screen. Rather annoyingMiss I absolutely love it. Works great on iPhone 5 . Of course it has to be on wifiBloated Storage Space After installing the app, it was taking 70 MB of space.  After using the app for a couple weeks it was taking 800 MB!  And I never added anything to my favorites. This was more space than everything I had on DropBox.  Deleted.Can't Use on old iPads Why did you drop support for earlier IOSs? Does Apple make you?Awesome app and suggestions I like it a lotNot working Won't downloadLeaving fans of Dropbox with iOS 6 behind Why no backward compatibility to iOS 6? I think it is a huge mistake to do so. Many of us either can't or do not want to upgrade to iOS 7. I have been a Dropbox user for years and, unfortunately, must look for another solution unless an iOS 6 version is made available again.Needs legacy support I've got an older iPhone that still works great, but I cannot install iOS7 on it. This app needs to support older OS versions!5 Stars All the Way! Love it !!Ios 7 look is ugly, no ios 6 support, no use for me to update. I will not be updating Dropbox on my other devices because I refuse to update to the hideous ios7 or ios7 "look and feel" apps. Did Johny Ive really think that replacing all of the grays and blacks in an OS he thought was too dark wouldn't go too far in the other direction? Similarly every single app that gets updated to a "beautiful" ios7 look is one I will not update. The only exception to this is Steam which looks great still.

So, the version I use gets 4 stars with only minor hiccups. The new version looks awful and only runs on an awful looking OS. I'll pass, thanks.Music Upload &amp; Share I would really love to be able to upload music from my Apple devices not just my photos! 

Also, it would be nice for those who upload music to be able to listen to an entire album(Folder) without having to switch back and forth between tracks. ??Works fine I have no clue why there are so many haters, this is a really good app.Camera Upload Overall Dropbox Is Great, But the camera upload is SOO SLOWW! This should Really be fixed! And you still can't upload videos!!Version better Preferred the older version, still crashes.After uploading... Dropbox just freezes when I close and open it and there's a "1" on the app and it won't go away or unfreeze. What's up with that?Fix! Is it just me, or is anyone else having the problem where the app won't even open at all? Fix please! It's very annoying.. I need to save my photos.Favorite List App ...one word: wow! Works perfectly, I am amazed!!New design is aweful I liked the old color scheme. The new, all white hurts my eyes. Please revert back to original.Freezing The app continues to freeze at 32 pictures. I have deleted and reinstalled it, and it still continues to do the same. When I close the app and reopen it, it freezes completely and will not let me access anything. I have not reached my maximum storage either.Many problems This version gets stuck, won't open files, etc.iOS 7 fail Does not work with iOS 7. 0.4. Nothing uploads. Often the app just exits with no notice. Useless now. Used to be amazingly good.Dropbox stinks Does not work on ios 7. Will not sync. Useless!Cannot open my documents I save important documents on my Dropbox and after these last two updates I can't access them. I'm really disappointed with the IOS 7 version of this appCool app I like your app but the other people are rude but the only thing I want to do is to upload stuff I'm saying it in A good way not In a bad way:)Dropbox is Awesome I love Dropbox and this app is pretty great.Issue with Updated Pages Documents Dropbox does not open updated Pages documents on my iPhone 5 with iOS 7. Previous to the Pages update, all of this worked swimminglySuper Useful I had too much videos and pictures and this solved my problemNo longer supports iOS 6  =( No longer supports iOS 6  =(Doesn’t process after downloading I don?t hate it. I can?t complete the download. I?ve tried several times on my iMac running Mavericks. I hope an update will solve the problem because Dropbox is great.Dropbox not working Since the update, it won't backup to Dropbox.App won't open Downloaded app and it just doesn't open. Dropbox not all that great!iPad app I love Dropbox and use it constantly.Freakin' Awesome! This is a terrific ( and terrifically priced) app!!!quick and easy to use Extremely helpful and a lot of fun!Freezing The app keeps freezing up on the opening screen. It will not open &amp; it shuts itself downHighly recommend! Dropbox is extremely  useful. Easy to access on any device or on their website. I've never had any issues with it and have been a user for years.Ridiculous Can't upload any documents or notes? Seriously? Up your game guys.Super app! Just that one word, wow!!!!Great App?? I download all my PowerPoints for school onto this app. What a great app??????????????????????.-. The app doesn't work unless you have the iOS 7 update and not all devices have that update so they should really fix this.Finally, what I've been looking for Very useful, especially to balance schoolwork and remain on schedulerecent update I now see that you must have IO7 or better for the app.
I didn't wish to upgrade to IO7 on my ipad2 and can't on my orginal ipad.
I feel you guys tossed us out in the cold.Great easy app! It works great! I save files and pics on it. Where ever I am at I can retrieve them.So good A lot of useful things these days, but most important I can save all my pix here instead of on my phone. Wished I could edit at least my text documents within app instead of 3rd party, honestly wished I could at least do a word search within the text doc??!Rename files? Please, please give us the ability to rename files from this app. It's the only thing missing from a truly great app!Flexibility &amp;amp; Ease of Use An excellent App.Terrible I never know when it's gonna even work. I click on the icon, my enter password shows up and either it's stuck on that and I can't even enter a password, or I enter it and nothing happens. This was a great app. Now it stinks! Big time!Cannot download photos from DropBox Since I installed the new update, I can't seem to download photos from DropBox onto my iPad anymore. It looks like the option is gone or I'm missing something. Any insight into this?PDF Problem When searching within PDFs the keyboard will stay up and won't minimize. Fix pleaseNo .zip How can I view ".zip" files, I wanna put one on Minecraft Pe. I'll rate 5 once you can view ".zip" filesGood Great appTakes some time... ? = ? Genius. Love everything about it.

New to-do: Delete all other to-do apps.Great Use this app on all my apple products just love it !!!Another Update And STILL NO Cut Copy Paste and Rename Function! Thank God for Boxie!  I still cannot believe that the team at Dropbox STILL hasn?t found a way to allow us to Copy, Cut and Paste our files from one folder to another, let alone Rename a File while using their iOS App.  This is BEYOND RIDICULOUS  people!  So I have to use 2 different apps in order to accomplish ONE task, copy a file to another folder and rename it.

BEYOND RIDICULOUS!!Great app constant updates This app is getting better and better. To date there are camera uploads function which neatly saves all your photos taken and syncs them to Dropbox folder. I love the fact that its integrated so well with the latest iOS 6 as well. Great job! I like the new redesigniTouch incompatible Won't load...  Sez needs software update but Apple sez software is uptodate.OK I like using it to save files, but i wish i could update it -__-Editing files It would be a great update if you allowed the user to edit the name of their file. It would allow me to get work done on my phone and edit files on the go for projects.Love Dropbox Love Dropbox. Easy to use and convenient across my iPhone iPad and MacBook. Only thing is they need to offer better customized pricing for upgrade plans. 100 GB is nice but an average user may only need 25/50/60 etc. how about pricing that meets low level user needs not just 100gb or more.Worthless since iOS7 update Can't open files, files won't update.  They show they haven't been modified in months when I modified it five minutes ago and all my other devices and computers not on iOS7 show the update.  If these problems get fixed I'll change my rating until then it will remain a 1 star.Video upload STILL issue!! Please, please FIX this video upload issue. It stalls everything and every time!! Your recent update did NOT fix this. Even if the app is kept open, wi-fi connected, and iphone plugged into power, it still can't upload a video that is just over 1 minute long! ???
I LOVE every other aspect of Dropbox, it's just this video thingy that keeps you from 5 stars.
I would turn off automatic uploads, but i need my regular photos to upload. FIX FIX FIX please!! Or at the very least let us choose to SKIP upload or cancel upload of a video.Great game Just finished the demo and it was great, powerfulSimple and useful! Does exactly what it's supposed to do.Touch ID O app deveria ter a op??o de ser destravado atrav?s do Touch ID para os usu?rios do Iphone 5s.Keep page open? I use this app a lot for viewing things for study. I used to be able to open the app, go to the document I wanted, and then flip through other apps.  Then, when I would return to Dropbox, the document would remain open for viewing.  Since the new update, after a few minutes of the app not being in use, it goes back to the main menu instead of the document I was viewing.  It's so frustrating to have to keep going thru my folders to open up the document again! I hope this will change over the next update... Still hoping it will change.... Please!!!!!! Thank you.  Also it'd be good to see the time and iPad information at the top like you used to.  Now the document takes up the whole screen! Please please please these are easy changes...it used to be this way so make it go back!!!Fix syncing! Please fix the syncing issues with the iPad app. Currently have to re-login to get files to update. Allow users to force a sync! Trying to automate it would be good if it worked, but it doesn't.Worse than before. Why everything is so white? The pictures show a white background just like the iOS7 photo app. That is ridiculous, the contrast hurts my eyes I always have to tap it to make it black. The new icon now is white, so hideous had to hide it on a folder. Look so cool before that I had at my home screen...idiots..Edited photos not uploaded Dropbox is a great service. However, when I use the camera upload option in iOS 7, it only uploads the original photo and not the edited one. Otherwise, I'd rate dropbox as 5 stars.Clean &amp;amp; Easy to Use Great App. Need alerts and then 5 starsUpload videos has been fixed for me I didn't have to uninstall just shut down app and reload and connect to wifiSimple and Organized Needs a cloud sync feature. And subcategories.Files U Dropbox employers improved mostly everything, but in the app it should have the ability to rename files, whereas the web version can. ??Was great until latest update Now won't even open on iPhone 4Annoying prompts Ask me if I would like to use background uploading only once and remember my preference - don't pester me every time I open the app to turn that feature on.Love Dropbox, but still having trouble uploading videos I LOVE Dropbox. In fact, my iPad would be useless without it. I need THAT much space. My only issue is that it still is taking FOREVER to upload videos I recorded. Like over an hour. Once it even got 65% of the way there, but then 15 mins later, it said "couldn't connect to Dropbox." And all the time that it is uploading I have to keep tapping to keep my iPad awake (because there is no "Do Not Go To Sleep" setting for this app) AND you have to keep it in Dropbox because it cannot upload in the background. I do not blame Dropbox for this, because it easily uploads in the background on my Droid. I love this app, just wish it had a few more setting options or resolved the uploading video issue.Great app.!! Beautiful Interface.Realtor Great application !!!Bien bien Faltan los .gifBeautiful new design This looks amazing! Love the makeover.great!! great apps!! i use it every time i want to share file to all my friend!!Why not support previous IOS? I have an ipad 1st gen. which can not update anymore. I want to install dropbox on that device but dropbox can not be installed! I hate it. Why not support the previous IOS version? How can we use it?Cannot open PDF in Keynote Drop Box does not allow one to view a PDF on the App and then open in "Keynote for iPad". Not sure why it would not allow this function? If I can't use the documents in drop box on my iPad in a useful way then what's the point in being able to access them?I wish every app was like this A new, fun, and interactive approach to to-do lists.Favorite app on my iPhone Use it probably everydayBad user interface It was a five stars app until the developer turned themselves into Jony Ive's slaves. The user interface as well as the icons now look stupid. I wish I didn't update this excellent 5 stars app. Actualy most applications look stupid after iOS7.Annoying vertical scroll button Would accidentally trigger the vertical scroll button causing erroneous scrolling. Please fixLove it App works great! Awesome to be able to share any of my files instantly with a link.File sharing with ease That moment I figured out I could transfer photos from my iPhone to laptop faster via dropbox than plugging my phone into the USB port.Also saves storage OMG I LOVE IT I JUST GOT A NEW PHONE AND I WAS SAD CUZ ALL MY PICS WERE GONE BUT IT STILL HAD ALL MY PICS :) GREAT APP!Worst app on my iPad This keeps getting worse, worst app on my iPad, stop using Dropbox in 3,2,1...Why? Why did u take off the option when u listen to music and click out the app the music stays on. Now the music cuts off wow. Please fix or my feedback is staying at 1 star.Great!! Great!!dropbox for Ipad As of 12/12/13 I cannot upgrade filemaker files thru dropbox on my iPad. Dropbox needs to correct this issue immediately.background upload?? The app is stopped background uploading files and photos!!Dropbox App is ok for accessing files.  I really want to be able to edit documents and attach docs to emails like one can do on a computer.  Also, any chance that the ability to open and read .zip files could be added.So worth it. I realy like it. ThxCamera upload doesn't work properly Camera upload doesn't work for some of my videos even after an update which Dropbox claimed fixed the issue. It's been two week since I tried to upload this short video.... Still no fix!Still Can't Rename Files 12/13/13: Still a missing feature. 

Seriously, we still can't rename files. After all these updates we can't rename files from the iPhone and iPad. Please add this feature in the near future. Thanks.I love Dropbox - when I can access it. As if the last update, I can no longer enter a pass code for Dropbox. Oh, it still asks for the code I've set, but I can't type in the code. I have to uninstall and reinstall the app on my iPhone each time. It still works great on my iPad (unless it hasn't been updated). I use DB ALL the time but with sensitive info need the pass code issue fixed!Crash My iPad works fine when I open Dropbox... But every time I open it on my iPhone 4 is either crashes or it continuously pulls up a messiah making it hard to close. It needs to fixed... Fast. Even after the current update just a day ago it is still crashing on IPhone!! This needs to be fixed.Makes life easier and better Excellent app.  It does exactly what the developers say it does and could not be simpler to use.  It is stable, super fast, and a joy to use.  Infinitely better than sending attachments via email.  Love it.Can't &quot;Open in&quot; old iWork files I just finished the newest update and now I can't open my old iWork files. LAME!!! When I hit the "open in" button air drop pops up. Hmmm. Something is not working here.Big fan Love this app.Still won't upload videos or pictures in the background !! App will not upload videos in the background or photos ! This update fixed NOTHING ! I have a premium account plzz fix ! And yes I have my location services enable and App background refresh enabled. Plz fix Thanks ChrisLove it Works great, super reliable, it is the best cloud there is!Backup, Sync, Share! The new design fits in well with iOS7, but it would be better if there was an option to rename files and folders. It's also impossible to send files as email attachments instead of sharing their links through the default Mail app.Location services: end! Please stop asking for location services! I don't see why DB needs them and I won't budge! Otherwise I love Dropbox.Really just perfect Great app to remember everyday tasksWorks Great For Me Flawless operation - ZERO problems. Easy to use - almost effortless. New auto-upload of photos and videos is a great &amp; useful addition. Customer support is second to none (when I did have a question, support answered it before two hours had passed).No preview Older versions of this app used to allow me to preview word, excel and pdf documents. While the preview pane is still there the app just tells me the file name and size and does NOT display the content... Completely useless.Helps a lot This app has saved me a TON of money!! My friends share their textbooks every semester. Keep up the great work!!Work great! Works great, never crashes. Streamlined and very easy to use. Synchronized with your device easily and quickly.Great redesign Very pretty! :)A must have Forget all the others. DropBox is it!Dropbox doesn't work with iWork anymore It's really ridiculous that this dropbox iOS app isn't compatible with any of the new versions of iWork. They simply won't load on the app. When I contacted customer service they told me to downgrade to the old version of iWork...ok, great solution.Removed functionality Minus 2 stars for option in photos to upload removed. Bring it back please.Tooooooo many updates! Three prates in two weeks!   Get it right this time or you are history!  CONSTANT  updates are a major pain in the  ....!Fabulous tool Have DB for years keep up the improvements public folder great tool also.:)New version bad :( On the newest version I can find no way to see th entire file name. It shortens it with ... On the old version I could click the file and then minimize the left bar and see the file name, but on this version I don't see any way to do that. The point of this is files right? Seeing the full names of those files is sort of important.Still CAN'T UPLOAD VIDEOS!!! COME ON DROPBOX!!!! This is getting ridiculous! I've uninstalled and reinstalled and it's still stuck!
Your customer service said this update would fix it!Great app Great appstill issue with iWork My iPad air and iPhone 4 on iOS 7 still will not open any pages documents, all they show is the document name and sizeWould give this 5 stars but... What is the point of having the option of background upload... When it doesn't upload in the background? I would love for it to backup my photos and what not while I'm asleep and on wifi and charging... But instead I have to make sure the app is running...Excel Fails! The newest iOS and the newest Dropbox don't play we'll together. Excel files don't display. This should not happen! Please fix this!Can't open excel file Trying to open excel file is like playing a game of chance...you have to keep tapping until it works. Very frustrating if you have to view many filesjust a comment so I bought Dropbox to get more memory on my phone but it takes up as much GB as my actual pictures did! it takes up two GBs with 700+ pictures. is there any way it won't take up as much space? but overall, a great app (:Hi I love the idea of Dropbox but my cloud does the same thing... My videos take a really long time to upload I think it froze :( If the app didn't take up space on my iPad then I would be impressed ;)Please patch for future updates In a previous version, if the user was looking at pictures and suspended the app it would leave it right where they were upon restarting the app. Now the app completely refreshes at start up, which gets annoying sometimes. Also its more cumbersome to swipe through images since it's only responsive on the top half of the screen instead of the whole screen.-.- Never opensWon't event show!! This app angers me. I've tried downloading it five times on my iPad mini. First two it didn't even work, the rest, it never shows up!! You people need to fix this!!!Office documents Use to be good until I cannot open any office documents.Dropbox This is crashing every time I attempt to open something saved.  Please help!Good, but still needs some extra options. It's very convenient to use, however not being able to switch between accounts without un-linking the phone would be great. Also an improvement in the media player would also help.Buggy I recently updated my Dropbox app for my iPad with retina display.  Something weird is going on. I upload a file.  I see it on my computer.  It uploads fine, but then the app on my iPad keeps re uploading the same file, repeatedly.  Kinda buggy. Please fix, or help.  Only way to stop the constant downloads is to delete and reinstall the app.needs iPhone 5s support hello I've Ben using this app for a while now and I got the iPhone 5s and it keeps on crashing on me and having trouble? please help meLatest update Best update in a long time. Thank youDifficult uploading This app is useful in theory but it's actually a huge pain to use because of the fact that camera uploads don't seem to work if the phone screen is locked, which is most of the time. I shouldn't have to change my phone settings so that the screen doesn't automatically lock just to upload pictures, plus it would murder battery life to have the phone unlocked all the time. There's got to be a better way.Wonderful - when it works Love it, love the Camera Upload feature and got used to it, only to have the app start consistently crashing on launch for the last month or so.  App has been updated several times and once or twice that got it working again, but then it goes back to crashing after launch.  Rebooted phone, logged out and in of app, reinstalled app - nothing seems to fix it.  Hoping for a more reliable update soon - I miss it!Best of its kind., but need IPad version I love it...keeps me organize. Thanks guys ?Current app is nonfunctional Since the update I am unable to use anything in Dropbox because it is constantly crashing.Almost rename files ?EASY!! HendbNeed Spam Feature Love this app.

Can you please integrate a spam filter feature so I can select and identify senders from which I no longer wish to receive emails.Bad app Charges made without any request and no approvalIt is gooooddddd This is going to save me so much time!Incredible Amazingly useful &amp; innovative, has streamlined my college experience as well as saved my phone &amp; computer much memory! Thank you Dropbox!!nice nice and easy to use. 

only problem i found is gifs works but does not animate when view it. so not sure if it really working or not.Videos loading My videos aren't loading into my Dropbox. Once the load all the way up, and should go in and move on to the the next instead it jus starts over. Can you please help? Otherwise it's great. Thanks for fixing the uploading vids bak into phone problem.Upgrade The latest upgrade is causing my spreadsheets to freeze and not open properly.  I can open them in numbers from dropbox, but they will not open in Dropbox at all.  Just some of them. But it is random and not the same ones all the time.Simple, intuitive, Fun. Great gadgetWhy is it taking so long? Fix the video uploading! I set one up last night and it hasn't progressed at all! Why did you break what was already working?!!? FIX IT!!!!!!!!!Great Great design and all-around service. I've been using Dropbox for years for school work and it's saved me plenty of times when I forgot to pick up my papers from my printer. 

I really wish you could improve the music player though. I was running out of space on my iPad so I had to delete all my music. I was hoping to use Dropbox or an app that plays music off of Dropbox but none of those work. The music player right now isn't best. It doesn't have loop, loop one, shuffle, etc. It also takes a lot of time to load each song before they actually play. If you do consider improving the player, also think about how some people organize their music in a folder called Music and sub folders by artists and albums. Perhaps make an option to only play certain folders and/or play all sub folders.Great app but one problem with the new update Great app I love the new design but with the new update when you try to share a link to a specific file that has a space in the file name I have to manually replace the spaces with %20 so it will hyperlink correctly. This used to not be a problem. Please fix this ??. Other than that one problem this is a great app also I like the fact that if you download a picture from the app onto the iPhone it doesn't auto upload the picture so you have 2 copies of the same photo in the auto upload folder. Thank you for that fix. Keep up the great work.??No rename! A multi-million dollars company so useless, don't know how to create rename file or folder feature in this app.

Close up and go home!!!Nice update I like the iOS 7 style but the camera upload won't upload some of the longer videos anymore (=Useless Can't upload anything but photos. No memos. No text.Perfect app! I have not had any problem with this app since I found out about it. I can view all my books on its PDF reader, I can see the rest of my files anywhere I go with the favorite(or offline mode) so I don't have to keep downloading them. It really comes on handy, really recommend if you are a student!Works Great Dropbox is an awesome service, and having it my iPhone is icing on the cake. The app works just as described, and I've never noticed any bugs in any of the releases. They release feature updates sometimes, too.

Recommended! ?

I love that I can play a video, exit the app, and still continue to play the audio from that video!Sidebar issue Sidebar no longer minimizes when you open a document. Nothing in help to explain this change. Please fix ASAP!On the fence Still on the fence about this app.

Plus: handy for keeping databases available while shopping.

Minus: definitely has syncing problems.Had to delete it The app takes up 900mb of space.

I deleted the app and downloaded it again but within 1min it is taking to 900mb again.  There is no way it downloaded and cached that much again.  Obviously a bug with the app.Not the best No replay button,
And whenever I try to go to the beginning of a song it does not start from the beginning but 10 seconds in. Needs more work, until then this will be sitting on my extras folder.Video uploading too long The video I'm trying to upload is taking very longWorks great Use it every day.Camera Upload Camera upload should auto rotate photos e.g. iPhoto and Win Photo Gallery.Best tracking app I have so far It's amazing what great design can do to make annoying and boring things (scheduling) better. Really well done.Problems since update Was a great app.  However since the last update I can no longer open my Excel files and 25% of the time I can't open my Word files.  So now it's a waste of an app until fixed.  Please do so quickly.  When it worked it was awesome.Love the app hate the white screen! I really love this app. The recent upgrade with all the searing white screen backgrounds has made it less than perfect for me. Please bring back the darker background or give us the option to change it. Thanks!Awesome app! Does everything you would hope it would do well. 

I wish I could email documents from Dropbox as attachments not as links.Simple and clear $W@GSimple, quick and easy to use... This app is really neat. visually pleasing. and the new task by voice on this thing is really work. most of the times. good job!!Glitch? Looks nice, but for some reason I can't open some files in Pages and Numbers. The "Open In" option is available in some iWorks documents, but not all. There doesn't seem to be any consistency about which files can be opened.Indispensable It's amazing.Boo.  I need the IOS 6 version Can't install on IOS 6 devices.Fantastic app I use this app frequently and have it downloaded on my tablet, phone and PC. Works flawless each time. Drop and go!Pretty swag app It works!finally Love its flat design! Works great as usual.Dood OkWhat's up with Excel? This used to be my favorite app, but now that I can no longer open Excel files it's useless to me..xls file issue I used to be able to view .xls files on my iPad AND iPhone.  I can still view them on my iPhone but they no longer open on the iPad. 

Sometimes the files will open for a few seconds and then a gray screen comes up. Most of the time I just get the gray screen.  The gray screen has the file name, "Office Open XML Spreadsheet"' and the file size.

My spreadsheets are simple (no macros) and small in size.  I've tried creating new spreadsheets and have the same issue.  Web research shows others have same issue but no fixes have worked for me. 

I'm on the latest IOS 7.0.4 and the most recent version of Dropbox 3.0.1.

Chat with Apple Support says it is a DropBox issue.Great app One of the best apps I have ever used. I have Dropbox installed on my laptop, iPad, and cell phone and Dropbox makes file sharing so much easier. It is easy to use, simple, and efficient. 
One thing I would like to suggest is adding the function that allows exporting multiple photos at once in portable devices such as cellphone for iPad. Other than that, it's perfect.Awesome The new update makes the app wonderfully easy to use. The design is exactly how an iOS7 app should be and there are no crashes.Eehh The idea is wonderful and very helpful. But still a few bugs. I can never get anything to upload on my iPad. Please fix soon.:( One feature they should add is being able to import multiple photos to camera roll, then it be better.Simplicity is king The easiest to use of all the other apps I've tried.Number on App icon I love the app. No issues but it just bothers me to see the number of photos that need to uploaded stuck on the icon. I turned the auto upload off but the number is still there on the home screen. Can you please take that feature off when the upload is turned off. ThanksYay! Yet another app that can double as a flashlight!Can be improved I love Dropbox and this app don't get me wrong but I have one thing in particular that will help make this app much more easier and nicer to use. For those who have a lot of photos (let's say *cough: 8,000). Have it so instead of uploading all photos, have it so you can choose which ones to upload as a option in settings. If you do so I'll give the app the 5 stars it deserves :)Wish it would upload in background My favorite old feature was uploading a bunch of photos and videos from the day overnight or while using another app. That feature is gone now, I don't know if an update thing or new iOS thing. It's very inconvenient to constantly have to make sure the app stays open to upload.Talk Extremely useful app!!Good simple app Does what it claims &amp;amp; does it well. Really appreciate the UI.Cool! Awsome but cant do the powerpoint stuff i want to, not the apps fault thoughWhy doesn't sidebar disappear anymore? The left hand menu/sidebar no longer minimizes so that you can expand the view of the document you are viewing - please fix!!!!NEED UPDATE ASAP Since the update my pictures don't upload in the background I have to go into the app an leave the app open for my pictures to upload!!!!Cool HLove it Never had a problem with App. It's great and easy to use.Please fix ASAP Dropbox went from the best app to the worst. With the iWorks update I can no longer open my iWorks docs, rendering Dropbox totally useless. Please restore the functionality we count on. Then I cave give you the 5 star rating you deserve.Access 24/7 Convenient! No more lugging the laptop or losing a thumb drive. My files are accessible anytime, anyone, from any of my devices or another's. With three full time students in the house the affordable upgrade holds docs, data, music and more! Lots of room available. More convenient and more affordable than an external drive.EXTRACT I love it but I mainly want to extract my files and I don't know how if u can PLZ tell if not PLZ update for extract! ^_^Beat Cloud Just an awesome app! With 58Gb thanks to my college :)Perhaps the best app I ever &quot;bought&quot; The app is great quick responses and the setup is overall great.
Completly personizeable i love it!

&amp;lt;[^.^]&amp;gt;Very useful and intuitive Nice appNeeds improvements The instrument bars won't go away while viewing the text documents. Files still don't load on the phone automatically after my putting them into a Dropbox folder on my computer.Awesome I really love this app!!!New adobe? Dropbox the new adobe? Like a new update every week. Not a bad thing though, rather have an update than something 2 years old and buggy.Inability to read long filenames The app would be great with two "features".  One the ability to read long filenames.  The app truncated all my files so I can't tell which is which in our companies file naming procedures.  Really is a complete PITA.  Next there needs to be a clear cache option.  I download a 700 mb file and open it in a app I really don't need to have it in two places on my iPad.  Add these missing features for more stars.Good This app is great but the only thing I don't like is that that it freezes a lot and doesn't load all of my picturesNice!! Great update!!! Wow you guys really made this app so much better!!! Thanks!!!!    Loads so much faster nowYay! This app cures lupus!Starts up much faster!! I have an iPhone 4S and on the previous version took 4-5 seconds to start up but now it's around 1-2 seconds! Also the features (like sliding right on a item to pull up the sharing menu, delete, etc) are awesome!! Very powerful app and I absolutely love it.I usually never use to-do apps... I use this many times a day and think it is wonderful. However, please create a format for the iPad.Still the best App works great!!!Just a thought... How bout you awesome developers make it so we can listen to our music in Dropbox like an actual media player. Mainly just the loop shuffle repeat functions. Would be so awesome ^_^Like it but... I am a big fan of DropBox in general but the recent upgrade for the iPad version cannot view excel files... which is an obvious and very basic problem to miss.  My other complaint is that you can no longer adjust the size of a photo when uploading.  As the camera resolution increases, so does the need for more storage since DropBox only allows photos to be uploaded in their original, full size.Great app I like the appDesign I really love how Dropbox update design.Great App Never crashed, works as expected.So amazing This this is so easy to use and you can do anything it is so coolNew Design Did I spill whiteout on my screen?New update The new update released last week is terrible. I can not open many of my files on my Ipad. I have to open the files in other programs. Drop Box needs to fix this issue.Can't get dropbox to work on my new IPhone 5S. When dropbox comes up, I see the welcome, learn about dropbox and sign in icons.  I am blind and use voiceover.  Nothing happens! I don't know who to contact about this.  Dropbox works great on my 2 IPods.

Thanks

JimLags Playing the videos loads really slow &amp; exporting videos is slow also! It needs to be faster .iPad BEST IPHONE APP EVER MADE.Decent. Useful with files.Super disgusting Disgusting appearance but usefulTwo issues &quot;no renaming?&quot; Have two issues, first there is no way that I've seen to rename items/folders?  Item two is the auto image upload in the background hasn't worked right since iOS 7 release. In order for the images and videos to sync I have to open the app for it to notice and additions. What happened? This was working wonderfully!?

Please fix the bug that won't allow me to play video's!!!ok is ok, but not enough space as I would like, I would like to see a pro DROPBOX app with 20 GB of space for a fix cheap price, I think is a better idea.Crashes constantly After the update I can't even launch the app. Sticks on loading for a few seconds then crashes.SOME FILES NOT WORKING I can't view .PNGs without putting them in my favorites. Fix this!!!Worthless for all but the most basic of tasks Title says it all.Crash. Every time I try to open it, it crashes. Y u do this to me.Compatibly issue with iWork - Numbers There isn't an option to open a numbers file in Numbers. PDFs seem to have the option to open  in a lot of different programs but there isn't that option with .numbers files. I worked around it by using iCloud but that doesn't keep my files as organized. Hope to see it fixed soon. Other than that works great.Only works on ios7 It now only works on iOS 7, so it doesn?t work on my iPod Touch anymore.  Stupid, stupid, stupid.Disappointment I really love Dropbox and the iOS 7 look but I can't get rid of the 1,765 notifications on the icon, it's obnoxious. I like the app but I can't stand that it won't let me get rid of the notifications in the camera roll tab..Storage Great option for storage!Location requests... So I really love this app. I always have. I just wish that it wouldn't ask me to allow it to use my location every time I open the app. I don't want it to use location, so why must it be so insistent? This is something new in this update, which is strange to me. I feel like updates shouldn't make the app LESS user friendly.Super awesome Really nice program i like itA few things Some things I'd really like to see are the albums I created on Dropbox.com. I have recently decided to move my pics to DropBox and would like to have them available at all times on my phone, in my albums.

Also, an ability to highlight/edit PDF's would be rad.Not very useful Can't even upload/transfer a file from PagesFreaking love this app By far the best storage app ever. I love it. I never have to be concerned about losing my data but especially my photos.iOS 7 What's with all the white? This isn't the settings app, give it a little life!I waz a fan !!! It keeps shutting down where I can't do ANYTHING!! I hav a lot of photos I needta b able ta look at &amp; hav access 2 them!! FIX IT, jus Fix it. If I can't get 2 my pics then wat good is this app? U hav been fixing other things why not this?Danger! Photo saving is very tedious I'm a huge fan of dropbox, and the app WAS good, but I just updated, and though I can download a single image at a time, I can't select a bunch and save them all. This is the only way I was able to edit photos my wife takes on her phone. There needs to be a bulk download option,Holding off on update Too many negative reviews. Will wait.Get this! Great app for college!!!
Really organized and well developed!!!Awesome! Love it:) This is goodPerfect for Design files I use Dropbox for images of my working PSD and AI files. I can view them on the go and get critiques from colleagues. Love this App.Edits It would add great value to have an edit section including crop, rotate, etc.  also and upload to Facebook would be as equally wonderful for the one place stop to go to.Stop the documents from reloading Really annoying when you are reviewing a document and you change orientation and the document reloads and takes you back to the beginning every time. Also does it if you leave the app to do something and then go back to the document. A user friendly app would hold the place of whatever you are reviewing. It gets old, real fast, scrolling through a 50+ page document, multiple times.Crashes non large PDFs Crashes consistently when opening large (&gt;60MB) PDFs.Crashing You can't even open the app it just closes as soon as you try to open itGood then bad It was an awesome app and then it crashes EVERY thine I launch the app. Open crash open crash open crash. Fix please!Excel Spreadsheets Won't Open None of my Excel spreadsheets will now open. Please fix.Love the old UI but &quot;iOS 7&quot; UI is UGLY! Stop being "trendy", geez! There's no color in the new UI. It feels stale and indifferent. I love version 2.3.2 and am avoiding updating until it's not searing white.Dropbox upload bug When uploading files from another app in to the Dropbox app to upload, the files are not deleted from the device after the upload is complete, resulting in the Dropbox app using a lot of memory space. I have to delete the app often and redownload it to get my memory back.Can't view Word or Excel Files Previous to this update I was able to view just about all files,....now for some reason I can no longer read/view .xls, .xlsx, .doc, or .docx files. So for me the app is virtually useless now.Crashing It crashes every time I try to open the appDownloaded app doesn't even show up... Just downloaded the app in my iPhone. Shows as downloaded. I hit open nothing opens. Get out of App Store and the downloaded app is nowhere to be found on my phone. How am I supposed to be able to redownload or do anything while I am unable to even try downloading again or see it on my phone...Photos won't load! None of my photos will load even tho they have been uploaded to Dropbox for months. Ever since the update none of my photos show up in Dropbox. It's just white boxes. App is no use for me if it won't load my photos.I like dropbox, but.... .... But lately the app doesn't let me open pdf files. I hope that gets fixed soon.Great new design but needs a little help Freezing when I edit a lot of photos, uploading edits, etc.LOVE, LOVE, LOVE! I can't imagine college without this appDropbox Ipad1 Works ok on my 2 laptops and IPhone.  Won't fully load on IPad 1st Gen shows 3/4 loaded and stops.Mad!!! My pictures from my iphone will not download to the drop box!! This needs fixed!Love the new app I like the new app! It looks very clean and smooth. It runs great and my files open very quickly! Some people are just complaining about the new icon just to jump on the bandwagon...get
Over yourselves ...Please fix Can't open numbers filesForce Closes all the timeOK Just an OK update, nothing mind-boggling. The ability to designate a file as ?favorite? for offline access will be very helpful (as opposed to the current system of designating individual files one by one - which is cumbersome and time-consuming).RENAMING!!!! Argh Why can't I rename my files??? Besides that, Dropbox for iPad and the service is fantastic. But renaming is an issue.Not satisfy The new look is okay but I don't seem to just zoom in with multitouch or pinch zoom in or out. It's hard and frustrated to say the least.Great! I love itCannot open larger PDF's anymore I have a shared folder with knitting magazines in it, and have never had a problem opening them most are 30mb to 51mb.  Now for the last few months, I try to open a magazine and the app crashes, I cannot even send the file to email or any other apps, it still crashes, so I now cannot open anything but really small single patterns.

Not very fond of the white all over the place with this last update either, a bit blinding.Just me or everyone Anyone else notice that it is polling your location continuously? Why? Even while idle. Not sure if it is affecting battery life yet. As for the style, feels more like Windows 8 than iOS. Stark white with hardly any contrast is how I think of Outlook 2013. iOS 7 is much more colorful.Update comment After update 11/23 app continuously asks to enable background photo sync.  Keep hitting disable, log in couple hours later, it asks again. White icons not as easy to read/use.  Harder on the eyes.Won't download New update won't download to my 4s. Can't give it a good review if it doesn't work.slow it's horrible , it's slow !!!Ugly, battery draining, and issues remain unresolved for a long time Update 11/27/13 - Upgrade still does not provide basic features of desktop product.  Ugly all white.  Forget opinions about all white look; it drains the battery needlessly when the screen is an all-blinding white mess.

Original review:

While Dropbox has good reliable syncing ability - which itself makes it good to use, there are other issues that they neglect to fix over a long period of time.  A couple of examples...

The pin code option on the iPhone always asks immediately when switching between apps despite the option being set to not require it immediately.

That same pin code option also locks the app for about 10 seconds before taking input...very annoying!  I tried it on two iPhones and and iPad...does it on all...doesn't matter if you have Internet access or not which should not anyway be required to access your offline favorites.

On the desktop side, they still do not provide an option to include folders from outside a designated "Dropbox" folder.  While alias tricks often work, they sometimes stop working and need to be re-setup.  This example is one the general public has been screaming for over the years.  Dropbox support is a canned-response support system.  They are too big and don't provide helpful support.This is a joke, right? The new iOS7 update is rudimentary and lackluster at best. Where's the ingenuity? The UI is bland and the navigation, well . . . 

I won't go there. 

Yet, the most startling news is the annual cost of upgrading to Pro 100.  Is $99.99 for 100 GB (to be paid EVERY year) really the most competitive rate you can offer in today's growing, consumer cloud market? 

Give me a break.  

This app is being deleted, and I'm terminating my 4-yr account with DropBox.  

Go sell crazy someplace else . . .Works as described This app is awesomeBleh Doing sunset with Phil and Shawna 2$ beersUgly redesign, poor UX Hate the new iOS 7 look. Ugly, not user friendly, takes more effort to navigate.Excel files don't open with update! I'm very disappointed that I can't open most excel files anymore! Repeated tries works occasionally but it should work every time!Rename files Still would like for there to be a way to rename files and folders. Need compatibility with the new iWork suite. Otherwise I like the new design.Videos I have some videos on my phone and they take too much space; I've wanted to put them into Dropbox so I can get that space back. It's taking forever though. I took those videos last year and the first one is still downloading. Please fix it!!!Delightfully simple Simple, intuitive, sexy and very useful. Perfect.Harder to navigate images Step back from before ios7. Images are harder to scale/zoom/pan images. It's much harder to two-finger scale and pan pictures. Much harder to use in general. Fix it please!Bring back full screen No longer able to hide the file list, so you don't have full screen displayed like previous version. Please bring back.Love Dropbox Just don't like the white icon.Does not function unless fully charged The camera upload feature is disabled when your battery drops below a point. There is no way to override it. Even if you hours of battery left on your iPad, the app will not work.Love Dropbox. Wish I could manage the cache on my iPhone! Dropbox on my iPhone just keeps on getting bigger and bigger. It's obviously caching files; I'd just rather it not take over 1Gb of my phone's storage. Ideally I could set the max cache it would store 500Mb? 768mb? and it would manage it from there - or even just an "empty cache" option - anything more elegant than having to delete the app and then download it again.Bugs!!!!! I care more about the functionality than the looks, so this review will say nothing about the updated look.  There are some major bugs/problems with the update!!!!  I am no longer given the option to "open in".  This means, I can look at my Numbers spreadsheets, but I can't "open in" Numbers, so I can't work with those spreadsheets or enter any info on them.  Major issue!!!  It makes dropbox completely useless for me.     Please fix this !!!!!Awesome ,Love it !!!!!!!! Works just as advertised, easy to get used to.VERY Disappointed The new interface is a very big disappointment. Is there any way to get Version 2.3.2 back?
Way too much white space which is hard on the eyes. Also, still not able to rename files -- unbelievable!!!Flawless I did really like the interface and the whole app itself. It has the best quality I need: flawlessOne of my best It is a great app. So useful and working just fine.Give us enough space to read the FULL file names!!! I like the app, but the file name system is nearly unreadable on an iPad or iPhone.  The side bar shows the. Beginning and end of the file name and now the header once the file is opened does. It show the file name at all.

I keep a lot of my research PDF documents on Dropbox.  The old format was bad enough trying to find the right articles, with the new layout it is pretty much impossible for me to select the files I need by name.

Please give more space so we can read the names of our files.

Also, as others have said, the new look is not very appealing, but that is true of the whole OS7.HD I just wish it did not compress videos so much to actually enjoy my Hd videosDecent It's an okay, average app. Don't really like the data limit on it. The compositions app is way better.Files View Disappears When Sort by Date Inside Fokder Recent iOS7 update cause files inside folders to disappear when SORT BY DATE is selected. They reappear after you close the folder by going to root directory and selecting SORT BY NAME then return to folder view. Frustrating bug. Thought my files were deleted, just can't see them.Finally found it! I've used a lot of to do apps but the only one I keep using is this one. It's simple and visually appealing.Quick &amp;amp; Easy! Very easy to use and efficientGreat app I like the new upgrade :) it looks very good. The only problem by now is that it is not sincronized the loading bar in the Favorites tab (when you download something on your tab) with that in Files tab, but overall 5 stars.Dropbox is great I love Dropbox!  I think it is by far the best cloud storage app. I use it every day across multiple devices. I think it's file sharing implementation is better than google drive's especially. That said, here are some things to improve:

Needs ability to email a file as an attachment (not a link) from iOS. If I need to send a file to someone like an attorney, they may not use Dropbox, and it's ridiculous to expect me to talk them into setting up a Dropbox account and explain how it works. I use Goodreader on iOS to get around this limitation, but native support would be better. 

Needs ability to mirror a folder on a PC, without having to copy the entire folder into Dropbox. I use a file sync program to deal with this limitation. 

Needs ability to rename files and folders!

I don't really like the new bright blue and white interface. I know this probably complies with Apple's new ios7 design guidelines, but it's just not as good. For example, I could easily tell what each type of file was before with just a glance at the icon (such as for a PDF file). Not so much anymore, the icons all sort of look the same without close inspection. I wish Johnny Ive had stuck to hardware design!Fix update Can't access my files with the recent update the app just closes.Works! Helps me stay completely organized! Amazing!!!Update is awful The new update is awful. Takes twice as long to load documents and if they're password protected you have to constantly enter it even if you just turn the ipad. Also even though documents have been updated it seems to take a lot longer for the updated version to register. Terrible and the look is not as nice either. Old version back please.Bug Keep closing while loading the app!Can't open Real Book files anymore!!!! What used to be 5 stars now gets 1. Updated an app that worked great - Dropbox, now is broken. Like many gigging musicians, I use iRealbook to help me run a jazz jam. Found out the updated app doesn't work DURING the jam. Fortunately, I knew the song well enough to fake through it, but this update needs to be reviewed, you've got a bug. Will revise my review when this app works again. Thank you!App crash I can't even open up this app, right when I tap on the app it crashes. Hope I don't lose my pics.Great UI, Features slowly coming The new UI is beautiful and functional. However, it's still missing some important management features such as renaming, or using file versions.Bring back colored icons This update makes it harder and slower to use. The icons for different file types all look very similar, which makes it slower to scan through and find the desired file. The old version used colors, which made it much faster to use.I like the app But why does location need to be enabled?Helps me keep it all together A+++++Won't work anymore Well, it seems that this app will no longer work with any IOS prior to IOS7.  I can't even get it to load on my iPhone.  Is there some way to go back to a previous version and use that?BAD the new version became lag and worst!! it is the worst dropbox version everCould be better This new version 3 iOS 7 interface is dull and not user friendly. For example, it's harder to view app icons, pdf, doc, txt, etc. Personally, this all white interface that these iOS 7 apps are adapting are not appealing at all. I believe a little more color would make things easier to navigate and pickup at a glance.Love the update They kept it simple, and now it fits iOS7 even better.Forces to quit With the new update it forces to quit a lot... Fix it please!!!!! I love the app easy to use but every time I open it, it forces to shut down on its own =(App is Great, New Icon is Hideous What was wrong with the old icon? I thought it looked great and fit in with the flat iOS7 theme. The new icon is quite the eye sore on my home screen.Pretty great! Works very good now I can talk to my Italian cousins??? Where did the file viewer go?  I can't see the files anymore.  Excel is not showing up.300 dollar bill after the first month Have no idea how my bill was 300 bucks after using this app for a month. Dropbox had 2gb of stuff in it but I used 20.4 gb of data from this app? Turn on wifi only if you use it!whiteout horrid on iPad The inverted colors of the icon induce retinal after images, and in-app, the whiteout is hard on the eyes. The experience on an iPad Air is one of huge expanses of white or badly contrasting off-white/light blue and stencil-thin pale icons battling the brightness of it all. The spartan look works fine on an iPhone, where there is proportionately less white assaulting the eye; with the iPad, however, I keep trying to reduce the brightness of the display, but that only further impacts contrast and legibility. 
Also why is it not possible to change names of files or folders??Terabol Did you add fingerprint as enter-codeWhat happened? After the latest iOS update I cannot get in to Dropbox. It crashes every time.  Please fix!Was good until update It keeps crashing every time I open the app????Can't open JPEG with new update Since they did a new update almost all my JPEG take too much time to open or even don't open. I need to save the file to see the photo on my iPhone. 

How can I have the old version?????Upgrade? Still very easy to share files, but why lose the in-app control for AirPlay? Not a huge deal, but I liked the old version better.Well done I really like this update. The new look is clean and nice and fits iOS 7. I have noticed the PDF reading seems a little smoother now. The slider appears when I scroll and disappears when I'm not using it, and a glitch that seemed to be in the last version (where the TOC button didn't appear when reading PDFs) seems to have been fixed.Great new look ... But Keep up the good work but camera upload has stopped working for me. No matter what I change no photos or videos will load.iWork deficient iWork is not supported. Very difficult to give a positive review with that huge problem.Just say NO to all-white backgrounds! Why does every app think they need to change to this design? Love the app but really dislike the all-white background. Ugh. Please change back.Arabic !!! We want to support the Arabic language ??Hate this update!!!!! I want the old version , this don't have the option to share my files via Facebook message ,please bring back the previous version or fix that !!!!Ugly New &quot;iOS 7&quot; Design There is a way to implement iOS 7's design correctly and still have it be beautiful. You see, iOS 7 is about simplicity and taking out the unnecessary details. But this is where this app (and many other apps, such as iBooks and iTunes U) has it wrong. They have removed every color altogether, resulting in everything being white. This is painful to the eyes and very ugly design, which is the opposite of what iOS 7 is supposed to achieve. 

That being said, everything in the app is functional, which is a shame, because the ugly design is a distraction from all of that.update TURNED ON camera uploads?!? Why?Mediocre update I don't understand why, to all developers, the words 'updated for iOS 7' means 'changed the way it looks and removed functionality from the app'. In the new version of Dropbox there are no back/forward buttons in the media player. And the little slider to choose where you are in your audio is too fiddly and you can only get it to go back to about 0:02. How stupid is that?

Are developers even testing these apps once they update them? Why take functions away from what WAS a perfect app? It's infuriating. 

I expected more from the Dropbox team because they have set such a high standard of excellence. This update is disappointing.Good &amp; Bad New features and speed are great. Visual changes are astoundingly UGLY! I don't know why every app is going with all encompassing white backgrounds; painful to the eyes, battery drain, and intrusive in group settings. Why not use dark gray or black backgrounds instead? Please consider changing and being a leader to this design approach!
5 stars for functional improvements
0 stars for aesthetic changesStill can't rename files. Nice app but sill have to use web site on mobile to rename files.I love this app, but... I can't open it right now. It try's to open and then closes automatically. Anyone else having this problem? Any help? (iPhone 5)BRING BACK FULL SCREEN PDF VIEWING!! Why is the option gone to hide the menu and dedicate that screen real estate to full screen viewing of content?? Thank goodness this semester is basically finished. Please prioritize this fix; it was a stupid omission.Can't stand the all white! I should have read the reviews first!!!  I can't stand the all white...agree with one of the other reviews...I don't want to open it up!Welcome to ugly town Population: DropboxThink before you release updates! How do you move files within existing folders? The world may never know. Great, fast app... But moving files is a necessity.Needs another Update 4 stars for the 4 minutes I was able to use it. It's crashing horribly on my iPhone5 but i know they'll fix that soon enough. Other than it's a nice update,the little I got to experienceUgly! New look in iOS 7 is waaaaay too white! Hurts my eyes. 

I liked the nice bottom and top bars in the previous version.Functionality loss Can no longer view pdf full window. Crashes. And current file view is lost when multitasking between windowsFiiiiiiix it pls. Does not open. Fiiiiix it. Disapointed.Great app, some bugs Absolutely love this app!!! Great for storing all those photos of my daughter that I don't want to delete but add up over time then have no room to take more!

Only problem is viewing the pics from the thumbnails. I click on the photo thumbnail and it won't show me the preview of my photo....hopefully can be fixed in next update!I rather the old icon It is a cool app I'm looking forlove it?? The new update looks fabulous. I love it. Works like it should so I can't complain.Can't open Bad idea!Won't open It immediately closes to the home screen every time I try to open the app. BooooNot usable anymore I was able to use Dropbox with this update only once. After that, it just keeps "Loading..." and after a minute it crashes. I restarted my iPad but it didn't change anything. Please correct this!!!Inconsistant uploads I uploaded 5 PDF files and only 1 is actually viewable, the other 4 just show blank pages. Sent email to Dropbox service and the answer was useless - said they had lots of requests and could not help me.Great Access to all your Dropbox files, awesome. Can display images, pdfs, videos, and more. Powerful tool to have on iOSUpdate done right. A well conceived iOS 7 redesign. Thanks!Could not be uglier Where is the beauty in an extremely white design?   It's painful to the eye!I don't want background updates The app is indispensable, but holy crap, what if I don't WANT to turn on background updates? Why are you so sure I have to turn it on, so much so that you prompt me to do so EVERY SINGLE TIME I OPEN THE APP!? This is infuriating!XLS FILES ON iPad Since the new update, I cannot now view my XLS files on iPad.  Please fix this ASAP. Thanks.So plain ??Great job! App looks and works great! I love this new iOS 7 inspired design!Not liking this.... You removed the best feature for business presentation? Where did full screen go? This is not good as others have pointed out. Please bring this back or I'll have to find something else to use. I'm not happy at all........Good. Nice UI. Keep up the good work!File names Very annoying to not be able to see an entire file name.  Put some flexibility in the width of the display for those of us who use files with longer names.Beautiful Good work.Disappointing Do not update! Icon is uglyGreat app but cannot easily attach files to an email I love this app, but so often I would like to simply attach a photo or PDF from my Dropbox to an email (using my iPhone Mail app) AS AN ATTACHMENT. Instead it will attach a "link" from where the recipient can download the file. This is very cumbersome. Please fix.printing problems fixed Thank you!  Thank you!  Thank you!  
The printing bug seems fixed after update.  
Now I can finally print to my wireless printer from my iPad. 
I use DropBox daily &amp; the inability to print was an anathema.Freezing When I open Dropbox in my iphone it is alway freezing and I can't even go back to my home screen!! It is not even shutdown. Fix this.Poor Compatibility and Terrible Design Why is this for iOS 7 only now? Not very fair for people wanting to run this on older devices or don't wish to downgrade to cruddy iOS 7.New iOS7 style but crashes all the time I should know better than to update to newer versions. Unusable.Doesn't work. Doesn't work for those of us still on iOS 6.1.4 so I can no longer use Dropbox on my iDevices. Please bring back the older one and have both. Perhaps the iOS 7 version could be named Dropbox 7+ and the iOS 6 version Dropbox 6.Upload videos in iPhone 5S With the new update I cannot upload a video!! I already went through all the settings and cant find out why it is not uploading, and it doesnt let me cancel either.Simply amazing I love it, they payed attention to details that you would never appreciate unless you try this use them for some time and suddenly loose them.Loving Dropbox I love Dropbox! I also love the new look. I do wish there was a way to view the full file names of files and edit file names. There is a reason that Windows went away from 8.3.Nice, but Disappointed to see there's still no text editor after all this time.Still no Editing from iphone I like Dropbox but very disappointing there is no editing content when viewing from the iphoneLooks good Keep up the good work! Love the new design.Great This app is why I prefer Dropbox to Google drive.Too Basic, Less Functionality Even with the new upgrade, this app still only offers the most basic functionality. It doesn't even support restoring deleted files or versions, offline folders, see list of revisions of files, renaming files, etc. And I thought they wanted more to focus on mobile. What a joke.Keeps crashing on load! Noooooo! :(Bugs Great app overall and cool new iOS7 design. 
An extremely annoying bug - every time when you read a .doc document and switch the app - the document rolls back to the beginning! I can't express frustration it causes!
Please fixLove the update Designers really understood iOS7 design language. 

Renaming folders and files is still missing, its time to add that guys. 

Hurray for AirDrop!Wow! The new UI looks and feels great, right alongside iOS7!UI The new design is so bland. You don't HAVE to make your app look like apple's stock apps. You can put your own band in it too.Good App It is a good app, very stable and useful, but please, half of the world population wants a function for file renaming. How many lines-of-code takes to include a renaming feature in your App???

Listen to your customers! Then I'll give you 5 stars!Excellent I love the new design for iOS 7Unlock panel locked I can no longer access the app after the update. Once at the unlock panel, the number pad doesn't allow input to unlock.Things Dropbox needs. Would be nice to have a grid view of photos other than just the auto upload of camera roll. Also would be nice to rename files.

My last review still not fixed: This app doesn't support mobi file uploads. Would be nice to save my mobi files.The iOS 7 redesign is awesome! Great work. Fits really well with iOS 7.White White white white!No me gusta No veo lo elegante en ella. Adem?s ahora es m?s dif?cil acceder a tus archivos hay que seleccionar como favorito un archivo para que lo descargue y despu?s quitarlo. Estoy decepcionado.Too much white It's all white. Hurts my eyes.Location Services snafu Location Services are always turned on now for camera uploads! Whaaa?3.0 The update is fantastic! Everything is easier to find, looks prettier, and is easy to access. Great job guys!Love the new design Hope they keep adding features and making this app better end betterGreat functionality, poor UI New features and functionality are great, but the updated iOS 7 interface is horrible. I have no idea why all these UI designers think having everything the same color (white!) is better. It's not. Flat style is fine, but apps need visible separation between content and control functions. Old UI was much better in this regard.Loss of functionality, worse interface One of the main things I need Dropbox for opening Pages files. 3.0 simply opens them to a gray screen that says "Pages Document" and doesn't give me the option I used to have to open the file in Pages. This bug needs to be squished.Finally new update! I can finally view my documents! The new update is greatNice design updates Thank you for the redesign! It's great. I can now take this app out of my "apps with ugly icons for ios7" folder.Video Export Support I've been waiting for this feature for quite sometime now, and I'm so glad it was added with this update.Greatest Organizer Available Found it via lifehacker and love it!Does not work I upgraded the iPhone app. At first, it would not identify all of my stored information. Presently, it does not recognize my user name and password. I've tried reinstalling the app - still no luck. At this rate, I am reluctant to upgrade on the iPAd! 

THIS NEEDS ATTENTION!!!New design I'm not a fan if the new design.  I can tolerate the in-app design, but the icon is hideous.  I've had to hide it in a second page folder to keep it from screaming at my eyes every time I look at my phone.  Please change it back.  Please?  Think of the retinas!Love the new design! I absolutely love the new design and the new icon, it made me put Dropbox on my homescreen for the first time ever!New UI I love the new clean UI. Very unintrusive and elegantFix PDF files issue I can not open my PDF files on the new design, that is too bad. Please fix it.Yup. It's ugly. The white app icon is so atrocious, I'm hiding it away in a new folder that I'm naming "Ugly Apps". It will be joined by Photos and iBooks. Some other Apple bloat-ware apps, like Game Center, Newsstand, and Passbook could go in too, but they'll just stay in my "Crap!" folder instead.Barely adequate This is a sad little update that has obviously been designed by people who never use Dropbox. It now a bare bones app that just lets you view your files, but now has a constant and annoying sidebar that steals screen real estate.?? FasterNice look Nice look but I still not able to rename my files ?Maximization HOW CAN I CAN MAXIMIZE THE SLIDE SHOW ?! IT DISAPPEARED .. BAD UPDATECool Thanks for design iOS7White wash Take pointers from Yahoo on how to make iOS 7 Style apps that stand out from the 90% that are beautifully designed in blinding white. Ugly app and icon.Day One Journalling Reviewed by EasyJournaling. Com.  Loved it from Day One.? After the last update, it crashes every time I open the manual upload. Pls fix it.Great work The new UI is awesomeGreat update (please support new Pages) New update is faster and looks more inline with iOS 7. I'm not a power user but I frequently look at documents on my iPhone created in Pages (Mac). The new version of Pages is completely redesigned and Dropbox cannot view those documents. I would think this will be supported at some point. I'm hoping for sooner rather than later.Update no good! Now the excel documents can't be read. Not cool at all.it’s so gooood but not support ios 6 this update ! this update is so gooooooooooooooodLove it! Having airdrop added to dropbox was the best thing you did!App crashing I just updated and the app is no longer working.It is crashing.The app is great,but please fix this.No iWork support But still no iWork support when viewing Pages and Numbers documents?Sick of all been white You should put a button so the person could choose the interfaceWhy iOS 7 Why force update to iOS 7?Best app I like it is very good i use it ever dayBeautifully fantastic. Great update.

Please add previews for Pages 5.0 documents

Get rid of that ridiculous scroll bar dotPhotos won't upload Version 3.0 auto updated today and now my photos won't upload. Luckily my SkyDrive added an upload feature.Fix The crash. I can't even open it. ??Más rápida Se nota que es m?s fluida.
Me gustar?a que los dem?s aprendieran hacer asi sus apps, ya que ios7 ha ralentizado mucho mis igadgets.
Se agradece la velocidad.Waste!!! Sky drive gives 7gb space, google gives 15gb and flickr is 1TB ?? dropbox is waste in front of them! :/Great app It saves everything I'm doing to all my devices. I put down my phone pick up my tablet and continue what I am doing.Can't see NEW Pages files Can't see NEW Pages filesLooking good New interface is greatAn atrocious update I bought an iPad so I can read work and school PDFs from Dropbox on it.  I finally figured out how to actually view the PDF, but why have that stupid search box and tile icon visible permanently?  I seriously don't need this when I'm studying.  I think it's time to switch to Google Drive.  Seriously worthless update.Finally! Love the new UI. It looks awesome !Won't open!! Keeps crashing!! Need a fix fast!!!!Solid update Nice major update, overall the app works great. But, one thing that's still missing is bulk downloads. You can a) select multiple files and b) download files from Dropbox to your phone, but you cannot do both at once. Seems pretty basic a feature to overlook.Why did you invert the logo's colors? It's annoying as all get-out.Works. Still no long file name support on iPad, why?Awesome look The app's new look is aesthetically elegant.Finnally!! Beautiful app!! Thanks Dropbox for keeping my porn safe. HAHAHAH jk!No More Viewing Full Screen PDFs? Unless I'm missing something - and I looked *everywhere* - it's no longer possible to view PDFs in full screen in this new update. Please fix that, Dropbox.Can't hide scroll pane? Landscape or not, the scroll pane on the left is always visible no the screen. Very annoying as I enjoyed displaying my docs in full screen on previous version. Really hope it's user error, else this is a weak update.Fix Before the old the update everything was running fine. But now with the new update the pictures takes a long time to load. Very slow . Just fix itiOS7 The design is awesome. I never thought flat design is the next big thing. :))The icon is ugly... Really ugly...Perfect Finally a much needed update!!Great It's a great app especially for iphone users since they can't add storage to their phones but any time u send a email to a friend inviting them to get it they give you more memoryLike the new design Is Dropbox design for iOS 7, but is still the same more or less. Air Drop is the only new thing in this update (for iPhone) I think. 
4 out of 5 because still can't rename files...Crashing issue Folders with mp3s crash the app.Ugly look and weird operation It looks ugly in the new UI, and why delete by swipe to left like other iOS 7 apps not working?Se cierra La aplicacion se cierra nomas al empezarla.nice updates! very beautiful:)Beautiful Love the redesign!The old icon was better Great app, and the new iOS 7 interface is fine, but the old icon was much better. It was already ?flat,? no need to change it for iOS 7. Please bring it back.Removed some of my favorite features I miss the old version that had a real scrollbar that I could simply drag down instead of scrolling for miles trying to get where I want to be. And also, I miss when it would bookmark where I was in each document instead of refreshing every single time I exit the document - especially with the new scrollbar. I keep accidentally exiting the document and then I end up scrolling for 10 minutes to get to where I wasIs it that hard to allow renaming files/folders in the app? I like the new UI that harmonizes with iOS 7's design, but aside from a few minor updates, this version is essentially unchanged from the previous version. 
Also, is it absolutely impossible to make renaming files/folders available within the app? Even after years and many updates, I can't believe such a simple, yet important feature is still nonexistentBeautiful? If you ask me, this app looks wayyyyy worse than the last version. Seriously I don't even want to open Dropbox anymore cuz I'm scared of what I'll see. The iOS 7 stuff is fine, but make your colors more appealing.Very useful Nice design refresh. Looks great. 

I love this app. Dropbox totally saved me at work. I had to email a bunch of large files and the work email system wouldn't take it. 

Dropbox worked flawlessly. Not only did they get links to download the files, but they could also view content right in their web browser. PDFs, Word docs, and videos all were viewable in the browser for them. It made presentations a breeze! 

I now use Dropbox for personal use too. Love it.Great App... But Sorry, don't like the new icon though.App must have!! Helps organize and simplify my life.Perfect This app is awesome, big thanks to the creator! It's a huge help with school work :) and the update made it even better!Love the new update I like this update for IOS 7, you can now finally save videos I love itNo renaming!!! Wow!!! Version 3 and STILL no renaming of files!!!Crashing after update App is not at all opening... Straight aways crashes upon opening... Please fix this.Not sure it's the right shade of white I like Dropbox, I really do. But you know, the white is so blinding that it is distracting to view content.iOS7 Good style iOS7 Good styleGREAT UPDATE! I love the new update! GOOD JOB GUYS!iOS 7 is a delight Finally with the iOS 7 update the app is beautiful to look at again and so much more. We can finally download video from Dropbox!Simply beautiful and easy to use I love Dropbox. I keep all my important documents and files on it and am able to access it from anywhere. Can't imagine working without it now.iOS 7 Finally!How about an option for high contrast? Just because it is all white doesn't make it "beautiful." I liked the look of the old app more. Beware of update.Good app! But why can't I do a simple renaming of files? Good app! But why can't I do a simple renaming of files?White dwarfs got nothing on Dropbox 3.0 Do you like every UI element to be the same color? Do you like that color to be retina searing white? Then you're going to love Dropbox 3.0. Otherwise, DO NOT UPDATE!Update is terrible. Really can not appreciate the new design.Loved this new update for Dropbox! Clean interface with bunch of new features, makes it even more useful!Perfect Every little annoyance has been fixed. Full photo view. Also new look!Awesome update!! Wow finally! and new features are very welcome! I use dropbox every day for work/home and this update "puts a smile on my face" :)Good, but can't open new iWork files Dropbox still didn't fix the problem with the new iWork files. Can't open or export the files to Pages or Numbers. Hope to see a future update on that matter!!Disappointed The new look is not the greatest. I'm a bit disappointed. I was expecting it to be better.Is it time to stop using Dropbox? Dropbox has stopped supporting the new iWork (Pages, Numbers, Keynote) files when opening on any iOS device.  I?ve written to them twice and both times I?ve received a form response saying "Thanks for writing in. While we'd love to answer every question we receive, we can't get back to you at this time.?  It goes on to send me to their Help page to review questions there - I believe that?s where I started to begin with and they didn?t address this problem.  

I hope this doesn?t signal things to come as DB gets too big to deal with their longtime customers.It Works Great It Save my life, Very good! if you don't have enough storage.Great But Missing Been waiting for this app for awhile now. It has not disappointedCan sync with other iPhones! Just speak clearly,and  voila' you  understand!Horrible Dropbox app is bug ridden and they have no desire to fix basic things. It may work for a while, but eventually it will break and there will be no recourse from Dropbox to fix it. Support will ignore you. Dropbox is extremely arrogant about. Competition is now catching up. Finally and thankfully.Keeps crashing I will look for the update.  I trust them to fix it, but this sure is annoying now!Good app Works well, especially for saving files for offline use.Super! Autocomplete, autocategorizing, and checking off items make this very useful.Dropbox It's very useful appI After last update for iOS it stopped working properly. A lot of issues!Trash! App keeps crashing.BROKEN by iOS 7 Ever since iOS 7, the "Open in" option no longer works. No matter which app you choose to open it in, it does nothing, just sits there.

Almost useless now.Super Simple Great visual app!!!Worth the Cost Use it all the time for homework and projects. A timer would be nice but awesome app.Photo Upload Broken in 2.3.2 I rely on this app for backing up my photos automatically but the latest version displays random numbers for photos in the upload queue while showing thumbnails for photos already uploaded. And it's yet to back up the dozens of photos I've taken since this latest update. 

I hate to use the review section for bug reports but I couldn't find anywhere on their website to leave this feedback. I just kept getting pushed to a mobile-formatted list of FAQs.Just the app I was looking for to get organized Miles ahead of Clear.Awesome I NEVER write reviews on anything but I'll make an exception for Dropbox. I've only experienced minor issues but nothing worth complaining about. I use it everyday, around the clock.Why not? Cool APP but not a whole lot different than my google docs. Why not make it possible for me to creat files from my iPhone? Just sayin, that may give you the winning edge. You did a good job on what you did creat thoOne of the finest apps I have seen Simple to use. And the voice recognition is great!Must Have Easily top 5 must have apps  for iphone.Add Reminders. What else to say .... Simple, beautiful and very functional. I just love it.I actually use it Cool app! and now sync to desktop appThe list app I've been looking for! Totally awesomeDropbox I don't even know where I would be without my Dropbox account and app! A great and easy way to keep all your photos from any device (being your iPhone, iPad, or computer) syncs them all together in one safe spot. And in case of a computer crash I never have to worry. ???? I suggest it to all my friends.This app runs my life rocking. sleek simple design.Crashes like crazy Worked fine last week. Today the app is crashing on all my classroom iPads. Prevents access to exams in a paperless classroom.Simple &amp;amp; Amazing Worth the dollar!!! It is really good except occasionally gets what you say wrongPoor on iPhone This is a fantastic desktop &amp; laptop tool but with no search or text file editing/creation on the iPhone, it is almost useless on that platform.

I've between 500-1000 simple text files in Dropbox. When will we be able to:
1. Mark favorites at the folder, 
2. Search file contents, 
3. Edit simple text files including adding new files.Quite a useful app! I've had Dropbox on my PC for almost a year, just waiting for the day when I may be out and need to access something from my storage in Dropbox on another PC or device and didn't bring a flash-drive. Now, I have it on my phone, and all of my pictures automatically sync to my computer's Dropbox folder in a flash. My one complaint is that on the app you can't pick a specific album from your Photos, it just automatically syncs any pictures taken that spend a minute on your Photo Stream...which, if you have iCloud set up on your device and PC, iCloud does the same thing. I still love the app and I definitely prefer it to iCloud.It's my Swiss Army Knife Keeps docs &amp; pics synced between my desktop, laptop &amp; cell phone. I use it EVERYDAY! It's a must have appTerrible This app seems to never work and will only play videos when it want's to.ProblemS!!! The app was working perfectly and I loved it. But I don't know why it stopped working!  It says that I had downloaded it but when I tried to open it it doesn't work!! Please fix it !!Unable to use after update This app was great until the update :(  Since the update, I can't view my files because of the push notification message popping up over and over. If this isn't fixed soon I will have to stop using Dropbox altogether. :(iOS 7 When is there going to be an iOS 7 ui overhaul and compatibility fix done??Best yet. Its useful!Flawless on iOS 7 I'm using the iPhone 5s a and the app us running smoother than ever thank you!Totally amazing Does just as advertised, and much better than expected!Ios 7? Where is iOS7 user interface?Love it For some reason in today's schools we now get virtual text books that are in PDF form or just saved on a drive. With his app I can now take my government book with me everywhere I go and never have to worry about it!!! So much easier for me to pull out my iPad in a class than my laptop to do the work really quickly. Thanks so much!!!Complete piece of crap Just trying to upload some photos. This app did this perfectly for years.Pretty good! I would like to recommend two features:

- ability to copy folders and files between destinations inside Dropbox. 

- ability to stream music with screen turned off. Maybe advanced music controls too like playlists and sleep timers. Kind of like google music but not from googleAwsomeness I've been reading about this app/ service for months. intially i had no use for it. Then after my son was born i needed a place where i can store my pics and videos in. This App is awesome!!! 

I love how it uploads quickly, i have photobucket and that's slow compared to this. Also i love how they give an extra Gigabyte of space for pictures.Buggy Various degrees of broken under iOS 7: buttons fail to appear, caching irregularities, etc.

OTOH it's Dropbox, it's indispensable.Great tool for school! Dropbox has been a great tool for school because it facilitates in sharing recorded lectures with other students.Horrible Since the iOS 7 update the files don't upload to Dropbox even when connected to wifiHas gotten worse The functionality of this app WAS great and the service it provides still is, but recent updates have made it frustrating to use. Scrolling through a folder of saved images now causes the app to randomly freeze up for 10 seconds at a time when swiping to the next image.  What was previously 4 stars is now 2. And will dropbox ever be able to animate animated gifs?Doesn't work on iPad When I open it crashes my iPadSlow upload than before Before no update the upload of picture was so fast but now after update it's so slow. For just 1 picture cannot upload. What happened?Lack of basic iOS 7 support Was really good. Then, iOS 7 arrived. Months later, there hasn't been an update to fix basic compatibility.Gets the job done. ...But please add the ability to only sync photos. Currently you can only set it to sync photos AND videos. 

Videos are just too large to be worth syncing.Great I just wish you could edit your word documents other than that it's great!Can sync with other iPhones! We've had a Chinese tutor for our son for the last year and this app has really helped our pronunciation. Very pleased!Messed up Ever since I update my iPad Dropbox has NOT been working right. I tried deleting the app and downloading again. If anything it is WORSE than before. Please fix this ... I used to love this app!Crashes Crashes every time I'm using it?? VERY BAD!?? This use to be a great app on iOS 5. Having iOS 7 and the latest version of 

Dropbox and it's really bad. The new UI for viewing photos and video needs improvement to return to the way it was.So good, and will keep getting better My wife and I share a 100GB account, and it's amazing! So many things:

Automatic photo/video upload, iPhoto import, works with the Mailbox app, shared folders, photo aggregation on the website and mobile, the ability to store files only on the cloud (saves space on my Mac from old files)...

...and the obvious things like having everything backed up in real-time, and accessibility of my files from anywhere.

I could do without it anymore! Remember when we just had computers and hoped they didn't break and lose all our files?

One suggestion: if I have automatic photo upload on and download a photo to my phone's camera roll (say, for #TBT), don't automatically re-upload it to Camera Imports! It's already in Dropbox, silly. And yes, obviously if I use Instagram or some other photo sharing software to doctor it, I know it's a different photo and will therefore upload.How about we update for iOS 7??? And comparatively storage pricing could be more competitive.Awful App will not load my videos from the cloud. I thought the point of a cloud was to have constant access no matter what....It's Dropbox Get DropBox. It is an essential part of every device strategy.Rename File Names and download videos to iPad!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! I really NEED to be able to change file names of uploaded pics and vids in the app and download videos to iPad. I will give 5 stars once that is changed. 

It really jams me up when I upload a video and have to wait to send a link off because I can't change the file name in the app.

In order to change a file name I have to upload from the iPad then open safari and after I sign in I can finally navigate to the location of the file and change it's name. 

Please make renaming files and downloading videos to iPad an option in the APP!!Works good for me. I question WHO thought it was a good idea to put the data wipe on 10 Code fails here too. Who will use it? it's seriously a dirty prank waiting to happen to someone. If you don't like it you don't have to use it, but its existence just bodes ill.
Pointless rant end.Best It helped me alot thanksDownloads of favorites can't resume? Im on a crappy hotel wifi that goes in and out. Been trying to download a 1gb file for over 2 days now. But for some reason dropbox has not allowed favorited downloads the ability to resume  and instead restarts the download from the beginning every time it fails. It's almost 2014. We have the technology to RESUME A DOWNLOAD what's the problem here?Fix the starred items feature! It does a poor job at retaining the starred items in memory. So I wait a long time for an MP3 to buffer, I "star" it so I won't have to wait next time. But then next time it often has to buffer all over again!I can't access yo app in ios7!! When ever I sign out and try to sign in,it couldn't get access into App and after while it comes out. 
Pleas fix this bugDropBox dropsies Current version is NOT compatible with updated Apple iPad OIS 7.Edit documents This app is fine for viewing documents, but that is all. I want to be able to edit documents anywhere I go, but the app does not support editing. That is a significant feature that is lacking and the reason that I don't feel like app is satisfactory.Garbage First of all you can't move dropbox files to another dropbox folder even if it is public. You get an error message and you're asked to try again. Then it wants to upload your entire photo library to the dropbox cloud but you can't pick and choose which ones. And thirdly, you can't move photos from dropbox to the appropriate album in your photo library. You can only move them and they get dumped into Camera Roll. Then you have to open Photos and go into Camera Roll and move them into the right album. So that's three steps that should be one! The desktop version is great so it's mind-boggling how bad this app is.Used to be great After the supposed iOS 7 update, the app isn't working on any of my iOS devices like they used to. Crashes on iOS 7, and I can't even use the search feature on any of my devices, neither iOS 6 nor iOS 7. I try searching and it crashes.....Very usefull app Thank's for app,but can you add offline mod?for exmple i want save one video in my iphone,and after that play it with VLCSo weird I just got my new 5s. Used to work with 4s very well but the weird thing is I could never download it on my new 5s!! It just says "open", how could I open without even download?Great app for saving photos Love this app esp since I run out of space on my iPhone all the time.  Backs up pics to the cloud.Uploads but couldn't download correctly Uploaded over 200 contacts from my iPad but would only copy 6 contacts to my iPhone 5s.?????? ?????? ???? ??????? ???? ???? ?????? ???? ??? ???? ??????Ehh Bitcasa is better than this app. Go check it out in the AppStoreCRASHING keeps crashing every time I try to make an accountDisappointing Ever since IOS 7, it has been crashing. 
Can we expect a fix?Select all...what the hell happened to that basic functionality?? Seriously...why did select all functionality no longer available on everything?! (For most apple app) If i need to upload 500 images...i have to check those 500 images one-by-one!?!? It just started doubling some pictures, most of which were taken with the front camera. Also it is taking forever to upload pictures. Please fix:(Won't install app!! It says I've downloaded the app but it won't let me open it from the App Store. The icon isn't even on my phone!! Please fix for iOS 7!!iOS 7.0.3 ? After upade, it's not working for me too, please fix support of this version.Crash crash crash Dropbox on my iPad 2 has been unusable for over half a year. Always crashes on start up. Very frustrating that I pay for this service and it only works on my iPhone with a much smaller screen.Almost useless at the moment Needs update badly. Icon glitch when closing app. Unable to save videos to camera roll. Video quality is horrible. Photos loose edits when uploaded to dropbox. To be so popular this app needs a lot of work.Not working with iOS7.0.3 Not working with iOS7.0.35/5 Works find with iOS 7. Love Dropbox. Great service. Great app!No picture privacy Even with the photo sharing disabled, it still uploads photos I did not authorize into the app.iOS 7 The app is great but it needs a new look for iOS 7Crashes hard &quot;Connect to iTunes&quot; App crashes by having dialog repeat "Connect to iTunes to enable Push Notifications". Had to delete, breaks app switching and breaks main menu buttonLoading bug How come it takes 10+ minutes to load a simple document? I just want to open it, edit, send, and etc.Good app Cant think of any specific complaints, but there is always room for a more robust interfaceDon't But This For An iPad 2 Running iOS 7! If you have a lifetime to wait for files to download and transfer to your camera role this may be the app for you.  It's much faster to take the time to sync your iPad 2 and transfer your files through iTunes.  I'm disgusted!8GB???? This app uses 8GB of space on my iphone. Yet on my computer used only 3GB? Why is it using so much more on my iphone?! Ridiculous!!! Please fix. Or let me choose things I want downloaded to my phone.IOS7 probs After updating to iOS 7 on my ipad mini, Dropbox has been a lot slower, but my main concern is that the only way to upload photos is to leave the app open and up on my screen the entire time I'm uploading the pics. Please fix, it's really inconvenientiOS 7 redesign And why is there STILL no rename functionality? This is trash. So frustrating.Very good Very good!Love this app Now I always have all my stuff with me!  This is great!DOES NOT LOAD ANY FILES DOES NOT LOAD ANY FILESDropbox gas stopped syncing to my iphone Sometime in the last month Dropbox stopped syncing. The most recent files on my phone are all 1 month old yet there are many more current files that I have loaded in Dropbox desktop folder for syncing. Help!iOS7 Please update this app to iOS7Convienent :)Will not upload in Background I have all the settings toggle on for background uploading but I still won't upload unless I open the app and I have to keep it open for it to upload.iOS7 Please!It doesn't work with gifs. When you have them upload they save as a photo not a gif so they don't work would like this fixedNo batch options I do not understand why a) I can't save a video to my camera roll and b) save multiple photos to my Photo LIbrary. I have to go and click each one, then click download button, go back... That is silly. You can batch move to a folder but not to your Photo LIbrary on iPhone.I love dropbox! ...and the app is awesome, but it's lacking a rename option. Kinda defeats the purpose of an app if you have to use the website to be able to use a common tool.Broken. Am I crazy or missing something? Suddenly I can't view .pdf, .xls, .docx, etc. "Unable to view file There was an error loading the file."doesn't work very slow.  i had to kill the app on my phone.Push notification I'm trying to go in my drop box but that push notification p.s. Fix itNot on ios7 Yep, I get the same iTunes error as others.Update please We should be able to do text documents! :(iOS 7 no work iOS 7 no workWorthess Cant even open a pdf and xfer to ibooks without crashing 10x. Completely useless.Black out screen &amp; downloading zip file problems I've always found Dropbox a bit buggy, but it's gotten worse since I updated to IOS 7.  When I download zip files or webpages &amp; open the files, the screen is blank, blackened or a blurred enlarged image of the symbol (of Facebook, Google or other symbols related to the site that the the zip file or webpages it came from. 

As a teacher, I rely on having access online &amp; off line related to research  for work my work as a teacher.  Also, I am required to write notes &amp; save them as zip files in order to save space.

So, please fix Dropbox! Why does it keep telling me that I can't open some documents &amp; that I don't have the authorization to alter or edit my document; on the flip side, some documents tell me to enter a password (???).

If anyone has any suggestions to improve this or recommends a different program to recommend, I would appreciate it.

Thanks!crashes every time every time I open Dropbox it crashes and I can't change the screen.,,please fix :( I love my Dropbox :(Needs an update. Dropbox has been my go to for everything ever since 2009. But this update has ruined everything. I run out of space and my phone frequently and all I do it upload everything to dropbox and clear my space up. But I have been trying to upload my 500 pictures for about 4 days now,when it usually only takes less than an hour. And I've been stuck on 25 pics for about 2 of these days. I have my internet connected and then nothing will upload. This really needs to my fixed.Fix it Used to love Dropbox but since most recent IOS update there's nothing but problems including the fact it won't upload picturesAnnoying Does not work in background.. U need to keep the app open and stare the upload bar for camera upload... Cannot use any other app or lock ur iPhone..
Is it a joke or am I missing something ???Important If we could create docs inside the app that would be greatSlow and clunky Latest update is super slow when selecting a photo from roll to upload. Everything is slightly delayed and laggy.Yep Good stuffGreat App, Needs UI Update This is normally a five star app however it is taking way too long too update the UI to iOS 7 styleWhat the !!!! Come on guys. Let's fix the problem! Why is it taking you so long the address and fix this issue. Dropbox on iPad with the new iOS 7, is not useable. FIX IT!!!Absolute Must Have For REALTORS Love the app. Easily save  pics/docs/audio/video into files/folders from mobile or view same file types from your desktop version. Best tool for sales people who live by a paper trail. No app crashes. It's integrated with others apps as well.App rendered useless after ios 7 update Have to reset ipad 3 at times because I can't get back to home screen. "Connect to iTunes..." message. Cannot use app at all.Doesn't even open! Downloaded it to find that it doesn't even open. The AppStore says it's downloaded but nothing shows up in my app selection screen.SUICIDE-USMC BOTTOM LINE: DROPBOX IS THE ONLY CLOUDBASE STORAGE THAT SUPPORTS INTEGRATION TO ALMOST EVERY APP AVAILABLE ON THE MARKET TODAY.

Dropbox by far is the best storage application out there. My employer provides us with paid subscriptions to all of the cloud-based storage sites on the market (Share Point, Share-Point-Pro, Box, Google docs &amp; Just Cloud). I have used everyone of them and none of them come close to the flexibility and integration that dropbox offers.

I am Not sure why people are writing negative reviews regarding I'll as seven support will. I have dropbox installed on three iOS 7 devices (iPhone 5, iPad, iPad Retna) and I have not had any problems.So useful!! Amazing helpful app!Need to be able to search and find words or phrases. Need to be able to search and find words or phrases, electronically! Digitally! Not by having to open and tediously read doc after doc, file after file, to find what I need. Please create a search function that works within and among files.Links in PDF don't work! Ack! I need to do user testing with a clickable PDF this week and have ALWAYS used Dropbox because it's been awesome in the past. Now though, all my clickable PDFs don't work - nothing is clickable and my hotspots don't work. This is super frustrating - especially because I found nothing else that can compare to Dropbox and really rely on this feature to work! PLEASE FIX THIS ASAP. Right now I'm hating the app because you guys took away this core piece of functionality that I desperately need, but PLEASE add it back soon and all will be well again.Turn off default settings I am just tying out drop box to transfer photos and videos to and from my iPhone 5s to my IPad3. 
One option I do not like is that "Camera Upload" is turned on by default. I would prefer that Camera Upload is turned off by default at first use. Then users can turn it on if they choose. Video files take up a lot of room and I don't want every video file on my iPad or iphone uploaded to Dropbox only those that I want to transfer between iDevices. Also I don't want things to automatically sync to all my devices by default. People can turn these options on if they want these options but these settings should not be turned on by default. 
It sounds a little like what 
Facebook does by turning on options by default when certain options should be turned off by default. Maybe if a message could pop up at first use informing users of these setting so they can turn them on if the individual user wants the option.Eating up local storage! Not a single file was chosen to be downloaded but the app is storing everything locally automatically, eating up 15gigs of my storage! 
Yes, I tried unlinking and deleting the app, then reinstalling it again, this freaking app then starts downloading everything to my phone by itself. Get it fixed or I am canceling my subscriptionVideos dont work Videos dont work with ios 7, update pleaseiOS7 problems Since updating my iPad to iOS7 the Dropbox app does not work. Please fix!!!Stuck Can't use after iOS 7 update.  Please fix ASAPDisappearing Photos Lately my photos have been disappearing. I'll go into a folder and it says that I have 76 photos then a bunch of them disappear and it says I have 56! I'm losing valuable photos!Had to make a new password because it expired DO NOT TRUST! After i updated my password, ALL 700 of my files were deleted. After i signed in, it was like they just all disappeared.iOS problem When using Dropbox on my IPhone, I get a pop up that says I need to connect to ITunes. The message will not go away and I have to turn off the phone to use it in any program. I've tried connecting to ITunes but nothing works?  I do not have this problem on my IPad??  Very frustrating. I had no issues before the new operating system.Don't forget to enable backup!! I thought I had lost all my photos (that I hadn't backed up in iCloud) after the stupid iOS 7 wiped my phone... But I had forgotten that I had enabled Dropbox's backup- and now I have all my photos back!! Thank you!!Basic iPad app works pretty well, but if I want to read a text document, the writing is tiny and there's no way to change it. Kinda ridiculous.Ripoff The restriction of one added book for new users is stupid.  It would take a month to find out how useful the app is.

I'll be darned if I'm going to fool with an unknown app for a month before I decide whether or not to buy it!Memory leak I'm a big fan if dropbox as a service, but if I don't use the app briefly and remove it from multitasking, my phone will rapidly have less memory available until it freezes and the app shuts itself down. Definitely a notable inconvenience. Otherwise, I've always loved the app prior to this more recent problem.Good, but needs improvements 1) doesn't allow highlighting text in PDF's. This a simple feature to add for those who have books or docs to read !
2) no editing features for pics. Most apps allow basic editing, update this please.
3) allow bluetooth sharing,Used to be Good This app used to be good until I noticed it's becoming more sluggish and annoying with every update and on a side note, I am still using iOS 6 on my iPad Mini. On both iOS 6 and 7, I have issues with this app. Scrolling used to be smooth and easy, and now it's constantly lagging and putting pauses in between causing this app to be impossible to browse anything. Also, the layout is messed up where the bar on top is a little higher so it looks like it's cut off. 

There is also no cancel upload, so if you're mass uploading 400 pictures and want it to stop, it's not possible. Sliding across an image, gives you convenient options, but it's annoying that I always alamost hit the trash can when the app lags up. It's also NOT cool to put the "download" icon so close to the "trash" icon.. seriously?Help! I upgraded to iOS seven and now the app is dead and doesn't work!!! What gives??!!!Don't install with ios7!!! I installed Dropbox but every time I open it, it "push notification" box pops up and when I push ok it pops right back up and the only way to do ANYTHING on my phone is to restart it!! I even tried uninstalling and reinstalling Dropbox but it did the same thing. I will be uninstalling it for good now.Great update Can't do better for files on the go!Best App to View My Dropbox Files I store many files on Dropbox. This app is perfect for viewing those files without opening them for changes; I use other apps when I might want to change a file. Very few file types can't be opened by this app. 

This app is also great for managing my Dropbox folders.Irritating problems One of the biggest problems I have is that the outline and search buttons seem to disappear after I use them once. After that I have to exit the file to use those buttons again because that's the only way to make the buttons re-appear.No iOS 7 support, constant crashing Really need the app to get things done, sadly the dev team doesn't feel like submitting a update to help many of those who are having problems, like myself. Very disappointed.Dropbox freezes after ios7 install I work for a company that utilizes dropbox to share reports from jobs. Since the ios7 installation on a coworker's ipad mini he is unable to open dropbox without the dropbox freezing up and telling him that dropbox needs to be synced with iTunes. He also cannot send a document from notability to dropbox without this same notification freezing his ipad. He has turned off the notifications, uninstalled dropbox and reinstalled it and turned off the ipad numerous times all to no avail. Someone needs to fix this issue ASAP! This has really screwed up a great app and may make us change what service we utilize in the future.Must Have App! This is a must have App as you can set it to sync all your pictures and once you take one they are saved in the cloud and also accessible by any other device you have Dropbox installed on and are signed into! One amazing MUST HAVE product and App xxNo easy way to move photos into folders I uploaded all camera pics on my iPad when downloaded this app and I have found that there is no easy way to move the photos into folders so that I can only share pictures from a recent vacation.  I have iOS7.  Why is there no move function on this app or am I missing something????  I do not want to share one photo at a time.  Not impressed.Cannot live without I have been using Dropbox for years now and I have never been more happy when it comes to sharing files with myself (between all my devices) and with friends. Out of all the things I have tried, Dropbox has been the fastest program to upload any file and can be accessed immediately anywhere even through their website.Fix the app please Says cannot connect to iTunes for push over and over, unusable even after a fresh installOk Needs to be less crazyUnusable with iOS 7 Since upgrading on my iPad I haven't been able to get into my Dropbox App. The iTunes popup repeatedly comes back up no matter how many times you press "Ok". 

This also means it is impossible to link any newly installed apps to Dropbox as well.

I found a workaround as the only way to to get out of the app once it's stuck in this loop is to press the iPad sleep button, then swipe the camera as if to take a photo, and then press the home button. This takes you back to the home screen. Unfortunate this has to be done to begin with, PLEASE FIX!Amazing app. Needs iOS layout though It does a great job at transferring files from my computer to iphone. No need to use flash drive or sync with iTunes. Needs iOS 7 layout thoughGreat program but not now! This app in unusable since the os7 update.Dropbox is the best cloud service ever.Where is background upload in iOS7? Ever since iOS7, my dropbox doesn't upload pictures in the background. I've turned on the Location service but everytime when the phone enters sleep mode it doesn't upload even connected to a charger overnight.Not iOS 7 compatible Use to be a 5-star app but doesn't work with iOS 7. Please fix.No iOS 7 support? Can't upload from photos on iOS 7 iPhone 4S??? Making the program useless.Fantastic app Always my favorite app. But, background uploading doesn't work very well. It always stops when I click the home button. Resumes when I go back in the app.Nothing loads No content in drop box will load on mobile just says there is an errorCan't sort my file type. Both views given are not at all useful when using nested folders.There When I Need It I particularly love the favorites feature.

It needs an iOS 7 update though. All the old UI is still there. It just feels out of place now.This New App for Me I just downloaded this App stupidly WITHOUT READING the Reviews FIRST!!  I should have but thank God I did before I upgraded my phone to the new IOS7!  Now I will delete it &amp; look for your Updates &amp; Fixes &amp; Maybe Try Again when you fix it, soon I hope!!  ThanksWhere's the full iOS 7 update? Update this app for iOS 7 please.Dropbox PDF problem Updated to current version and just get a gray screen when trying to view a PDF. This happened a while back and it was fixed. Last upgrade brought the problems back.Great App This app is great! The only thing I would say is there should be a way to edit and crop photos.iOS 7 destroyed it Since the iOS 7 update the app is useless.  I have been using the app for sharing files while I travel but it know longer works. 
Is there going to be a fix or do I just start deleting it off all my devices?  On the iPad it just crashes.Update 7.0 Since the new update Dropbox freezes and blanks when viewing files, never did it before with the old os.
Really annoying to what was a good product.
Hope the powers that are responsible read this and provide a much needed fix.Since latest update... Dropbox will not even open DB was working yesterday before the 7.02 update but now it will not even open up.
I have important work files I need to use on the iPad and now the app won't even open.Problems with the task bar I like the app, but when I try to type on word with it the Dropbox task bar won't go off the screen. I have also looked at some of my classmates iPads and they are having the same problem.This update is messed up I cannot delete photos on my camera uploads. It always said delete failed and then it stops workingWord doc files won't open with latest iPhone app update While Word doc files open fine in Dropbox on my PC and on my iPad (I haven't upgraded my iPad Dropbox app in a while and haven't upgraded my iPad to iOS 7), these files no longer open on my iPhone after upgrading to iOS 7 and updating my iPhone dropbox app. Since the files I most often open on my phone app are doc files, this greatly handicaps the usefulness of Dropbox. Very sad!Drop it in my box Easiest and best app to store files and share memories!I Love Dropbox! Great app. Works perfect between my phone and PCNeeds fixing Love the service but annotations on PDFs have disappeared from Dropbox since iOS 7 update. Need these back please.No iOS 7 Where's the iOS 7 support dropbox?!Nice app Just wish you could switch to other accounts easier. I have Dropbox for work projects and for family photos and wish I didn't have to log out and log in to go back and forth.I love it but Everything is like you have to buy to fully enjoyCool I like having my photos in one place.Amazing App I can't live without my Dropbox!Glitches My drop box keeps glitching and won't let me view my photos from the app! Its frustrating. Overall it's a good app but since I've updated my phone it's been messing up.Open in for music files? Why did you remove open in option for music files?
I used to be able to do this with my sound files Why??Fix this ! What the hell is WRONG !!! 
Why do I need to download my files every time I open the app !!
When I open my files it says "unable to view no internet connection" 
Though I already downloaded it !! 
Fix this pleaseHidden charges Has a lot of hidden charges. For each step you wish to do with you document the payment of an extra charge is requested.Best app Best app FTWCannot Read File Names. I love our Dropbox functionality and speed. BUT the iPad app is broken. I am not finding a way to read the longer, truncated file names in the left column. I can only hide it, not adjust it.  This is no biggie for people with short names but our company has some longer descriptives in the names. Please fix so we can resize the column boundaries, as with many other apps.select all??? until this app has an option to select all, my review shall remain.iphone user very important appCan't view files Can't see my files. Guessing it'd bc this doesn't support ios 7. Please update!!!Useful... I guess Ultimately, this isn't some excellent app like many of the reviews claim. It's nice to be able to access pictures and documents stored on DropBox but unless you frequently edit documents on your iPhone (which I do) it's probably only worth getting on an iPad or to share photos you don't want plugging up your physical storage.eh Please add the image viewer back to dropbox. It's impossible to scan through image thumbnails the size of an ant.Updated After I updated the app it keeps crashing. Please fix iterror I can no longer link my account to my atomic web browser, don't know if it's cause of the iOS 7 update, if so then please update the app to work with itGreat Companion Great companion to the service.BEST app I have gotten on my ipad. All my pictures and files from my ipad are now saved on to Dropbox and I don't have to worry that I'll ever lose them. This app is a must.Runs like molasses on iOS 7 Poor speed, frequent crashes, buggy clipboard. Takes forever to launch. Out to lunch.Useful app Useful appDropbox is Essential, but Listen Please Dropbox is by far, essential for my iPad. I need a place to store my high-resolution photos other than my iPad because the photos take up so much space. Luckily, I have Dropbox. I am able to store the photos there and I could use it whenever it comes convenient. HOWEVER! Since updating to iOS 7, I can no longer download files onto my iPad from Dropbox. Please fix this!It does not open PDFs I love this app but it's getting annoying when I'm trying to open PDFs and it keeps crashing...Manager Completely unuseable on latest iPad with retina display; Keep getting "Connect to iTunes" message, and wont go away. New iPad, updated software, tried re-installing......Please fix! - Works great on iPhone 5 - no problems at all.Need define option when reading a PDF. Define optionGood Very useful. I don't have iOS 7 so I don't really have any compatibility issues. Shame I can't view animated gif files though.Wished it auto uploaded This app is great but it
Would randomly stop uploading. Fix please.Auto upload doesn't work no more!! Am I the only person having this problem? Since I upgraded to iOS 7 the Dropbox stop auto uploading pictures from camera roll.  It tells me "all done for now" when clearly I just took a couple pictures. Somebody help?Worst App BEWARE OF Deleting This is the worst app I have ever downloaded. 
I wanted to use Dropbox to store space consuming videos only.  Unfortunately, Dropbox does not give you that option.  You either load every single photo and video on you iPad or nothing. So of course you use the space up quickly and never even get to the videos.  Worse, no where does it inform you that if you delete a photo from Dropbox, it automatically deletes it from ALL YOUR DEVICES.  That is utterly irresponsible on the maker's part.

All I want to do is get rid of this thing and of course there is no explanation on how without losing everything.  Beware of this app, what it does it not clearly defined and you can end up losing everything if you aren't careful....yes, I will tell my friends.Really? Can't upload with location services disabled. Really? Come on! That's the stupidest thing I've ever seen. Let's go, Dropbox... Get your act together and drop stupid restrictions like this!Where is the app? The app showed its installed in the App Store but it doesn't show up anywhere on my device.Works to a point. I use it to upload my pictures. I only think to upload pics a few times a year to back them up. When I log in I have about 200 pics to upload. 50 or so get uploaded and then it hangs up and gets caught in this continual loop of counting up to the the pics left and goes back to zero and stops uploading. It's only been doing this since the iOS 7 update.HORRIBLE This app is absolutely terrible! It freezes and its not even worth it! My friend has lost important photos because of this app. DON'T GET IT!!!!iOS 7 issues Dropbox tends to be unresponsive. I have uploads stuck in limbo apparently.Very useful Not much to complain about. Dropbox on iPad is fantastic for using my documents where ever I am.iOS 7 update sorely needed We need an iOS 7 update. UI refresh, the works.Needs iOS 7 support September 24, 2013
None of the links work in my PDFs now. What happened????!!!

June 5, 2013
NONE of PDFs are visible. They're ALL gray. These PDFs are valid by the way. They are viewable in Safari!!!  Repair!!  

May 31, 2013
Ok, the last update clearly did nothing. Photo PDFs still aren't loading. Obviously my text PDFs are loading fine but that's because they're easier to manage. Many of my documents are just loading as gray. But in Safari they look fine. Also, double tapping should zoom in on a section of text like every other app. 

May 7, 2013
The gray document issue is now much worse. None of my PDFs working in this app. They're just gray!!  But it's not because they don't work. If I load it in Safari it loads fine. Fix!

February 3, 2013
But there's a nagging black box effect that won't stop happening.  
I have a 4 page PDF I want to view and it's 2 Mb. I know it's a little high quality but I really want to be able to zoom in and select text without it going all black. 
I would also like to be able to listen to the text-to-speech option (speak) pop up when I select text. It currently doesn't.

Please adjust zoom so when I double tap text in a PDF so it doesn't zoom in randomly but instead only zoom in to the correct zoom level so I can view my text.

Also, most of my PDFs are opening up gray. But if I open the same PDF in a browser it looks normal. Please fix. It's getting very annoying.Believe the hype So easy to use, I got my grandmother using it.iOS7 support?? Issues with opening files after ios7.... Documents open in blank..Waste of my time. You can NOT save videos straight to your phone from drop box. I wouldn't recommend getting this. It's also very confusing.Five Stars HAve had this app through the duration of having my iPhone and haven't had any problems with it yet. I love how it opens into the last document I had open, and how conveniently I can save and transfer files. Great job, guys!Dropbox did not prepare their software for iOS7! Do not use dropbox with iOS7! It crashes my ipad (iPad 3) and doesn't let me open files. The top menu bar sports a hybrid iOS6/7 look on the left and right sides too, it's very strange. I hope they update it soon. I think you can get away with using the dropbox site through safari to get through this in the meantime. I had no problems with dropbox on iOS6.Useful I use Dropbox all the time. It's great. 

Please don't disable the auto fill in email sign in tho. I need to switch frequently between work and personal accounts. Typing my full email in without my auto-fill is a massive pain. 
Thanks

UPDATE: autocomplete seems to be working now. I guess my device was being quirky. Updating to 5 stars!Issues IOS 7 None of the files will open after update of iOS 7.-__- Having to sync photos ALREADY in my dropbox makes me not want this app at all it's waaaay to time consuming if I didn't have to do this every single time I would love this app againSave videos Need to be able 2 save videos to camera roll!!So slow it's useless I can email myself files faster than this uploads and navigates. Deleted.Unreliable, stranded my data Used to use all the time but recently, especially with ios7, it keeps crashing and I can't to my data! With the other apps out there, pick one that's reliable.Issues with iOS 7 The "connect to iTunes for enabling push notifications" bug prevents one from using this app, as this notification repeatedly appears. One appearance, I'm blaming Apple; multiple appearances, it's the app developer's fault for not letting me continue!Conflicted App doesn't reflect what's on my desktop dropbox and the same goes for the desktop version....I think I shldve stuck with google drive.Needs no video option for photos I love this app and Dropbox! I just wish there was a way to not upload the videos from my phone! It will hog all your precious Dropbox space.Everything With you ;)Ok until... Dropbox was fine until I tryed to put the videos from it to my photo library it wouldnt let me! This review would be three stars if I could access my videos.great really greatGreat service Using photo download now....Camera upload edited photos iOS 7 doesn't work Dropbox always uploads the original photos, with no choice to auto-upload photos you have edited. So all the crops, filters and edits I have made with the new iOS 7 photos app are lost. Please fix this. 
Also, no option to change file names!? Please fix.You cant share subfolders of a share folder You cant create a hierachy of folders. Cant share specific information with workers like you can in google drive.Very helpful I use it to share thing with friends and business partners.Used to work great but I signed out of my account to try to sign into a second account I had set up with my schools .edu email address. Now whenever I try to sign in it crashes the app back to the home screen.Very helpful! For some of my college files I was unable to get on my ipad Dropbox lets you look at power points and other files. Thank you sooo much! :)Apple update killed this app Apple update killed this app on the iPad. Get pop up to sign into ITunes. All ready signed in.  Use this app for work to have access to client info during audits. Will be carrying my laptop AND IPad to get my job done this week until I can figure out a new app to switch to if not fixed ASAP. Unhappy tonight, flying out to job sit in less than 12 hours.Do not like the update Now that I updated my drop box I am very upset 
Because I do not have an option to choose pictures to move to a folder 
Fix this problem and I will rate a 5 
Also I would like to export a whole folder to my gallery on my ipadHtml viewing not working I generally love Dropbox, but since I upgraded to iOS 7 I can no longer view html files properly (I am referring to files saved on my Dropbox as .html). I used to view them displayed nicely as web pages, but now I just see the source code instead! Can you please fix that??

Also, can you please add the option to copy and move files? It would be a very useful feature!! Thanks!iOS 7 irksome Absolutely fantastic app... Until iOS 7.  It no longer displays .htm files as web pages, but as text files.  Nobody wants to see all the HTML codes in these files.

I lok forward to this hiccup being fixed.Da faq ? Every time I upload pictures it starts to say " conntect to iTunes " and it keeps poppin up after I click ok .. Fix this ??the best cloud service no doubt dropbox is the best cloud service by far.Great! I love this cloud. It's the best in my opinion.No I don't want to use wifi, I want an option at least!Needs &quot;COLOR TAGS&quot; like computer version Good overall................................, 

-Really need to add the color tags to use it the way I need to organize.     Thank YouJaw-drop(box)ing No but really good design, works very smoothly and shows many potentials of growth. Maybe it's just me, but I really loved it.YEEESSS I LOVE DROPBOX SO MUCH AHHHH!!! I WOULD DIE WITHOUT IT!!! So i wanted to get ios7, but no matter how much stuff i deleted, it still said i didnt have enough storage. Since i didnt want to delete many pics, i got dropbox and now my photos are completely secured and i can update! So happy!Good Update! It works fine for me on iOS 7, awesome!Two icons, neither is responding! two icons of Dropbox are showed up after downloading, but neither is reactive! What's the point?Great APP!! I love being able to save pictures and videos without killing my phone storage.Great but needs fixed for iOS7 I love this app, BUT it is not working with iOS7!!!!!

Please help Dropbox.PDF doesn't work PDF does not download all the words. Don't know whyBest program out there, hands down While there are many ways to remotely store files, Dropbox is the best one due to it's vast number of ways to access your files. I have it on my iPhone and laptop and use three shared folders with classmates and family. Finally, if you have a large file to send someone, you can just put it into your Dropbox and easily send that person a link to view and download your file! Even if they don't have an account! Incredible!Could be better Music takes 15 seconds to load after you have selected a song ( doesn't matter if I'm on Verizon LTE or Wifi) also, it doesn't play the next song automatically instead you have to open the app, go back and pick the next song in the folder. You can't even hit the "next" button to skip tracks.  Please fix these in the next update!

Running iOS7. Same issues on iOS 6AfterdownloadingIOS7 It took around 2 hours to download by 200 pictures and 20 videos. It is a little slow...Needs better updates You guys seriously need to have the tool to rename a file and copy a file. It is driving me insane!!!!!!! ??Still can't copy text The ability to copy text seems irreparably broken. Over 20 updates with no fixes.No iOS 7 support! So what's the point?Ray Greatwrong!! The latest update, iOS 7 readiness, has messed up the app!!  I am not able to access Dropbox because I get a message "Connect to iTunes" repeatedly.  I have had to reset my phone thrice to get it to stop WITHOUT access to the app.Same old crippled file browser I (and many other Dropbox users) have been waiting months for DB to fix the Dropbox/iPad file browser bug that only shows the first few characters in the filename. Why can't they repair this? It works great in iPhone (landscape mode) which has much less screen real estate, but not iPad. 

Now I have to just guess when transferring files with similar long filenames to my iPad. Such a simple problem, but ignored by developers (after many requests by users!)

Other than this glaring error, a great product.iOS 7 support? 4 stars cuz I love this app and Dropbox in general, one missing star for crashing after I upgraded to iOS 7. Kindly fix it :)
Thank u Dropbox for making my life easier.Demand privacy from Big Data Dropbox: with this update did you sell out our privacy? Have you went ahead with your plan to jump in bed with the government's Prism Program as was revealed during Edward Snowden leaks? Hopefully Dropbox has reconsidered this shameful betrayal and chosen in favor of user privacy.Even easier to sync stuff I use Dropbox for everything. Having this available easily on my phone made checking updates on projects from work to sharing items much easier when I'm not at a computer. Also makes it easy to get photos from phone to computer since I never seem to move them. 

Shameless plus here - works great combined with Ifttt to move post record things on calendar emails contacts via spreadsheet or special folders.Sluggish, cut &amp; paste problematic The app used to be 5+ stars. But after recent updates, the quality of this app has seriously fallen. Browsing through files &amp; folders is sluggish. And the copy &amp; paste functionality is broken. When I try to copy more than just a single word out of a text, Dropbox selects every word in the document.Runs on Linux This is how I get files to my iPhone apps. It's indispensable and the desktop app even runs on Linux!Navigation bar Why is it that the navigation bar is suddenly two different colors now that I've downloaded iOS 7? Looks almost like some sort of glitch.Copy File To Another Folder Can you please add the feature "copy file to another Dropbox folder"? Super basic and I need this all of the time. I realize I can send a download link from any file or folder. But that is not what I need. I need very specifically to copy a file in one folder and to paste it into another, not move file from one folder to another. Please ADD asap.Can't open my files! I can't open any files in my Dropbox. I try, it thinks then closes the app. This needs to be fixed!!OK OK , this app is super and good jobDropbox La mejor app!!! Esto es un ?xito. Es como tener un pendrive pero online!!!Can't make it work The directions say just drag your photo into your Dropbox file... How you supposed to do that on an iPad. Either the directions are inadequate, or this app doesn't work on IPad. Big thumbs down!Dropbox app now useless Can no longer add files directly from phone. Completely loses point for me now. Won't use it until I see an update.Just one issue The iPhone can't upload straight from Dropbox to Instagram. Droids can. Maybe fix that with the next update.Make it happen! Great app no doubt but there's one flaw you should be able to save more then one photo at a time to your camera rollAlmost more of a hassle than it's worth I have no idea why you need Location Services activated, but it's just one of the hassles of this app. The biggest hassle is that you either have to transfer ALL your pictures to your DB folder, or you can't transfer any. So if you just want to upload a movie, you can't. You have to upload everything else. I'll use it once and delete it.Stupid Your app deleted everything I uploaded. Thank you.Can't download music files I have mp3 files I've been trying to download through this and it won't let me download to my iPod. Need to add this feature.Bug Previous versions, I was able to view Adobe Illustrator files with ZERO problems. New version is buggy. Starts to load .ai, and then says "Unable to load photo" halfway thru, leaving blurred image of the file. Please fix, and I'll re-do my review.Love the program Not sure how I lived without it. Best way I know to keep all my important files in one place so I can access them from anywhere on any device!Update Now Crashes The App Can't you leave well enough alone guys &amp; gals. Recent update on my iPad 2 now causes the app the not load at all... Start it, goes back to home screen. Deleted app and reinstalled. Nothing! Please fix...Needs improvements I wish that the app would send push notifications when new files have been added just like a desktop computer would notify you. I also wish that you could invite other to folders from the app versus just sharing a link with them ...

Other than that, I love Dropbox!Zero tech support or customer service Dropbox is a great platform ? until you have a problem.  I've been a premium paying customer for over a year -- not because I needed the extra space, but because I've used it as my backup and sharing platform for a major project.  Last month I had a problem where the app was using up all available CPU on my mac.  Emailed support, and they gave me various random solutions to try which required repeatedly syncing all 5 gig of files and losing all the 'last modified' info which is essential for version control.  After 3 random "try this" tech solutions they simply stopped responding to emails, and never provided any other recourse or even answered my question whether phone support was available -- a question I asked them 5 times.

Useful for file sharing a la Yousendit but DO NOT ENTRUST DROPBOX WITH IMPORTANT FILES!!!!Beast! Finally! No stress when it comes to listening to music I downloaded from my computer! I just put it in my Dropbox folder on my computer, and I can listen to it on my phone! How cool is that!?It's good but.... I love the app don't get me wrong. I use it for storage. Put my pictures, video in there. Just that one thing I don't like. When I put all my videos in there. I loved it, but now when I want one of my videos saved back to my library on my phone, there's no button for that. So there's no way I can get my video back ): anybody else have that problem? Please fix this ):Great concept. But. One flaw is the fact that its almost impossible to load mp3s or WAV files over data. It will play for a second or two then say its unable to load this file. Fix please!Good Very good programPassword! This app is great, but I'd like the ability to toggle accounts and especially a password protect featureI loved it until... I needed some more space and my only option was to spend $99 a year. No thank you. I'll be using Shutterfly.STOP LOOKING AT REVIEWS Get it now! Pretty amazingMultiple accounts!! All it needs is multiple accounts!Bugs? At around 5pm every day all of my latest (today's) files just disappear. They are still there though. I can search for them and find them. Then tomorrow, they are magically back!

On my desktop there is no issue. Just on iOS. 

Is this a known bug?It's stupid. You can't download any videos into your phone. Like come on I don't know why yahoo would do this to me making a deal with Dropbox.Slow It is slow to open... You can improve you more thingsPush notification message disables app I do like Dropbox, but it has become completely useless on my "work" iPad.  As others have noted,  a notification pops up - and continues to pop up - as long as one cares to push the "cancel" button.  The odd thing is that these notifications show up on my"work" iPad with 16 Gb, but not on my personal iPad with 64 Gb.  Additionally, these "notifications" virtually lock up my iPad, unless I can exit by double-clicking to another app and exit out of Dropbox through that app; Otherwise, it is an iPad  reboot. I have tried every method to resolve this with settings, notification settings, privacy setting?s, connection directly to iTunes, etc., etc., etc., all to no avail.  So on my iPad, it is completely worthless.  Please fix, and I'll change my review. Until then, I advise everybody to stay away.  Microsoft Sharedrive seems to be working fine, so I guess that I'll go with that until this is resolved.Bad reviews and good reviews People seem to only right reviews when made so I'm sure there are more people then this that love drop box. It's better then any other cloud option. Beats skydive, google docs and the expensive i cloud stuff. I love it and highly recommend for all devises and all file types. Back up data to another hard drive just to be 100% safe  but it works across all my devises.Love it Simply i love it..Having a little trouble. I am unable to use this app to open Microsoft Works files on my iPhone five. I have to use WPS App to be able to read it. I wonder if this could be fixed.Push notifications I keep getting the message "connect to ITunes to get push notifications." i cannot get rid of this message. Can't connect to iTunes or use Dropbox. Even have trouble getting out of Dropbox. Please fix.Hands down one of the most useful programs ever created! I have loved and used Dropbox for a long time. I love the security of storing my most important documents online and the ability to access my content on all my devices. As far as the app goes, however, there are a few bugs that need to be worked out and some features that ought to be added. 

1. The app will often time fail to open a document and needs to be restarted before it will load. It will sometimes even freeze and crash. 

2. In order to open your files on a mobile device, you have to be connected to the internet. You can mark the files you choose as favorites and they can be viewed offline. But you have to mark every file individually, which is impractical because I have thousands of files in folders and subfolders. This wouldn't be so bad if the app let you make a FOLDER a favorite and all files it contained would automatically be saved onto the device for offline viewing. But such a simple feature is not present. There ought to be an option to have all documents saved on the device and updated via Internet connection (like the computer version). This would especially be good for people who use a mobile device as their primary device; all your content would be immediately available. 

3. If you want to reorganize your files or move documents, you have to do each one individually. Why can't I select multiple documents and move them together to another location? Once again, a simple feature to add. 

4. There is no option to rename a file or folder, which is an incredible nuisance.

Everybody ought to have this app. It is fantastic. However, there is significant room for improvement. Nonetheless I would recommend Dropbox hands down over and against any of its competitors. In terms of functionality and easy of use, there really is no competition.No Gallery Still no gallery in Camera Upload mode !Amazing I love this app so much so far and I just started using it.
Already have it linked in with my 3 iDevices.
This app is very useful if you have stuff on other devices but don't have it at the moment! 5?

???????????pls update can u add a multiple transfer photos  "drop box to phone" .,cause it hard to save or copy one by oneDropbox won't open anymore The new version I try and open it and it crashes right awayFavorites? You should be able to select folders to be selected as your favorites because it's so annoying to have to favorite every item individually, especially when you have a lot of items in a folder and you want to favorite them all.Was good... Keep getting the error "Unable to load photo due to lack of Internet." While I'm connected to the Internet. I've tried restarting the app, and the device. Also, can't submit feedback because of this.Love it...EXCEPT for one problem This app is great to save pictures and documents; however with the latest update my air printing is not working through the app. I have to open Dropbox in safari in order to print using my wifi printer.Thumbs up Thumbs up if u used this for survival craftGreat Works wonderful on all devises my family uses to share together in the family business.  Google windows 8 and iOS all compatible:) I'd never go without it now!Can't save a video I have some videos uploaded into Dropbox and I can not get them back in my camera roll.Amazing App Dropbox is amazing and perfect for storage and safety I love it! I just wish there was an option to change the name of pictures and documents through your phone.Exelente! Buenisimo para todo tipo de archivo" ????iPad app crashes I typically don't leave support as my feedback, but I can't seem to get a response. This app crashes each and every time I try to open it on my iPad 3rd gen. I use it often on my Iph5 but for some reason here it doesn't work. Please update ASAP so it works again.A must have I no longer carry an USB drive. A PC or my phone is enough since I have Dropbox.The best! Great app I use on all my devices and computers! Linked with Smart Office to adit, this is necessary or work!Word Docs don't open Great app but Word Docs just say loading forever never load to viewCrash Unable to do anything on app because it keeps having a pop up about push notifications.. Fix it please!!!! 

Was a GReAT app on my droid!!T TCrashes Upon Start Up I've been a user and fan of Dropbox for two years.  Wonderful service for MacBook Air with SSD memory.  The iPad app now continuously crashes - usually when opened or a few seconds later.  Using an iPad mini with latest operating system and 64GB memory.  I hope they patch this issue quickly.  

RCCrashes even for one file upload It was so reliable before new version came. Now I cannot use it at all. It crashes all the time. Please fix ASAP. 
ThxNeeds rename function... Fantastic app, but I can't give it a 5-star rating without a rename function...Very handy useful tool for syncing and sharing files. I use it to sync files between a desktop, laptop, iPad, iPod and iPhone. 

And for collaborating with others by using shared files and folders. 

I once had a problem on my iPad with an endless loop asking me to connect to iTunes. But that turned out to be an Apple problem which for me could only be solved by a complete erase and restore. 

Since the problem only occurred in DropBox, I initially assumed it was their problem. It was not.Still cannot change file names Still no ability to change file names - a very basic function. Hard to believe after this amount of time. Error messages when simply trying to move files. No response from dropboxGetting Worse Now when I open a spreadsheet on my phone it will mix another separate spreadsheet into it. The information is jumbled. When I look at it from my computer the spreadsheets are fine. I am looking at other cloud services.Very useful app I've used dropbox for a year now.  Haven't had any problems with the function of the app, no crashes either.  Im using the ipad.Review Helps me out with my cinematography classBad News For Users They swept into my phone took my business data, home address, personal data and did so without my permission. 

I tried to remove all data and photos and they make it almost impossible.Not universal It works on a few platforms but I love to keep changing my phones every couple of weeks and this app is not universal on all platforms. They need to release this app on more platforms like newer Windows Phone 8 like Lumia 1020 and then it will be true 5 stars. Till then, sky drive wins.Download videos! While the app is alright, I would really like the option of download videos from Dropbox to my iOS devices. It would make life much easier.Works good Yeah,works fine for me but what would be really nice is if I could mark a folder for my favorites. Could you guys make that happen? That'd be awesome.love it so much better than iCloud holds all my pictures and videos..Gifs? App should run .gifs!This is great but..... It does not show your stuff at times. I'd open it and say I click on a folder that has files in it and I wouldn't find anything. I know they are there. It's great except for this problem.Sending doc When I send Word docs nobody can open them. Not much use if that doesn't work.Love dropbox This app is great. Dropbox is always very reliable for me.Rename folders/files feature I love the app, but I'd love to have the option to rename folders and files.Awesome Dropbox is an awesome app to sync with all my devices.Sharing Love drop box , and know you can send links to emails account but what if you can send stuff to a friends drop box. Like a PDF of notes or a recipe. Just a thought.Great for backing up images This is a great app for backing up your images. 

I recent;y had an issue however. I have a 2007 iMac which has a failing hard drive and have a number of gigs worth of images. I was unable to backup my images on my iMac as the drive was damaged. I do have the images on my iPhone however and I bought a brand new 2013 iMac. If I were to sync my iPhone to my new iMac, the imac would delete all my images! 

I'm able to back them up to drop box, but I have a few thousand images and have to click on each and every picture to check it and upload. I NEED a way to be able to check on an entire folder and upload that folder and its content to Dropbox. PLEASE make this a feature!! If Dropbox allowed you to upload entire folders and also allowed you to select multiple images on their onlione site and drag/drop them info folders it would get 5 stars. Please add these features!Great but... Should be able to mark entire folders as favorites so they will save to mobile device, not just each file individually.Video download I was initially able to upload and download videos. However, I can no longer download the videos I have uploaded from my iPhone...please fix this I would like to be able to download my videos or save them to my camera roll.Ugh!  This update will NOT download! I have tried multiple times to update my Dropbox app to no avail.  What's up with that?Edit You should be able to edit Dropbox through the Dropbox application (app, website etc.) other than that I love it!exceptional syncing for third-party apps Works great for YNAB and Todo.txt Touch and many other apps!NSA puppet Download this app if you want to get spied on!I love this app but , It let me saved the photo from Dropbox app but it won't let me to save video to cameraroll, please fix. thank youFix This!! It's way too slow!! Loved this app.. Then I updated and its like a flipping sloth. Ugh!! FIX PLEASE!!Aa Aa... I recently downloaded this app and after transferring all my photos to Dropbox every single picture in my iPhone is pixelated. I do have Dropbox with my "good" pictures but it irritates me to find out that this app had such an adverse affect on my photos.Simply simple Love this app, easy to use and very convenientCool app So that means I can delete all the photos off my phone because their on Dropbox ? Instagram Brooklynsfinestsbest i always use it on my mac. hopefully it works best on iPhone.Windows Phone and Windows 8 We need Dropbox Windows 8 app, with Modern UI design, please.

Thanks.Great App, Missing Features It's A Great App, I Love It But It Would Be Even Better If They Add More Format Supports for A Lot More Kinds For Formats, The Main Format Im Talking About Are To Actually View GIF Images. It Be Great For DropBox To Support A Lot More Formats.Its just not n to u Amen! Someone mentioned a glaring omit n this program.  Only able to download one pic at a time. R u serious? Fix it!!!!! Also it take up memory already used for my photos. I tried to delete several photos after i transferred them to my photo album. I looked n Dropbox later and the pictures appeared again. Kept some track of photo's already download n not use memory to store them again and again.Great app. Beware of newest version. Always loved Dropbox. Reliable and handy. Newest version has menu problems. Can't upload. Please fix! Thanks!bad bad BAD!!!! i upload photos to drop box from my black berry q10 and i can not see the photos on my ipad !!!!! PLEAS FIX!!!!!!!Everything you've heard is true... Been using this awhile now waiting for something to go wrong or wishing something was designed better, but this is one of the very few apps that was done by a true professional. Flawless app. DEFINITELY GET THIS ONE!Used to work, now freezes all the time I was very happy with Dropbox until recently. Now it freezes up all the time and the only way I can use my iPhone is by restarting. Synch between devices works but trying to access a file renders the app (and anything else on my phone) useless. I have had to shut down my phone many times in the past month. Hopefully this is fixed soon because I used to use Dropbox app all the time and would have easily given 5 stars.Zero stars I've just been locked out of my db when I need it most. The app crashed and logged me out, and the login screen refuses to load. Awful.this version is a blunder Dropbox used to be among one of my favorite apps - fast, easy to use, and pretty. 

Now, I am no longer presented with the ability to upload photos one at a time from my ios photos albums, and must instead upload EVERY photo. I do not wish to share every photo with those I share folders with. 

 If this isn't what Dropbox intended with this update and/or I am actually at fault, they've certainly made it more difficult to accomplish the task of uploading single photos at a time. Upon this update, I have been forced to switch to a different service.How How do you save pictures on Dropbox to my computer?Problems I am having problems uploading stuff to survival craft a game. To upload it says i need to put it in dropbox but it wont let me share it with survival craft again what do i doMediaFire is Better Dropbox is ok. But MediaFires 10GB is much better than 2GB.Eh I like this app..sorta. It's a good concept I like being able to share stuff onto my phone and what not from my computer. However it's slow! Slow slow slow! It's entirely too time consuming. And I cannot stand the upload the ENTIRE camera roll feature. I would like an option to pick and choose which photos I'd like to sync and which I don't.Web version vs app This is a great app, however, to move apps into a folder I have to go online. I have to overwrite in the app to update a file and then I have to use the web version to move updates files into a folder.
I may be doing something wrong so I'm giving 4 stars for now. If you or anyone can explain that would be great. I've looked over the directions and can't find how to do it all within the app. I want to use the app for its full purpose.Eugh. At first I loved Dropbox. However, storage seems to have gone too fast. Now I am supposed to buy a monthly subscription...if also takes forever and a day to transfer the pictures to Dropbox-which I didn't mind at first because it allowed extra storage on my phone, but now that storage is "full" already, it was such a waste if time!!!!!!!!! I'm so discouraged and sad that I took the time to transfer it all. ??.gifs You should be able to watch gifs in the app. Other than that, it's great.Seemed like a good idea Thought it was an awesome idea to be able to upload my iPhone camera roll to a cloud I can access from my home computer. Been running this app "in the background" for over 4 hours and it has just barely gotten through 700 of my 1000 pictures. Does not even let me select which pictures I want to upload just forces me to do them all. SuspiciousBest App Ever Best App EverUnable To Open Files on 4S! Did someone spill coffee on your servers? Just a few days ago I was able to open any PDF in my dropbox. Now, random files do not open and I am merely presented with a grayed out screen. I know the files are on your server as I am able to email them and open link from email. Before I toss this once useful app into a landfill, please shed some light. There is no customer support link from my IPhone.It's good But I don't like the fact that it will upload any and all photos from my iPod into Dropbox. I use this to share with professors and I like the upload feature, but I don't want it downloading ALL or nothing. It would be smarter to have a Dropbox folder in photos that you can select which photos will be uploaded or not.Great app This app is great. I really like it because it freeeeeeeeee.Push notifications O sugest an puch notification in iphone  whem a file is added.WON'T UPLOAD DOCUMENTS ON iPad I know the reason I can no longer upload documents in dropbox is not my problem because my daughter tried it on her iPad and it won't work for her either!! Grrrrrr Every time I try to upload a document, I get the photo upload screen. I was successfully using this program until the last few days. Now it's worthless on my iPad!!  Did I mention my daughter is an IT specialist at a Florida University? I want access to my dropbox so I can upload files from my iPad ... PLEASE!!!Noah Got this for minecraftWon't open Well, it opened when I first installed it. Now it won't open at all. Fix itUnable to upload to my Dropbox Account from my Iphone 5 help - I see no where to contact for tech support.  I am trying to upload videos from my iphone 5 Movie Pro app to my Dropbox account.  I keep receiving error that reads "the operation couldn't be completed.  (NSURLErrorDomain) error 1005.  Is this a Dropbox issue or Movie Pro?Needs Open with Option The open with option doesn't work for encrypted documents since the has a built in document reader that can't edit files.  Please add an "open with" option to use before viewing the file so a document editor can be used to modify it and then save it right back to Dropbox.Video Its amazing. The only thing to make it better is to have the ability or export videos to your camara rollAlmost perfect I love it, making a password lock before accessing the actual app would be perfect, for the fact that most of the files are very important, but still an amazing app.Great photo storage, lacking doc editing Great photo storage. Superior to apple's photo stream. Better resolution, does videos, gives you extra space, organizes pic files by date. Little disappointed I can't edit docs from within the app such as google drive. But you can open them in other apps. Still superior photo storage to any other.It can't only be me! But this version of the app is pretty horrendous! It opens *maybe* once a week and when it does, it repeatedly re-syncs already uploaded pics....so it gets stuck around photo 1,225 (approximately), crashes and won't open. I've about had it and I'm a premium member...likely not for much longer.Number Count I love dropbox but I think it should have a number count for each album or for the whole thing.Unfortunate The service is great, but the app fails. Pressing "Upload Here" freezes the app and crashes it on the next open.The best pro ?????? ???? ?????? ??? ????? ????? ?? ??????? ??? ???? ????? ??? ?? ????Failure To Launch? App will not open...blank screen...??Few requests Hey Dropbox team! Please add the ability to rename files, as well as the ability for gifs to play. I know you can do it!!Sharing folders/files on iPhone 5 Need ability to share or add people to a folder or fileBug with manual upload There is a bug with manual uploading of photos from camera roll.Please fix I'm having issues with moving my files.Video The videos are blurry pls fix this its annoyingNeed folders too I LOVE DropBox!!  I am anxious to have the ability to remotely move documents around from one folder to another. 60% of my day is savings documents to DB!Not bad This app is not bad, a little quirky, get it!Great App- but...Can't Rename Files This App is great. The only issue is that in the IPad version I can't Rename my files. I have to Sign in in the Desktop version and rename my files.Okay I really like the app and use it a lot. However, can you make it so that you can delete multiple photos/videos at the same time? Also, I can't download videos on other devices? Can you make it so that I can?Good app but last update filled with problems The last update deleted all my saved videos!!! I have no way to recover them and they were very important to me.New version The current version doesn't show all files in dropbox. Please fix!Must Download It's good app but it'll be better if I can write captions on my picsNumber 1 but not perfect I really like this app but but for an app that is supposed to automatically sync this one has a big hole. I was using this to do some testing of an ePub file I found that syncing didn't work.

I selected the ebook and sent it to an app. So far so good. I found some errors which I fixed on my PC and reloaded the file on Dropbox. I then went back to Dropbox on my iPad and used the pull down which showed it to be my latest. I pushed the file to my test reader but it was still the old file!

My work around is to select some other file on Dropbox and then reselected the real file and pushed it again. This time it worked.

Hopefully this will get fixed.Recent update I haven't used this app in a couple of months, but something is off?the status bar covers the nav bar at the top of the screen occasionally, and I can't figure out how to upload individual images?not auto-upload everything?from camera my film roll?I thought I used to be able to.Cannot open Dropbox Dropbox will not open refuses to accept my email address. Have had the same email address for years. Please advise.goood gooooodSo goooddd Nice??????????Location services? Really? Location services to be able to upload camera. Whatever. It would be helpful if the app SHOWED UP in location services. For once do an update that improves.3rd time deleting this app Any file size past 15MB has trouble being opened in this app...even on wifi. I'm losing hope that Dropbox will finally make an efficient mobile app for their service.Amazing App (Totally Recommend This App)Great when it works This app wouldve been 5 stars if it didn't crash so often. Is this thing compatible with viewing PowerPoint slides??Crashes with bad connection Crashes if my connection is spotty, completely useless.Ok... It's not able to save small video clips ... But it's ok !!Outstanding...(-ly aweful) Getting a bit cute with the incessant updates, yes?? 

Well, let's try to get the app to work again first, shall we?

Focus on your core competency.Video takes too long to upload I am still waiting for my 3rd video to upload. Upload started about 4 pm EDT. Its now after 11pm EDT. MISTAKE using the app to up load video. I should have uploaded via website.won't work I'm trying to download minecraft pe maps but all it's says is cant view fileDisappointing I was excited when I first got this app because of the prospect of being able to quickly listen to demos that I and my band mates had uploaded as we work on a new project. That excitement quickly turned to disappointment as I found that this app does a horrible job of playing back .wav files. Even on my home wifi network I am only able to get a file to play perhaps 1 out of every 10 tries. 

I realize .wav files are huge. I've tried pausing playback to wait for the whole file to load but the app freezes and eventually I receive a message that says 'Unable to View File'. 

This has been a very frustrating app to use. The only reason I'm giving even a second star is because on occasion, when all of the stars align, or God is smiling down in me,  a file actually plays back. A taste of the way this app should work all of the time.You can upload but cant download files to your phone You can't play wave files at ease ..... What about cluster play.... 1 star till updated...

Why not have an export feature... Export to phone

You can upload but cant download files to your phone

Update from today

........................

THE EXPORT FEATURE IS GREAT...
All I have to do is put a video from my computer on the Dropbox then download it to my phone ..... Perfect five stars from me....... Thank you very much people of dropbox

.........................

The export feature only works on certain videos.... There's a video I want to download like all the ones I successfully exported.... But it says for these bigger files..." No app to use this video" something close to that... Fix this by upgrading the size someone can download.... 3 stars until upgradeDeceptive marketing This app requires you to have location services turned on to run in the background. I don't see why the app needs to know from what geographical location I am located to run in the background. It's a stinking marketing ploy.It good but videos take too long to upload into one file Dropbox is good but it takes too long to upload videosMCPE maps and mods How do I get MCPE maps and mods? Without iexplorer or any other fake website to get your moneyThe perfect app This app is perfect, next to ibook it is the most used app on my iPad(s).  The only thing I can think of to make it better would be the ability to display long file names, I use it as a repository for ebooks any many times have to download 3 or 4 books to find the correct one in a series.  Thanks for this great app!!Love it This app is running inside my blood.Features Cannot send files via email or text on third party email clientsNICE Favoriting folders is the only thing I'd like to see addedBest of the best icloud sharing I have used other sharing apps but this is the only one I am using for my business and personal. Stop reading and start using drop box now....it's the best and only one you will use. I give A+ to those who worked so hard to make our lives easier every day. May God bless you all.Unable to... Open the appSoo Good ?? This app is the best utility ! Very needed ! I would suggest you to have at least 5 GB of space .Magical updates?? WHAT ARE THE "magical updates" !!!Don't like it You appear to give up all privacy rights to all files on your iPhone if u use this app. Manual upload feature not working though I am following instructions.  Really terrible design.Not very useful Don't update, they force you to turn on location services to download your own files. Essentially useless nowNotes I wish you could save Notes from the home page to Dropbox, that would make organizing my devotionals and other thoughts easier, as well as increase the camera upload speed instead of just one at a time. Thank youNSA SPYING! guys stop using dropbox, they are spying on us and collecting all of your personal data. you better switch to KimDotcom's mega.co.nz service!!!One of the BEST ideas/ apps/ programs ever!! This is so incredibly clever- I LOVE it. It even backs your photos up in case you accidentally delete them when you're syncing your devices. Thank God- my daughters pics would have been gone forever! Awesome, awesome, awesome!Reading Update Details Dropbox's latest update details states "and other magical updates."  

I guess they've realized that no one really reads update details, but blindly and without thought, tapping the "update" button.&quot;Open In&quot; function removed How do u make us happy by removing a crucial function, the ability to use the "Open In" option that every other productivity app has?
Please bring it back. Thank youTop Top applicationUseful, reliable, and easy to use Been using dropbox on the desktop for the past 3 years. Loved the service there. Got an iPhone 4s recently and installed the Dropbox app on it. Now I have all of Dropbox's great features on the go! It's great to be able to search for a resume or an crucial school document saved on my laptop from my phone. Dropbox saved me a countless amount of times!Update ruined this for me This is/was a 5 star app until the recent update. Now I can't transfer folders? I mainly use Dropbox to share live music (legally) and can no longer transfer my folders from my desktop to Dropbox. Am I crazy or is anyone else having this issue? Back to 5 stars when resolved.Rename option I would really like to be able to rename files and folders. It would help out a lot.Better.. Much easier to share, but still missing this easiness to download files from Dropbox to the iPhone. I wish I didn't have to open each photo to save it to my camera roll.Great app Download now you can access your documents where ever you are and integration with drop box amazing!!!!!!!I believe in magic... I love your magical improvements - and they do keep me happy, so do your update blurbs. XOXO DropboxAccess to my files So helpfulAdjust Your Attitude The smart-alek comment in the changelog for 2.3.1 is very concerning and suggests one or more of your developers views your paying customers' concerns as an inconvenience. The app was slow beyond reason and customers were right to complain.Must have! If you do not own this app, your life must be so much tougher. Enough said.Love it It's great useful app that's always there when I need it. Enough said.Update 2.3.1 Wow didn't realize you we're pasafying us with you updates. Thought updates were meant to improve your product to keep it ahead of the competition.New Version has issues New version has issues with the menus.  Moved one file, it worked.  Tried to move second file, and it locks up.  I have to restart Dropbox for every file move.  Even deleted and reinstalled. Please fix!!! This is discouraging.????? ???? ?????? ???????&quot;Open In...&quot; option still missing I hoped the update would bring back the "open in" option but it didn't. Importing files into other apps is a major pain now. Why was this option removed? Please bring it back.Needs fixing This app NEEDS to be able to save photos to camera roll more than one at a time. It also needs to be able to sort by date. But otherwise, goodShared folders Need to be able to share folders.Getting there 7/7/13

Still love almost everything about Dropbox, but the default sorting in this app and lack of any sorting options still baffles me a little. For one, it's bizarre that folders aren't sorted at the top above files, but rather are merely sorted alphabetically along with files... 

3/2/12

Ha! iCloud SUCKED when I tried it with iOS5, by the way. The Dropbox service has been great. Invaluable even. I use this app to delete files which my other Dropbox-linked apps do not allow. 

6/15/11

Nice, but, still crashes on first launch with phone in landscape; launch a second time in landscape, and all is well. Better (any) sorting options would be great.

I'm curious to see what becomes of Dropbox after the launch of iCloud and iOS 5 this fall... I know I'll be letting everyone else stress test and "beta" test that for a while before making any major changes. Plus, how will iCloud interface with PC? As well as Dropbox? We'll see... 

4/22/11

Another weird bug: turn iPhone to landscape and launch app (while not "running background")--crashes on first launch. Does it crash for you?

----------------
Very basic app with minimal features at this time.

Absolutely no sorting options. At least sort files and folders separately. Sort by name and not type by default looks silly.

Also, being able to favorite a folder would be very handy.

I had a deleted folder showing up in this app although I deleted it permanently via the website, couldn't remove from the app. Relinking the app to me account solved it. 

Still loving the Dropbox service, website, desktop integration in Windows, and access from ReaddleDocs, GoodReader, Docs to Go...Add Rename Option Kindly add rename function for folders and fils. Just simply by adding extra option icon where we slide for more actions.
Keep up the great job.
CheersFix this issue please Was I the only one to ever report this problem??

Ever since I downloaded the latest update the app on my iPad continues to show a pop up alert message. I click ok and it pops right back up!  I've turned off all alerts for the app and I have been in contact with Apple Support. We reset to complete default mode, reloaded the app and still the issue. It is so annoying. Is any else experiencing this?Bad customer service, bad app, cannot open by my iPad This is the worst app I ever used on my iPad and iPhone.Works... Works decently but doesn't let me manually upload. Please fix it!Great app! Its a good app i like how it tells the date of the photo the only problem is that the videos take long to load and the quality is terrible! if they can fix that then ill give this app 5 stars :)The only cloud app that works I've tried Google Drive, Box, Skydrive, but none of them could upload a 20 minute video I took. Dropbox was the only one that accepted my file.Where's the Upload Button It's gone with the latest updateTotal Disappointment Major sync failure! You put documents at work and go home and sync again only to find none of them are there. Other times when they are actually synced you can't open them! I'm deleting it.Apart from the jarring blue - great app Wish more apps would integrate the SDKGreat stuff. I use my Dropbox all the time. Couldn't be happier with this app. Works great on my iPhone!Worked great Worked great until last update, every time try to open a file the file won't open , none of my files will open now , very frustrated !54gb of memory I can pretty much have access to all my photos and videos on the go without it taking space on my phone. Love ittt &lt;3What the @&amp;$? What about the I phone 4 updates? Ridiculous........Good design, but buggy The layout is very clean but it fails to load editing settings or feedback components. It has potential, but is still buggy.All files lost I opened up my Dropbox app only to find all of my files were deleted. I've been reading the reviews and this seems to be a common issue. Maybe you should fix your app, or even better, get rid of it.Can't log in I just got the app. I tried to log in on my iPad but it would not let me. I tried my email and my username. I tried different variations of my password. Nothing worked. So I reset my password, being careful to check spelling, etc. then I logged onto the desktop site (still on iPad) and it worked. I went back to the app but it would not work. I've used this app multiple times in the past, so I'm frustrated that it's just now not working.Dropbox is a great service and the app is fantastic Dropbox is the best cloud storage option available. This app makes it brain-dead simple to have access to all of your important files wherever you are.Do NOT like this app I downloaded this because another application wanted me to download it.  I downloaded it and when I gave it permission to access my photos, it wanted to upload them ALL without my permission.  I want to choose which photos are to be uploaded.  
I also created a folder, put a bunch of photos in it, and they were there at first, but after a few minutes the folder was empty.  I also wanted to upload a few photos from my iPhone to an iPad app that was supposed to be synced to Dropbox.  I could not figure out how to do it.  And the instructions included in the app on how to use Dropbox were written for a standard computer, NOT on iOS device.  I had the app for all of 30 minutes before I deleted it from both of my devices.  I am thankful it was a few app.  I would not have purchased it anyway.  Don't bother.Fatal Flaw I have been using this app for four months, but I uninstalled it today because I was furious with the amount of data this app used when I wasn't loosing. This app was basically everything I wanted. I would have given it four stars any time before today. But yesterday I decided to upload about 70 pictures via wifi at home. During the first month that I used this app I used automatic camera upload, but because of the enormous space and time that my insignificant photos took up on my Dropbox account when I used camera upload in March, I decided to just manually upload selected photos and videos instead starting around April. So yesterday I decided to upload these pictures but only about 35 of them uploaded before the uploads in the background stopped, which was normal and expected. But this morning, while using my phone on a bus ride, I decided to look at a file on my dropbox and all of a sudden the uploads began again while I was on cellular data. There was no way to stop them, and after failed attempts to stop the uploads but before I deleted the app the uploads had racked up 96 MB of data in just 10 minutes. I was appalled, upset, and disappointed that this much data was wasted, and although I am one week into my family's 2GB data plan and far within the budget, there are times at the beginning of a month where the data usage can be up to 1.9GB, and this harmless accident could cost the family money. I installed Google Drive on my iPhone this April, but for the past few months I have been using Dropbox primarily. But I can tell you that I will be using Google Drive primarily, but not exclusively, both on my computer and on my phone until this problem is fixed. Being able to cancel file downloads and uploads is CRUCIAL to all applications that exchange data in mass, and Dropbox should be expected to be able to cancel uploads. And I checked? uploads can be cancelled with the Google Drive app.Can not open PDF The file opens fine on the desktop but I get error message when I try to open the same PDF on iPad! Unreliable is not reliable. Why should I keep using Dropbox when it can't even open a PDF? Not happy at all.Dropbox not loading Since the latest update , Dropbox is not loading on my iPad.Keeps trying to install It keeps trying to install but never completes and I can't seem to delete itGigs need to work. Fix gifs and you get 5 starts.Just one thing. I wish it would stop telling me if I connect it to iTunes, I can get push notifications blah blah. It's annoying, I'm hoping maybe an update will fix the pop up.Crashes/hangs This is easily a 5 star app that crashes/hangs in the latest revision. It's the new blue screen of death!Awesome Dropbox works great. I can access files anywhere. Highly recommend.Easy to use Simple, just what I needed to make transferring certain photos from phone to computer and vice versa simple. Thanks!Star I love this app!!Works Great - I use it Constantly I have been using Dropbox for about a year and it has been great and getting better with updates.  It is one of those apps / programs that I use on a daily basis, works flawlessly, and I never have to give it any thought and they don't bug you for a review.  Because it works so well, I suspect that many don't think to review  Dropbox - I didn't.  Anyhow - Great App!??????? ????? ???? ?? ??????? ?? ????? ??? ???? ????? ???? ???? ????? ????       ????? ????? ??????? ????     ??????????Zip file please I like this app i just reallyy wish it could support zip files as well if that was changed i would so give it a 5star rating :)Very pleased! Dropbox is fantastic! I always struggle to transfer pictures from my iPhone to computer and have lost pictures in the process. This is easy to use on all my devices! It's a lifesaver!Great app! I love my Dropbox app, and it's a great thing that I can just Facebook message or email a document right from the app. One helpful improvement I'd like to see is the ability to rename a document or folder. Other than that, job well done!Brilliant! I've tried Google Drive. Complete trash. It won't upload, if I'm my screen isn't on, and if I'm not on the app. Dropbox, however, uploads faster, and even when my screen is off. I can upload hundreds of photos, and set my phone down and walk away while it uploads. I can also save music from my music downloading app, into a file, and retrieve it whenever I want them again. Bravo, Dropbox. You've 1up'd Google.Great! This app is great! Must buy!Love the app Only one issue, I cannot access my mp3, aiff, and WAV files. The issue started today, but I hope goes away. I use this for work and having access to my files is extremely important.Issue I am unable to open my Dropbox! Error stating must connect to iTunes for push alerts. I've have my account for 2 years and never had this issue. Please fix!!FINALLY added a long missing feature! For over 2 years now this has been the title of my review,"Needs a way to email a link to a folder, not just a single file!!!" I can't imagine what on earth took soooooooooo long to add that simple feature, but they finally did. Now the app is totally just as useful as the desktop version. Works great now!downloads videos Not bad, but really gorgeous continued to update ??Just what I needed I wanted to remove pictures from my phone to my pc and this works perfectly but it is somewhat slow and probably uses a lot of battery. Otherwise it's perfect!A Life Saver! This app is wonderful and makes doing things like typing up assignments sooo much easier because you can revise, edit, and print wherever you are whether its home or school!When it works it works When this app works, it works great. When it doesn't, it doesn't!

I've had this app crash several times before I even get passed the login screen. 

When it works, I'm able to easily reference all information that I need on it and the search function filters through all subfolders easily.Excel problem Won't let me view my excel spread sheets from my iPhone. Please fix it other than that love the app.T Can you install things to an app? Like MC Pocket Edition?Very good app !! Only thing is , you guys should definitely make it an option were you can choose to upload only pictures or only videos to your Dropbox . Because I have some very long videos on my iPod that take hours to upload that i would much rather just move manuallyUse everyday I love the Dropbox app. I use it everyday. The one thing I would like to see is the ability to save multiple items/pictures to camera roll. Thanks ??Extremely well designed and complete but... Why are we forced to use the cloud? Would be good and logical to have the option to jolt stuff and reminders without having to go through Dropbox or iCloudNo &quot;Open In...&quot; There's really no "open in..." option? I find this surprising especially in a service as popular as Dropbox. Other than that the app is great though so I give it five stars.The Best Still always the best!!! Still the number 1 to me and never change Dropbox.Love it! That's all there is to it. It's great.Love it Would love to be able to save any video to camera roll.Good app Helps to transfer files from me iphone to pc easilyCan't open PDF files I haven't been able to open any PDF files since the last update. Keep getting an error message. This feature used to work just fine. No longer.Latest version sync failure Since updating Photos no longer automatically sync when connected to the PC. Syncing only begins if I launch dropbox on the iPhone.

Please fix this.Cool app NiceAfter update to 6.1.3 I can't install it. The installing process is stopping after a few seconds. I had it on the 6.1 and was working good. What is the problem ?Excelent app but I wish it had basic photo editing features like cropping since any image cropped by iPhone, will upload w/o the cropping.Awesome new &amp; rename Loving the new update!!  Best yet!!  Just really wish I could rename an existing folder without altering the contents.  Keep up the good work!!Update not as good You used to b able to delete multiple pics at a time which is important because you can't pic and choose which pics get downloaded onto Dropbox. Now you have to delete one at a time. Very inconvenient.So cool This is a useful toolWhere is the upload button The latest update made this app less useful, there is no upload button anymore, I don't wanna auto upload my photos I wNt to choose and upload files.Too expensive The app is amazing but the in app purchase is too expensive :(Needs improvements The App is good but needs a few improvements.

1.  Allow users to rename files.

2.  Allow users to select multiple files to save to camera roll?? Interface Design flaws ?? It should've had way to disable the photo tab, (Tab #2) So it wouldn't be showing EVERY PHOTO You have in Dropbox. It show every photo, Regardless of what folder it's inGood Good(???) I like the magical performance improvements. They keep me happy.Edit Wish I could rename files.Yea, we will soo not use it to store porn Yea we willGood storage app with Very Invasive Privacy policies This is a well-coded app with smooth operations and large storage capacity. But why the hel should I must turn on location service for downloading a photo from my uploads? Why it insists on suggesting me to upload every picture I took with the camera?Good With cant you edit a documentations, but still GOODish.App does work I install Dropbox yesterday. When I start the App the  dialog box ' app wants your location' appears in an endless loopFolder issue Can't generate new folder since update . iPad . But like it all in all.
Please fix.Great but lack of editing A great app. Please include editing support for ipad.Dropbox lost all my files and customer service won't respond Dropbox worked great for about a year. Then all of the sudden all of my files went missing. The subfolders remained but every file disappeared. I attempted to contact Dropbox customer service twice and received no response at all. Deleting Dropbox and relying on Google Drive for now on.Please add COPY RENAME to folders and files. You guys have already put MOVE SHARE DEL, why you guys do not allow us to COPY RENAME????????????????Great! Great app, I can only recommend it!We Need UNCOMPRESSED PHOTO Uploads! Please add the ability to upload UNCOMPRESSED PHOTOS! I use the Camera Upload feature on iOS so that I don't need to take up space on my iDevice with photos and videos.

After the photos are uploaded, I use Dropbox as my photo browser.

I would love to see the ORIGINAL, FULL RESOLUTION photos as they were in the iOS Photos app before upload, but what Dropbox shows me are the compressed versions of those photos! Saving the photo to Camera Roll decompresses it, but I should not have to do that just to view the uncompressed photo!

  - I understand some people have limited Dropbox storage and want or need their uploaded photos to be compressed. My suggestion is this: 

***Put a simple On/Off toggle for photo compression in the Dropbox app so we can decide for ourselves!!!***Dropbox Rocks! I have never written a review about any app thus far. Just yesterday, I was thinking about how incredibly useful Dropbox is. I had decided to write a review and give Dropbox 4 stars. However with the implementation of the ability to share links to files and folders in the most recent update, Dropbox has my 5 stars!!!Cannot rename a folder or create a folder bug? The app is good but i found 2 problems that i would like to see them fixed. When i try to create folder i cannot write anything...fix this and make an option to rename files or folders. Thanks.Excellent Excellent app. and fully functional.Sharing! About time!! I always hating going into chrome or safari and sharing links. Great app. Definitely one of the best services out there.Don't do the update I just performed the app update and all my pictures are gone.  Everything is gone.Best app for college students Dropbox is so helpful when running iOS devices and a non Mac laptop! Synch my notes, photos and documents easilyVery good app??????but!! Need to add select all button ... When it comes to pic and you have to select need that button!!Frozen My update is frozen in my iPhone 5 if I uninstall and them reinstall  it will I lost all my picsUses all my data Would be a great app except.... When I open it while on Verizon LTE network it instantly uses all of my 1gb monthly data plan. So basically useless unless I'm on wifi. Please fix and you get 5 starsLack of copy/paste Cool and useful app, only thing I've cant seem to find is the copy/paste function, rather than just moving the file to a new location. Anybody know if it is available yet?My Junk Now, no one can see my JUNK!!!
So, HA HA TE HE HE TE HE!!!Finally, folder links! The thing I most needed has happened. It took a little too long, but I love the way it works. Still less options than the desktop version, but it's getting there. Love that the team is integrating what users need in smart ways, instead of slamming in updates that have to be reconceived two updates later. Thanks, guys and gals!Help! I don't really know how to created the file like a word document or something.Just one thing I need fixed to get 5 star I have added a calendar that I made on Word to my Dropbox. I keep my schedule of my days off on there. Well since I've added it to Dropbox it only show January and part of February on the phone. I have done this same process before and it work perfectly showing every month. I really wish I could get that feature back. 
Other than that issue this app is a must have. Syncing your computer and phone seamlessly. Go get this app!!iPhone CellphoneGood as always but.. Please bring back the thumbnail view for a folder with photos and not have it be under the photo tab only.Finally share links through app It's getting better and better! We can share files through the app now. This is a great update againStill won't open on I-pad I just downloaded the newest update and I can still cannot open it at all on I-pad.  My I-pod touch works fine.  What can I do?Best Update Ever Absolutely the best update from the best app on the iPhone. I love you Dropbox ??Great app Since day one, I've been a big fan of Dropbox. Being to access all my files on my Mac, IPhone, and iPad is wonderful. Yes, there are some features and functionality that aren't yet perfected, however, what it does, is done pretty well. I recommend you give it a try!Music I think this app is awesome and this whole program altogether! But I mostly use Dropbox for music and it gets kind of annoying that the music doesn't go in a playlist like in the music app. Can you change that?Renaming Add the ability to change the file/folder names on the device being used!

Renaming is an important feature!!!Better on computers than mobile The app does work well for transferring photos and movies back to your computer when a direct connect isn't available but it really could use a way to cancel a big file transfer on those occasions where you don't need to do one after all.Great update Finally we can share links to folders!Finally, you can move files Fully functional now. The app does everything I need it to do.Not Full Access Yet Can't rename or edit filesPerfect Syncs perfectly between my computer and iPhone. 

And wow!!! Just yesterday I was saying it needed a feature to share links from the app itself!!!! Now it's completeGreat ! But one thing ! Love this app for all intensive purposes, I'm a DJ who records his live mixes and listens for efficiency later and I can just Dropbox from the venue and listen on the ride home. One thing I'd love is a more efficient music player that would play continuously and load faster and use playlists. That's be a 5 Star App.Ok Very very nice idea but its too slow (it took from me more than 10 minutes to upload a 7 seconds video) and i hope it get better with the new updates. Plus it stop uploading when the battery U20UPDATE, PLS! I just upgraded my storage and cannot access most of the pictures I've uploaded.  Tried multiple times on my iPad, PC and iPhone. Used to work fine!
Dropbox please get it together and don't charge people for upgrades on an app  that doesn't work properly.  Will have to find an alternative in the meantime (not happy!)Cant send file by email I love this app is super useful. I would love it even more if you could send documents by email and not by generating a link. sending the email with an attachment. 
Love it :)Duplicating Pictures On my iPad, to use an app on a picture, I have to download it to my Photo Library so that app can "find" it.  When I download it from Dropbox my Camera Roll It then duplicates it because it thinks it is a new picture. Duplicate pictures mean less space. I take a lot of pictures on my camera that I place into Dropbox. I download a lot to my Camera Roll.  This is an issue.LIFE SAVING my old iPod was stolen and broken but luckily all of my old pictures were on Dropbox! thanks so much!!Crashes Cannot open current version (06/23) without crash on splash screen.
Frustrating.Can't use I have not been able to use. Please fix.Bad update This was a great app until the last update. Instead of displaying the  documents it just turns to a grey screen. Terrible update. The app is now useless..Declining reliable It used to be awesome! Something changed with the updates. It has become a pain. Disappointed. With updates, it's supposed to be better not worse.Use Frequently For Travel and Sharing Not sure what all the complaints are about - has always worked great for me when I travel (sharing between office, phone, iPad etc) as well as sharing files with work colleagues and contractors?.Stucked Does not download nor cancel  - stays there, trying to, and fail fail failDeleting Iphone App hasn't worked in a long while. Pics get stuck in waiting to upload mode. What's the point of even having this on my phone? There isn't one. So I'm deleting. I used to love Dropbox. It's over. It's not me. It's you. You're the one with the issues.Bad Very slow uploading, and poor background uploading :( does it really need 3h to upload several megabyte video over 10 Mbit internet ?Won't upload photos Latest update doesn't upload photos or videos. Something was broken in the latest update. Just hangs and kills my battery trying to upload. Must fix!!!Just deleted it I attempted to open a .pdf and a grey screen appeared and Dropbox froze up. Could not get rid of the grey screen. So, I removed the app from my phone.Send to Dropbox option no longer available in Apps. What happened?  I used  to rely on Dropbox to transfer files from my iPad to my computer. The camera upload still works but that's about it. They need to fix this App!!!!!Needs a playlist option I use dropbox to listen to my mp3 files too, so it would be great if there is a playlist option with repeat/shuffle when playing mp3 files in the favoritesPlease fix camera uploads Five star app up to last update. Automatic phone to Camera Uploads no longer works. Upload bar moves and picture upload count doesn't change. Keeps running trying to upload with no success.  Wears down battery quickly.   Please fix!Black Screen Useless app. It's just a black screen.Can't download I can't even download it ! I click on install and nothing happens.Works for me Great companion to the desktop version. Nice for viewing, but not so great for making updates.Needs a clear cache setting Good app but REALLY REALLY needs a clear cache button because it hoards space on the iPhone when you browse trough your pictures/files. Take a look at pintrest's and flipboard as just two examples, they give you an option to delete the cache! Thanks!Inconvenient now It works well for very small files. Takes forever to load medium sized to large files. A simple pdf can't even load! Inconvenient. You have to fix this.Could be better I cannot find the share button... It should be obvious but I can't find it. What's the point of this app if I can't share anything.May 30th Update It's been 3 weeks and this update has never completed, what's up with that? Any intentions of getting rid of this update screen that does nothing?Inconvenience This app is great and I use it every day to read documents with, but it's inconvenient and a bit annoying how the app restarts my document from the beginning, instead of leaving it where it was at last time I opened it. Thus, every time I try to read a long word document, I'll lose my spot. (Doesn't happen with PDFs).Large PDF Files are broken I've done some testing with various pdf file sizes and somewhere between 9 mbytes and 10 mbytes, dropbox will not open them.  I get a message that says "unable to view file, there was an error".

I use this for magazine subscriptions with files generally between 12 and 25 mbytes.  I can no longer use this to upload my magazine  files to my iPAD.  

I was using this for two years and it worked great until this update.  Now it's practically worthless to me.Slow and buggy Please fix the crashes , bugs and if its possible ,make the App fasterDropbox Code The app works fine for the most part. The only error that I have found, after generating a link, closing the app then reopening; I'm not able to enter the passcode. The keypad doesn't work. (it's only for Dropbox app) I've had to restart my phone. Please advice.This version has serious issues When I launch the app, all I have is a black screen with a gray bar underneath. This update rendered the app useless. I am using an iPhone 5 with iOS 6.1.4.Disaster Quits immediately I see the main screen! A bug definitely. I use iPad 4, 32gb wifi+4g, latest iOS. I'm on the fast WiFi right now.?? ??????????????Their SMS verification does not work! Cannot access my data I'm having a paid account with them. I cannot get access to my dropbox account since their automatic SMS do not go through. I contacted their support on June 12 and they still haven't resolved my issue, even though they confirmed my identity by sending me manual SMS.  Their customer service is a disaster. I cannot get access to my account!Can't open files Since the last update, Dropbox says I have no installed apps to open PDF files when I actually do. I am unable to open them in Adobe Reader or ifile.Can't save movies to camera roll... For some odd reason the app can't save videos to the iPhone/iPad's Camera Roll, which basically kills the whole point of having the app.What happened? All I get is a blank black screen. Used to be a pretty good app.This app is a great academic tool It is helpful for when I'm at school. We use it a lot to share schoolwork. Great app.Essential App Love this app. Great for clearing up space on my phone. The automatic sync with my camera roll is great too.Built up cache - takes up space To clear cache, you have to unlink your account and re-link it. Wouldn't it make more sense to make a "clear cache" button?!

Also, there seems to be a bug now where entering my PIN kinda freezes up the app. Weird?

Fix please! =)Updated app can't view PDFs "Awesome" update with new can't-view-PDFs feature!Great App Prior to Update I updated about 3 weeks ago and ever since the app just stays on the Dropbox home page. Naturally this renders this app useless now....hope this gets fixed soon.It's ok Dropbox could be better with faster uploading and downloading speeds also you should add the options to sync multiple photos from your phone to your camera roll instead of just one at a time!!!Crashes too often to be worthwhile It's and effective link between devices but it crashes every other time you open it. Frustrating to say the least.Great with potential to improve! Great app, but I would love to have a thumbnail grid view option for  photo albums, as well as the ability to select multiple photos/files for sharing and attaching to other apps.

Thank you! :)It's doing fine This app has been go so far for me. On my iPod touch 4 generation I has done so much in so little of time. Little than 30 seconds it had my account created and pictures uploading on there! Although I am looking in to this, I trust this will keep mine and your apple devices' apps, music, photos/ videos and so on safe with all your personal files. :)New Download I needed space on my iPhone, so I downloaded this app in order to store my pictures and delete them off of my phone. So far -- so good!Needs another bug fix After the last update, I can't view my PDF files.1 day, it's ok No crashes so far, not affecting my phone or ipad functionality. But I have noticed that you can't share folders, only a single file, which is pretty ridiculous because then I could just email that single file to someone, but when you have a whole bunch of pictures that you want to send, you can't send the whole folder of pictures.  I had to upload all the pictures to a named folder, then I had to use the Internet browser to login to Dropbox and then send the link to the folder from there.

That so far is my only complaint, but its a big issue for me.Recent update fail app used to work wonderful except recent update.. unable to open most of our PDF files .. DROPBOX help!!! need fix ASAP!!Found a bug! Hi, I found a crazy bug on this app. IT WON'T STOP TELLING ME TO OPEN ITUNES!!!The worst All I want to do is open a zip file a friend sent me in an e mail and it won't there for this app is worthlessDisappointing Can't use app; message comes up about push notifications and will not go away.Lacks essential features Can't edit rename a file, can't share folder with friends, crashes, limited features makes me use my google drive.Even the Update itself messed up. The most recent update would not even install. After reading about others' problems with the update, I just decided to remove the App altogether from my phone (iPhone 4), and just use it on my computer instead. That seems to work OK.Lost everything The last update deleted everything I had. I had a lot of stuff. How do we get it all back?Don't update yet Updated on iPhone 4 and got endless crashes, pass lock screen lagging, eating up all the memories, and more important, the Photos section seems to keep on loading and loading, and I have my entire iPhone library plus lots of other photos in Dropbox folder. Can I just have an option to disable this useless feature? Luckily, I still have an older version on Mac, restored.Warning: they LOSE FILES! They lost 6611 files of mine and could not recover them. This is a frequent problem. Do not even think of uploading important files. I have (had, because I canceled) the business Dropbox and their customer service is the worst I have ever seen! NOONE will help. STAY AWAY from this terrible company!Crashes This latest update did nothing to stop crashes. Completely unusable.Fix the app I love the app because it keeps all my Photos and Videos safe but my recent photos arent uploading. It just keeps trying and trying but they dont upload! I had 16 pics to upload now I have 50 pics waiting to upload. Please fix it soon!!!!Downloading? It's super easy to copy pictures to clipboard or even save them to your phone, but why can't I download my videos?Needs a &quot;move to folder&quot; feature Only downfall of this appno no woh woh woh
getting worse buddy
make a change i know you're mind opens but your app really don'tSmooth Operator I like being able to delete batches of files at a time. The app is reliable and useful. I power down the ipod touch once every week or two, so  I have never had an issue with premature closing or freezing. HuffPost and Facebook could learn a thing or two.Black Screen Me too! I've used Dropbox for years on all my devices and now it doesn't work on my iPhone 4s.Not happy at all! I'm very disappointed! Ever since I updated it to the new update none of my pictures are downloading on there! Please fix itUseless now Last updates led app useless. All I get is a black screen with a gray bar at the bottom.  uninstalled app until it's fixed.Highlighting Need to add an option to highlight words. Otherwise, perfect app for organization, storage, and accessibility.I don't understand the bad reviews! I have used the Dropbox app for a long time with no serious issues. Sure there are glitches once in awhile, but usually runs very smoothly. I have it uploading my photos, which it does consistently well and syncing docs I need. No problems here, not sure what the bad reviews are about.Don't update New update doesn't detail what's changed. Now the app doesn't work. Just a black screen with a gray bar at the bottom. Please fix soon.It's good, read what it's saying! The app is great because it's giving me an easy way to wirelessly get pictures from my phone to my computer. Some people are complaining about the automatic uploading. To fix that, uninstall the app, and reinstall it. When you reinstall it, the option comes up. What you have to do is hit cancel instead of enable.Share folders Upload from photo stream uploads everything. Need ability to select. 

Can't figure out how to move uploaded photo stream to a new folder. Had to duplicate uploaded pics from camera roll 

No way to share a folder. 

App is pretty much useless.This version... Used to work perfectly, then now I just get a blank screen. After reinstalling it still freezes often. What happenedPretty good I wish Dropbox had a loop capability for audio files and a way to send just the file to a email addressHuge fan! I have been using Dropbox for about a year now and I still am in love with it. We use it for both business and personal. I can't wait to see what they come up with next.Good UI, but lacks features Beautiful app, but NEEDS the ability share folders. For people on the go, we need to be able to email links out to people, sending tons of individual links to people is not feasible.Easy to use! I can delete files on the mobile app unlike other similar file share apps.Viewable Files - Zip Folders I uploaded a ton of zip folders with important documents from my laptop, but I can't view them from my iPhone. 
Do I need to get a file converter app or something?Amazing app This app is must have if you want to keep your power points or all that crap on your phone. ??????????Updates What is up with updates?  Multiple attempts with no progress,  just same slow nothing.YO DREW You can't share folders? How many engineers have you hired? Ugh.great its great and for all the people who don't like it cuz it does something to ur iPhone then ur iPhone it jacket  upBlack screen?! The app works fine on my iPhone but now that I converts to my mini all I see is a black screen. Please update so I can access my Dropbox on my iPad.Not very useful for media files Switching to Pogoplug for my media files, will use Dropbox only for documents.share folder? PLEASE, please make folder sharing possible. file sharing is easy to do without the app, it's folder sharing I'm interested in. plus, I can share folders if I go to the Dropbox website through a mobile web browser, so why not just put the feature in the app? thanks!!Where is it?? Like previous reviewer, all I get is a black screen with a grey bar at bottom. Need to fix this!Relentless Go to options tell it not to load on start up - it loads anyway. Go to MS config nothings there. Turn it off - it turns itself back on. Five minutes later it's on again. RelentlessPush notification When I open the app the little blue bubble pops up and says something about connecting to itunes to use push notifications and it won't go away.  I have tried reseting my ipad etc.  Nothing seems to work.  Really frustrating as this is the only app I have this issue with.  Any suggestions on how to fix?Very Good The app greatly enhances the capability of the iPad by making it truly portable.  You are able to access your materials on all of your devices &amp; share with others either for the purpose of collaboration or simply dispersing information.  Both are very useful in the world of education!What in the ???????????????? Why would Dropbox not load any of my pictures? Why does dropbox show my pictures are there but when I tap on them to open them it will not? Why does dropbox tell me that it's lost the connection when I clearly had a good connection?
In the rare Event Dropbox does open the picture why does it take so long??? Why does it take five minutes to delete something? Why does your support page in app not work? Why why why???????????Like but... I absolutely cannot believe that Dropbox does NOT support views for EPS files. Shouldn't this be obvious?Location Service Issue Love dropbox, but it looks like the last update has messed up the location service. My location icon is constantly on now and when I look in Settings -&gt; Privacy -&gt; Location, Dropbox is the only app showing it accessed this function.Hmmm A great app when you're on the go and want to see the page "Unable to view file" from anywhere via Wifi or 3G.Very Useful Love this app.  Allows me to backup all my iphone camera roll pictures/movies automatically.  And gives me the ability to share documents/photos.  I don't seem to be having any of the problems others mention.Great app! Very useful to save files. Love that I can view PDF's in mi iPod touch without having wifi. I have my information whenever I go. Great for school!Larger photos Please include the option to view thumbnail larger while viewing in the photo folder.No share button. One star until they add share button for folders.Rthrifty Update from several days ago is still trying to install. Looks like I will have to remove and reinstall app.Bob Cannot download latest update, it was working fine for a year and then the updates started. I felt I needed to give this two stars because its been four days and they haven't fixed it yet. I use this app for work and now I can't.Slow @ playing music Super slow @ streaming music. But overall, great app. No need for iTunes MatchSo disappointing This update keeps shutting my entire phone down. Have taken drop box off my apps just so that it won't freeze up my os.I've been a long time user I've had Dropbox forever now. I started out with plaintext and then magically got this one day. I was astonished at first that it connected to everything. Pc, iPod, tablet. When I found out it auto synced to plaintext I was in heaven. It has a few kinks sure, but before the cloud, this was it and I feel like since then it's lost is luster due to the competition. I've always loved this app and to this day refuse cloud because I have it.
Sort by date option is all I could really ask for.  Other wise I'm completely content with this app.Doesn't work on iPad mini I get a pop up about push notifications and if I push ok it pops back up again making it completely inoperable. I tried changing all the push notification options and it doesn't fix it!Slooooow Decent app but it's probably the slowest loading/performing app I have. Also occasionally just goes black for no reason and I have to restart. They need to quit updating every two or three days and actually take time to make a version that works properlySharing I can't share folders!  That was the only reason I made a Dropbox in the first place.  Ugh.Takes over my phone!! Can't choose which files to NOT upload, so it just uploads everything from EVERY app (Vine videos? Really?) 
Please fix. 
Could be a winner of fixed.Love it helpful appCould be better!! I can see my pics and the app works great but I keep getting a notification to continually add push notifications to iTunes. When i press the ok button it clears and then re-pops back up again. I do not have a problem getting past this in my other apps. It's just this one. Other than this I'd give it 5 stars but otherwise I have to give at the most a 2 for now until this is solved.Ok It's ok but u guys need to make a better GUI.What a cluster New update made the app inoperable, way to go...Not satisfied...at all This app was one of my favorites over a year ago. Seems like all these recent updates just made it much worse than it was before. I can't open files in dJay when I'm running on 3G/4G like before. Matter of fact, NOTHING works right now, even on WiFi. You all need to do better. Your app is pretty much taking up space on people's phones instead of serving an intended purpose. Please get this app together...and soon. You all didn't see this during the beta testing stage?! Not a happy supporter...Playing videos and sorting docs manually No possibility for playing all videos, you need to touch play button for every video...if would be great if we could sort docs manually as needed. ThanksTrouble right off the bat! I just paid for the works for a year and cannot even get the app to work and I need it for my business. Better get fix quick!Stop!!! loading pics I did not give permission to upload pics. The settings say its off yet it continues to upload. STOP!!!Unable to Rename File Names Add this ability and I'll give the app 5 stars.Gets better and better Great appVery useful I am a fan. Easy to use. Fast transfer. What I like to see is a way to share a folder and not just a file. I would want to do this all here in the app and not go to the site anymore. If you do this, I'd go for five stars. :)neat Super easy for everyone who works with lots of docs and carry them all the time! Love the functionality that enables me to acces my files wherever and whenever I am. Great.LOVE my Clouds I love DropBox, but the biggest problem I have with the iPhone app is that you cannot rename files. Change the ability to do that and I'll change it to 5 Stars. Otherwise, very good.Dropbox Dropbox is the smart invention I love itGreat app...but I love this app but you can't open most Microsoft word filesNot that great! If you like all of your pictures, and want to keep them safe this IS NOT the place for you! I just uploaded all of my pictures to this app and then deleted them from my photos. Guess what happened? It said they all failed. EVERYTHING! 2 years of good pictures, memories and a lot of things lost! So, be careful!Very Good AwesomeAwesome Ease if use.Great app Needs an option to name files since it doesn't already.Awesome Except 1 Thing It's Amazing Except The Thing That Would Make It Beyond Amazing Is To Have Share To Instagram .Great PDF reader Best PDF reader I've used on iOS. I mean, much better than safari or iBooks. Haven't tried very many I guessGreat app, but add file editing! This app works great, as do all of the services of Dropbox! It would be great if you could add editing from the device though.  Otherwise, great app.Location Bug Newest version forces location services on, be sure to turn off in system prefs. Battery drainer.Location services stuck on. Why is Dropbox using my location, even after I have just turned the phone on and haven't even opened the app?? 

Had to disable this is privacy settings to just to resolve the battery drain. 

Seriously, the developers have gotten some weird bugs going on with this latest update and need to resolve them pronto. 

Very disappointing. :(Too much hassle (and crashes) Can't open it without a pop up window consistently.  I delete and reinstall each time I open it.  Annoying.drop box sync I have no idea how to get drop box files to sync with the iPhone or iPadDoesn't work! Can't add new folders because the app won't allow me to type anything into any available fields. Can't upload docs to photo folder (the only option pre-loaded in the folder list) because it only accesses Photo Roll.  Please fix...this is the app other apps use to transport documents for editing.Love it I love the easy access of my files from either my phone, tablet or laptop!Does not work It used to be good until I updated it yesterday I don't recommend to use this app now because it crashes a lotBuggy After awhile this app stops updating files.  You have to delete the app to start over in order to resync via wifi. Also has problems with big files (bigger than about 20 Mb).  Needs work, ain't happening.Crashes Download the upgrade and say goodbye to this app.Annoyed I love Dropbox on my Mac and I use it all the time to share files with my photography clients. However I find it very annoying I cannot email the link to my clients in the iPhone app! Makes it hard for on-the-go sharing! What's the point of the app if I cannot share my folders?!
Please change!iPhone 5 Crashes every time I open the app. It used to be good, but now is just unusable.Can't update Been trying for a few days, but the update won't install.App needs work I downloaded the Dropbox app as a way to backup my pictures so I can delete them from my phone.  It's a great concept.  The problem is this:
I open the app, the pictures start uploading.  That part's great!  But it's a slow process, so I close the app.  The app keeps uploading my photos for approx 5 minutes or so, then it stops!  So I have to keep opening the app over and over, or try to keep the app open for an hour or so (but the phone locks after a few minutes, and then the app closes.)  It just doesn't work well in a practical setting.  It's a good a good idea, it just needs some tweaking.  I'd love if the pictures would upload automatically, w/o me even having to open the app, and continue uploading whether the app is open or closed.Dropbox stuck transmitting location data I've never had an issue with Dropbox before,so I don't know what all these people are complaining about.its a great app that has truly streamlined my life with its convenience. HOWEVER,after updating it the other day to a newer version,it is CONSTANTLY transmitting location data and WILL NOT SHUT OFF.i know i can simply turn off the location services for this app under "settings",but I SHOULDN'T HAVE TO.its worked fine with them turned on for years,and i shouldn't have to change MY settings just for a faulty program.this is very annoying,and I hope someone will please fix this as soon as possible.Stale copies of PDF files hang around Ever since the update to the new PDF viewer (March 2013?) the Dropbox app shows me out-of-date copies of PDFs in my Dropbox that have been updated.  The modification times shown in the app reflect the existence of the new versions, but only the old version is displayed.  This ruins the app as a substitute for printing hard copies of drafts for editing and proof reading, which I had gotten to really like.  Dropbox support has been unhelpful.Last upgrade The last upgrade just got stuck 1/3rd through the download, so I can't eve use this anymore! Disappointed.Problems! Problems with geolocation !!!Good but won't update... Good but it's stuck trying to update and it doesn'tBad Formatting! Works great until you open a word document. The formatting on it is terrible. The tab and paragraphs are all messed up and overlapping. Hopefully this big I fixes soon. I love Dropbox other than that.problem Can't update your latest bug fixGood app Great app to store extra photosMrPo MiNi Goodfast and useful!! very conviententWhy you no support Swahili It's a good appUse it daily Really convenient way of sharing files between 3 devices i have. Sharing with friends is easy. Thank you for Russian language update.Good app Like the app for sharing your pictures or songs.No longer can play music Music player no longer works. Just about the only worthwhile feature for a mobile Dropbox.App is missing. Can't download again either Please do something. App is missing from my iPhone &amp; can't download it again either.Almost perfect Love the app, makes my files accessible no matter where I am. Only change I would like to see would be for audio/music tracks being played, to be able to have them play in a playlist. Frustrating after each song to go back and pick a new one to playThe BEST UPDATED REVIEW - EASY TO DO THIS REVIEW - STILL ... THE BEST!!! 

I love this App. I must use it 20 times per day!

I don't know how anyone who wishes to be productive as a Executive can live without it. I'm able to access everything from archived/stored documents for pinpoint accuracy to a Hi-Def Video on demand. 

Furthermore, my personal life is not put 'on hold' for a moment. Just having the ability to share captured moments with loved ones makes this invaluable. 

essential partLong file name support! Until these guys at Dropbox can figure out how to code this app so that we can see long filenames, I'll continue to award them with one star.  With all the real estate on the iPad, you'd think it would be possible.  You'd be wrong.  Apparently they can't code themselves out of a paper bag.Multi - language really cool! Well done Dropbox team! 

Thank you for supporting Chinese in the latest updating. Hope can see that in the PC (Mac &amp; Win) version as well. Thank you again!!Hey! Where is Ukrainian language? I wait two months for Ukrainian translation, but still nothing! Hey, wake up!Dropbox for ipad Good app.Voicememo How to add voice memo from the iPhone?!Serious issues with loading since update I can't access my files in dropbox on my iPad. I hasn't loaded for a month! I use dropbox for PDF files for my college classes! Fix this ASAPGreat app! I use Dropbox all the time for work to transfer files to vendors and freelancers. This app on the desktop and the phone makes it easy for me. No complaints here.What on Earth happened to &quot;OPEN IN&quot;!!!!!?????? Horrendous update!!!!! Dropbox was fine until the latest update. What  on Earth happened to the "open in" button???? Now it's impossible to open any PDFs in any other PDF reader!!!!! Fix this now!!!Improvement It defiantly does need some improvement.Great for backing up photos I don't always have time to backup my photos on my iPhone. Love how DropBox will do this automatically whenever I have a Wifi connection. Just have to remember to delete the ones I don't want to keep.Pretty bad Not a fan of the app, better ones out there...Ugh. Always thinking out in space without the upload number decreasing.  For days.  :(. Last successful upload was 3/31 and it's 4/20.Storage app Love it! Want more purchase options for less money please:)Great App, saves space on phone this is a great app but would be better is how viewing the photos/files would be. a list is harder to view because all I see are dates. people would prefer tiles or even have an option to pick what view they want like on a computerTerrible App -Majorly lacks functionality and performance. 
-Can't download or save any files from your Dropbox to your mobile device which practically makes this app useless in its functions. 
-but the issue that really makes this a terrible app is that it's connectivity is incredibly slow, it crashes all the time, and more than half the time it can't even load the content I'm trying to view on my Dropbox. Very frustrating because I am a paying customerMy only complaint (so far)… The main issue I have with this app is that there isn't a "keep me logged in" feature. Please add and I will reward you greatly (with 5 stars) ; )Safest online storage for my writing - w/ Elements it works perfect for me It seems that Dropbox is the only online storage server whose user agreement states that Dropbox employees are forbidden from looking at your content, i.e. what's inside your documents, pix, &amp;tc.
By contrast, the Google user agreement states they can look through your stuff, use it however they want - that you agree it's cool with you so long as they don't claim ownership.  Apple user agreements for online storage have always been vague legalese, so you don't know what they'll do.
For my money, that means I'll store in Dropbox &amp; nowhere else until I learn that Apple or Google respects the private sanctity of my stuff a lot more than they do now.
As far as using the app, I've a big-screen iMac, an iPhone 5 &amp; an iPad mini. I use a separate linked app, Elements, to write notes &amp; documents into Dropbox on the fly. Some time ago, there were some glitches accessing everything equally on all 3 devices, but the Dropbox &amp; Element developers seem to have cleared all that up. Lately anything I've ever written into Dropbox by way of Elements has been immediately accessible on all 3 devices, so for me it works perfectly. I guess this is kind of a review for Elements also, which I should go &amp; write a review there too.
Beyond that, I've shared photos &amp; mp3s easily many times. No complaints.Dropbox It cooltxt files no longer open Ummm, why do txt files no longer open with the latest update??  Fix it please. Paying customer.Great App Needs the ability to link folders and not just files, though. Otherwise A+Dropbox Good.Okay I've been using Dropbox for quiet a long time now. It has been very useful for me to just drop files to my Dropbox folder on my pc &amp; then have it on my phone as well.

There is a problem in reading pdf files. It keeps on crashing. I couldn't even scroll down, it just freezes there.

Hope to be fixed very soon.
Overall, you guys are doing great ??A waste! There are many ways to transfer photos between devises so I don't know what good is one more app to do that! I thought that this would be good enough to transfer acrobat reader o PDF files -NOT!!Sharing folders It would be great if you could add one more button which greatly helps sharing folders... It would be next to the delete and move key when you edit folders and it could be a share button that instead of having to click on every single file to share you can do it by folder... Otherwise I have to go to the website and that is a pain on safari.
ThanksGuys? Seriously? I keep trying to get to one of my files, but the app keeps crashing for some reason. Please fix this.

Other than that, you're doing an average job!Simply Wonderful!!! I love being able to have access anytime to my Dropbox files! If only I could edit my excel files! Still the best out there!Problem interacting with iFax I love this program but for the last two days I've been unable to send a fax using iFax. So this morning I set up an account with box and it worked just fine.Can't share/invite folders from ipad/iPhone app Come on Dropbox. You're better than that. Get on it.Dropbox Is the problem with iTunes or Dropbox? Uploaded, pressed "OPEN" and couldn't open. Icon nowhere to be found on my iPhone 4. And iTunes won't let me download again.  When I select Dropbox again, it still shows the  "OPEN" button though I'm unable to select that.Mom It won't let me sign in on my mini. On my Samsung phone no problem. Sigh.Love it but.. Need to be able to set limited as to how  much space it uses on my phone. It's using over 500MB. My phone is out of space.Crash Not working crash when open. IOS:6.1.2Always loved this app... One of the best. Hands down.Crashing after log button After I entering my ID and pass, when I do log in button, the app crashes no matter what I try.  Help...?almost useless can't share a folder
can't accept a shared folder
can't download or upload anything but photos

i just use a file management app that integrates with DropBox, such as Files Prodoes not sync for offline! why on earth does Dropbox for iPad only work if I'm online? I have thousands of PDFs in Dropbox. am I supposed to tap on each one in order to pre-download it?!?Open in Dropbox and save on your mobile device I have used Dropbox for a while but the 2 features which I live the most are Open in Dropbox and save on your mobile device. Great vision and work.

The only piece missing in this is, when we go to the folder where we want to save the file it does not show a preview of the content if the folder. This will be a good to have.Best in the class Perfect app for storing files and reading PDF and other documentsPerfect! This app is definitely a must have if you use Dropbox. It has a simple and sleek interface and allows you to do a lot of the stuff you can on the desktop version. The best thing about it is you can download images onto your device and also upload images from your device onto Dropbox. It's come in handy for me a few times now. Seriously recommend this app.Super great. Unbelievable Remarkable program with a lot of extras. Plus Dropbox is compatible with so many other sites that it should be your first choiceGreatest thing since sliced bread This is the best most helpful app I have ever used. I am newer to the iPhone. Converted from the blackberry and I was nervous I wouldn't like it, but this app alone has confirmed how great it is to have an iPhone / iPad and it even sync with my personal laptop. It makes my life so much easier. Saving documents and being able to send them to email, share and even open in iCloud and edit. Love it!!!! Get it!Bummed cant share folders It allows me to share individual photos but not entire folders!  What good is that?? I can easily text someone a single photo ... WTH ?  I want to be able to send a link to people of an entire folder with many pics in it from my mobile.  Seems useless now. 

On the other hand I do like that I can view and share excel documents. That's pretty cool. Although it does take quite a while to load it seems.Can't share folders? What madness is this?

Also we can't rename files? Come on!Last update messed things up Used to work great but since the last update it's crashing and not opening simple PDF documents.

PLEASE FIXAsk Why can't I open my folders without getting online from my IPad ?  What's a pass code ? I did not gave any codes when I installed the app in my iPad.

Thank youApp taking to much memory Does anyone else have their Dropbox app, not the site, increasing in memory even without any favorite files???. Have to erase app once every 2 weeks!!!Crashing when opening file!! It's crashing a lot! When I need to open my script for a play in involved, it would crash and go back to home screen. Really annoying! Please fix!!!!Dropbox Look forward to when you can link with Dropbox.  I love this app, it does everything I want but Dropbox.Use to Work on the iPhone! No longer works on the iPhone......like others can not get past "trying to connect to iTunes" over and over and over.
Must reboot my phone to use it!!
Fix this new BUG.Unusable now. Can't view ANY of my files anymore. Upon opening this app you're met with a continuously appearing pop-up asking for permission to receive notifications in iTunes. There isn't a split second of time between dismissing this pop-up and receiving the same one again in its place, so it isn't possible to click on anything else in this app besides the repeated pop-up.Useful I found the app very handy..should add on the features endTerrible It won't close, and there is nothing to get me back to a home page. Too bad it is supposed to be used along with some apps I would like to use but since it doesn't work I can't use the others either.Perfect! (Almost) I don't know why others are giving this app only 1 star! It's actually easy to use especially with the desktop version. I wish there are more storage, at least 5gb like the others (Sugarsync, box) and it needs an update and add more features like renaming files, etc. so I'm only giving it 4 stars, for now.Editing All I want is to edit folder and file names.
That's all I ask.Great. But still missing features It's really good, but you can't do things like save several pictures, favorite several pictures at the same time, choose to upload pictures only when it's charging, between others. Really useful, but needs simple features that for some reason are missing.Crashes Crashes very often after updating to 6.1.3. Terrible job Dropbox, fix the crash.Doesn't work well. I sync mostly music. It doesn't handle large file very well even though I pay for 100GB of storage. Lame.App fails to install, can't update either This app never installed correctly, I don't see the icon.
Nevertheless, it always show up in the App Store under Updates.
It always says Installing...
I can't update it, can't delete it, can't use it.
Only App I've ever seen that does that.

ZERO stars!

What a Joke!Love Dropbox, but 1 issue! I use Dropbox every day. This app is how I backup my notes, transfer them between all my devices, and access them to study. My issue is that all my notes are large PDFs. For some reason, when I load a file, the file seems to get stored in the app data for dropbox. And it seems like more than that gets stored in there because after a while I end up with a dropbox app taking up 1+GB of space on my iPad. This is difficult because I have a 16GB iPad and have lots of other apps on here for studying and need to conserve space. The only way I have found to clear this memory is to uninstall the app every time it balloons, which, as you can probably guess, is extremely annoying. If someone can tell me an easier way to clear this space or if Dropbox can fix this issue, this would be a five star app for me.It is a great app ! IDropbox Pretty handy app.Crashes when reading PDFs Argh. Crashes all the time. This service, and this app, would be great if the app didn't crash when reading PDFs.

Great when it works.&quot;Open in...&quot; Option deactivated What happened to "open in" option? I need to be able to view Dropbox items in other apps. Why the heck would you guys disable your most useful feature???Increases productivity Best app and service ever!love it I love love love the desktop/web application of Dropbox. The concept is ingenious. The phone app can be convenient. My only complaint (and reason why I am giving 3 stars) is because I wished you could directly upload items from your phone (versus using the desktop/web application). I also wished there was a download/save all option when downloading/saving items to your phone.Great Dropbox the service and the app work wonderfully together. Wouldn't switch to Google Drive if they paid me.Still works on iPod, freezes iPhone When I try to send a document from Dropbox to iBooks, it freezes.  Have to reboot.  Still works on my Pod but not iPhone 4.  Please fix!What to do about photos? Dropbox, we're supposed to upload our photos and video, but where will it all go? With the amount of photos and video we take, 100 or 200GB won't last more than a few years, let alone be a permanent solution. Please offer a different storage system for photos and video for power users. 

And please, add the ability to tag photos and video. There is no way to navigate Camera Uploads with any amount of speed and efficiency. We need a way to display our photos once we have stored them; right now it is a giant useless folder. An Evernote system of tags and saved searches would enable us to keep all photos/video in one place and still sort them when needed. 

Great service overall, but you come up short in photo/video storage. Take a cue from Flickr: charge a fee for unlimited media storage. I'd still pay for a separate 100GB document storage, which is what I have now.Cool Amazing. It syncs all of my files!! Must have!Great apps It is very very useful for studying. Easy to use. What a wonderful app it is!bad app.. LOST PRECIOUS MEMORIES awful app...I uploaded HUNDREDS of photos but app could not upload them all..lost hundreds of precious memories of concerts, times with friends, etc. I was SOLELY relying on this app; I had NO back up for these photos and deleted them when it said they were done. now they are gone. I can NOT access them.Dropbox What a waste of time! Can't download PDFs - screen goes BLACK and won't even open!!  No support at all. Use a File Manager. This one is a scam!Can't make an account I just downloaded the app and I've tried creating an account multiple times now and it says there is an unknown error in creating the account. I'd love to utilize this app, but I can't. Erg!Please make password protected!!! My company made is stop using Dropbox because the files aren't password protected. I now have to use Wulah, and its slow and clunky. I miss you Dropbox!! Make an option for password protection so I can start using you again.Your space can be revoked at anytime without notice They took back all my space with absolutely no explanationOutstanding Simple and intuitiveUseful app, crappy customer service Over a month and can't log into my account because of an 'expired' password that they neglected to inform me was a out to expire. I have no way to change it and they have yet to respond to the multiple emails I have sent.WAV files need wifi to play. :( I'm using this to exchange tracks for my bands new EP, so I can review what we have down so far. I like the app, and the program a whole lot, but my WAV files only load and play when I have a wifi connection. I personally don't have wifi and the house I live in chooses to keep it that way. Hopefully this is just a bug that they can fix up because if it wasn't for the files crashing, I'd give it a full 5 stars. Hopefully this review will make that difference. ;pGOod, BUT... WOW. It doesent let you upload videos it just starts to upload and then BAM it FREEZES!!!      So I can't upload any more SH/7.  PLZ FIX JUST FOR THAT IM GIVING IT 2Stars.   THE REST IS FINE.To add It would be cool if it was possible to edit the name of documents on mobile devices like Iphone or ipad.it really simplify my life very usefullGreat app Very easy to use....Push notifications... ...are needed. ThanksCrashes too often :(Auto photo upload - no please! I like it in general, but I wanted to *selectively* create certain artwork on my iPad and move it to my Mac using Dropbox. Instead, it took over the process and forced ALL the photos to copy to my Dropbox folder, causing me to run out of space and have to scramble to keep deleting the uploads. Ridiculous. There needs to be a way to *choose* which files to upload - not do all or nothing.  Guess I have to use Google Drive instead.SELECT ALL PLEASE First off I would like to say that I really love this app! It makes it super easy to upload numerous photos to dropbox. The only thing I wish it had was a way to "select all" when you are uploading albums!Dropbox is great but problems working with  new IOS update Dropbox no longer accepts files from my iPad since latest IOS update. Before this issue the app actually worked and was an easy five star.Loving dropbox I really like this app. Also I am so glad that the the developers made it voice over accessible.Some issues I love dropbox, but lately I have had trouble with the app. 
I can log in through safari fine, but when I use the app I keep getting a pop up which won't go away that says "connect to itunes to use push notifications" the weird thing is, I have all notifications for Dropbox turned off!
I can reinstall the app and then it works for a while, until I switch to a different app or go to the home screen, then I have the same problem. 
Hopefully there will be an update soon to fix this. :(Photo upload stopped working. I complained about the photo update.
My fault, my Dropbox was full.  I accidentally moved 13 video files into it on my work computer.
After rectifying the problem the app works great!Pésima aplicación. No habre ningun archivo P?sima aplicaci?n. No habre ningun archivoExtremely slow Useful but slowCan't open on iPhone 5, keep asking to connect iTune for alert &amp; notification Best cloud sharing service, but app for iPhone stop working as it will not open on iPhone 5, keep asking to connect iTune for alert &amp; notification... I have to use Dropbox service through 3rd Party Software like iExplorer to use it.  Will give 5 stars if this fix. By the way, my iOs version is 6.1.3Amazing With drop box I am able to open office documents, making my iPad more useful!!! Not to mention using Dropbox on my iPad allows my iPad to have a file management system able to share documents with any computer/smartphone/tablet with out iTunes.One of the best apps! I love this app! I use it to view my annotated PDF files!QUILTER65 Good App.2.1.3 update is stuck in a never ending update The update for 2.1.3 has been updating for a week and I cannot stop it. Once I find out how, I will delete this appNeeds some improvements... This app definitely needs some improvements, such as the ability to delete a Camera Upload picture when viewing it - currently you have to use that checkbox thing in the list view. I'd like a little trash can icon right next to the share, star, and save buttons.

Second, I don't know why you'd have Camera Upload exist when all iDevices have PhotoStream, but I'm glad you do since said PhotoStream.exe never works on my stupid old laptop. I wish that the app was able to upload pics to the Camera Upload automatically like PhotoStream would - now you have to open the app to get the uploading started, and I've found that it will time out after a while unless you reopen the app.

Thirdly, I need the ability to view GIFs! That's like a must-have for this app. I can view PowerPoints but not GIFs? Literally just do this and I'll give you all five stars.Extra Ekstra aplikacija, sda imam sve sto mi treba gde god da se nalazimVery good app but... This app is good. I like evrything except you cannot able to upload back the videos to the camera rolls to free some space. Please fix it!!!! ThanksStingy on storage Did not save my password because I "haven't used it in a while" The application Box offers 50 gigs storage for free.Can't read PDF files anymore! I love this app but I cannot view any PDF files since yesterday!Could be way better Has problems uploading when not on wifi. When you turn on "use cellular data" you can plainly see a message underneath saying "Dropbox will not use your cellular data." 

*face palm*  Are you serious?

Other users mentioned the slow uploading and lack of auto upload options. Cannot save videos to iPhone either. Ugh, come on Dropbox.  You can make a good app, we believe!iPad app ruined Since all these new updates the last few months, my Dropbox ability to see PDF files that I previously can gets increasingly worse. I cannot rely on which pdf I'm going to be able to view when I need it. I have send a customer complaint to their support team with no answers. So basically I have to go find some other company and make my online workflow all over again.Ok interface Can be betterGood app Please add the ability to rename files.App shuts down unexpectedly Every time I try to open one of my audio files the app just shuts down. I have upgraded to the new version. This app needs some fixes. I love using it otherwise, and love that ican access any file in dropbox on all my computers and easily share with others? is it for other things like not pic ?Needs improvement This apps needs the capability to resume downloads when iInternet connections are shaky. Starting large files from the beginning each time the connection is lost is frustrating. Aside from that, the app works relatively well.Black screen! I have a black screen on iPhone 5 trying to use Dropbox that I use daily. I open the app and its black, does nothing. Will re-rate when fixed.Not able to open files with new update Since I upgraded to the new version I am unable to open files in another program (like Adobe), or to e-mail the document. This is very disappoining.Incredibly easy to use I love it. So easy even a cave man can  use it. I loaded 314 documents in about five seconds. Now I can read and work on documents no matter where I am. The cloud's got nothing on this. Dropbox rocks.Cleaning Recently space on iPad has ended. So, Dropbox started to cleaning and removed all favorites docs which was stored on iPad. Then I pressed "Update all" button for 20 times and was waiting for 1 hour when all docs were downloaded to iPad.
1) Automatic cleaning should be stopped. Or at least enabled for a cache and disabled for favorites docs.
2) "Update all" button should require 1-click, not 20 to upd all.
ThanksSo much potential.... This app has the potential to be a 5 star app but it needs some tweaking. I enabled the camera upload feature, but I really only wanted to upload photos going forward, however there's no option for that. Now I'm waiting for 500 photos to upload. Very slowly. The app is insanely slow to upload and slow to open videos, and often photos. I'm using it for now but will switch if I am able to find an alternative with more auto upload options and faster speed.Good Is better to let me upload what I want instead of have it link to my phone automaticPrint Would love to be able to print right from the app instead of having to go through the browser or open it in another app. Otherwise very convenient.Great ! Great application. Wow!Only the best Better than cloud I'm totally depend on it almost in every transfer from Pc to IpadGood, but missing features I would give it 5 stars if it had an option to rename files and folders. Would also be nice if there were a thumbnail viewing option for all folders, like there is for the photos folder/tab.Declining Was great but continues to get worse. But it's not like you can find an app anymore where developers aren't wasting time ruining it. Going back to Box for no nonsense sharing.Camera upload If i want to enable background camera upload, it asks for the location. I do not use my cellular network for camera upload. So the only option is the WiFi.

Why would an app asks for location if it only uses the wifi. Just check if it is connected to a wifi access point or not?

Other than that, the app is great, fast and easy to use. But the major reason for me to use the dropbox mobile app is camera upload. So, three stars till this location thing changes.

Keep coding!Days 3gb Free after auto camera upload. Mine never shows it being addedDropbox... Simply wonderful, you are.Very useful I use it to swap files between my Macbook and my iPad.Not opening on ipad + ios6.1.2 Not opening on ipad + ios6.1.2Super helpful! I cannot say enough good things about this. It is so convenient and good for not just storage. I love the third party apps integration. The thing that really stands out to me is its pdf reader. I have quite a few pdfs that I use on a regular basis, and to have them easily accessible in a well built reader is such a relief.Better hope you never have a problem!!! No customer service. No phone. Never reply to attempts to contact. Lost all my files. They say they keep an image for 30 days but good luck getting a hold of them. Deleting.Amazing! Don't listen to the whiners. This app is nothing short of incredible.Cant even access to the account. I use ipad mini. But I cant even access to my account because the app crashes in iphone size every time i open it. Need a hotfix, URGENTAmazing !!Where is the download multiple feature?? This would easily be a 5 star app. Best idea ever.  But it loses 2 stars just because I have to download one photo at a time. This is a huge inconvenience.Doesn't work!! It was working fine with no problems and now I can't even get the app to open!! Not happy about this at all!! Please fix!!! I even deleted the app and re downloaded n it still doesn't open this is very frustrating because this a great app when it actually works!!Cool I like it but very slow to download or watch videos still cool. 5starDropbox is a great app This is a great app for transferring files to your computer or vice versa. NOTE: Bigger files will take longer to upload for obvious reasons but it pays off in the end. 5*****Mark I went into this app with the impression it would back up my pictures outside my cloud.. And I am now 25 hours later and it's still backing up..it's ridiculous and a complete waste of time, battery, and quite annoying.Best. App. Period I use this app every single day. You can sync all of your photos (automatically with camera upload), store all of your music and iTunes library, videos, documents, and simply everything you could possibly think of!!!

Dropbox has changed the way I store and access all of my files. This is a MUST HAVE app!Easily the best option. I'd love to be able to share folders and create custom links from inside the app. Currently I have to do it by logging in my account in safari.

Other than that, the app is perfect. DropBox easily exceeds other options of cloud service (except for free space offered).Good Easy to use, fast even on 3G good UI and UXBad... I like google drive better! BaddWon't The app will not let me apply downloads to minecraft pePDF view Bring back the page number as you review a PDF and ill change the review to 5 stars!  

Overall, love the app (except this minor glitch)Use it all the time Great app great for mobile teamsAbility to forward multiple documents Need to have an option to select multiple documents (and/or folders) and forward them at the same time instead of opening each one individually!!!!!!!Rescued a year worth my photos! Dropbox Camera Uploads allowed me to restore a year worth of my iPhone photos after accidentally deleting them. Both iTunes and iCloud failed to do that. Dropbox, I love you!Still great I use this app every day for school. It's reliable and super handy.Blank Documents Since the last Update many of my documents aren't opening up properly. They open but only show blank screens.Great app Pros
- fast sync relative to other 3rd-party cloud storage apps
- can create folders
- can move/re-order folders
- highly utilized in other third-party apps
- can increase storage space for free in free accounts

Cons
- can reorder items A-Z or "Newest -Oldest", but not in reverse order. 
- can't rename folders
- no multi-account feature (for those with multiple computers)
- no loop feature for vids, songs, and slide shows
- must open file to share (can't share folders) within appPlease The app in iPhone needs important issue "share via email"Nice Good application.Very useful Not sure why people are complaining. Clearly Dropbox limits its features due to the Apple developer license agreement. If they wanted more indepth file system features it would have been added. Don't blame Dropbox.Whaaa?! I downloaded Dropbox months ago, but never did anything with it. When I finally opened it a couple of weeks ago, I was shocked to see a short porno clip on my screen! Obviously NO security and no QC. Terribly.Crashes upon launch Every time. So can't use it at all.  But other than that - fantastic!Now useless Used to work. Counted on it every day. Now the iPhone app is useless. As mentioned in another review it is stuck in a loop and forces me to power down. Why can't developers leave well enough alone.Love it but... It's not letting me enter my pass code... Please fix ASAP!Problems Can't use due to pop-up about push notifications. Open iTunes and connect for notifications. HATE IT!Dropbox runs in the bg now? O.o As the title states.Stuck and now Useless I've used this in the past and loved it, but with the last update it is just stuck on "installing".  It doesn't download.  I tried deleting in the hope I could re-install, but it still comes up saying it is "installing". Would love to use it again for work purposes, but it is now useless.Used to be great!! Not so much anymore This app used to be flawless! But after recent updates I have issues uploading things. I'll select a bunch of my photos to back up and the app will crash out and only upload a few and not all. Major bummer!Completely Broken, Frustrating, &amp; Usless I love Dropbox and use it a lot. That said, the iPhone app is broken and unusable. When I open it I get into an endless push notification suggesting I connect to iTunes to enable push notifications. When you click ok it just pops back up, and it doesn't stop. The only way out of the loop is to completely power down your phone and then back up. This app doesn't work anymore. iPhone 5, all updates.Easy to use! I love the fact that its so easy to use and now my cel is working better than ever! If you're still thinking to get this app don't think anymore download it now, Thanks Dropbox!So far pointless I'm sure my opinion will change as soon as it takes my password. I cannot log in.GPS problem The app drains your battery cause it uses your gps all the time.Problems with recent update This is an excellent app that worked without issues up until the most recent update. Now I am unable to view Word and Excel files like I used to before. It just says "loading" forever. As a student this is very frustrating to me. Please fix, thank you.Great Jobs!!! This is the best application that I have ever used.Fix It There are fundamental issues with this app. It's a universal thing that folders are sorted before files! There was no reason for this dumb 2.0 update and we're still waiting for this dumb stuff to be fixed!Fix Location Service bug I noticed that location service is on all the time next to my battery indicator. Stopping the app and resetting my phone didn't help. Ended up turning it off under privacy settings. It was eating up my battery with location services stuck on. Please fix!Nice box Nice appGreat app Great app, I use it every single day.. But the SEARCH option in PDF files doesn't work with Arabic words.Awesome app Its a must have awesome app! Better than iCloud even :)Excellent service Still waiting for some display font choices.

===================

Dropbox gives me a way to do what iOS devices should be able to do natively and locally -- but if I have to use an Internet app, I can't think how any could do better than this.

My only complaint is that when I use the app to view documents they're displayed in a thin Courier-style font that's hard to read. How about a choice?Can't open files in other apps App needs some fixing. Cant open files in other apps. App not worth downloading...Don't ruin a good product I don't like that I have to turn on location services to upload pictures.  It keeps location services on, even when app it turned off manually.  Have to go to privacy and toggle on and off to upload pics!   Boo Dropbox.Getting there Longtime &amp; heavy Dropbox user. It would be nice if you could make it so you could copy files from one folder and paste them in another folder. This is particularly essential for copying files in a shared folder to your personal folder.Always awesome Always reliable. Been a subscriber/supporter for many years.Crashes When trying to load a file, the app crashes. Fix it please!Awesome service... Fully satisfied with they service!!Great Great cloud storage app.I work hard Yeah on my phone all day.Outstanding tech support I use DropBox in my IPad, IPhone, and laptop PC.  Each one is a mirror of the other.  When a customer calls I can get to my business information from anywhere.

I had an issue with syncing, and tech support was on it within 30 mins of my first email.  10 mins and three emails later, I am thrilled.

I'm assured file renaming is on the horizon as well as other upgrades.  Given a little time, your gonna see this app go from great to spectacular!Dropbox on your iPhone Dropbox is hands down the best free 'cloud computing' program out there. With the folder sync, easy linking to any folder or file, simple, clean interface and more, it just can't be beat.

This app is probably the weakest part of the program, but since everything else about the program is perfect, that's not too bad.

Big improvement would be a way to easily switch between accounts.SECURITY BREACH; EMAIL LIST COMPROMISED whenever i establish a relationship with a vendor who requires an email address from me, i give them an email address unique to just them.  i give that email address to no-one else and, in most circumstances, i will never send an email _from_ that email address.  

that is exactly what i did with dropbox.

i signed up for a dropbox account almost a year ago, on march 21, 2012.  i immediately received the standard "welcome" email.  over the course of the next nine months i received exactly three additional marketing-type emails from them.

then i started getting spam/phishing emails.  on 19-feb-2013 i received an email saying my direct deposit had been disallowed; on 26-feb-2013 i received an email indicating new security was being put in place for ACH and EFT transactions; and on both 27-feb and 28-feb-2013 i received an email asking me to join a linkedin account.  all four emails were phishing emails.

since i have never shared that email address with anyone, since i had never sent any email _from_ that address, and since the emails were all phishing emails, then one of three things has happened:

- dropbox sold, gave away, or otherwise shared my information with one or more dubious with parties.

- someone hacked dropbox's systems and stole my information.

- dropbox has one or more rogue employees who is using customer information for their own benefit.

i used dropbox's web form to contact two different departments about the security breach, and i also sent two email messages about the security breach from the email address i had given them but to date i haven't heard a single thing.  

dropbox has a legal obligation to inform all impacted customers about any security breach.  a security breach is what happened here and they are nowhere near fulfilling that obligation.Most Useful App for Students I use this app for all my classes. Having access to textbooks and slides via PDF  is key in college!Perfect When you need some way to store electronic debate information... This app is a perfect way to do soRS Would give 5 stars if it would allow user to share folders. Otherwise a great appStill no folder refresh. Pathetic. Even Google Drive can refresh folders. 

Some simple suggestions to increase usability:

1. Currently, you have to leave the folder and come back in if you wish to refresh that folder. Let me refresh my folder with a refresh button so that I can view changes to files in a more streamlined manner. If I am constantly compiling a document on my computer and using my iPad to check that it looks okay or if I am constantly editing a photo and want a high quality, true color representation, then...#REFRESH!
2. Refresh Button
3. Button that Refreshes the Current Folder's contents.
4. The air smells a bit. Why don't we REFRESH it?
5. It is stupidly simple to add a refresh button
6. Mentos: The Refresh Button Maker
7. There's space on the top left of the app header to add a refresh button.  Nothing is there at the moment. It's lonely...
8. Give me an R, Give me an E, Give me an F, Give me an R, Give me an E, Give me an S, Give me an H! What does that spell? Easily implementable refresh button with high utility even to people who don't know they need it yet! Yaaay!User Dropbox does not install on the iPhone. It has not since it first came out. Each update leaves me with the hope that it will now start working, but no joy. 

It seems like a nice app. Wish I could use it.Stop following me Your explanation as to why you need CONSTANT access to my location is completely inadequate. Stop following me.Share folders!!! Love Dropbox. And this iPhone app would be perfect if I could share folders from it. Please add this function!!!There is so many problems... This app needs a major revamp.
The main problem that I'm having is when I delete things, it'll delete what I want it too, but the delete box that pops up will just stay on the page, the little circle thing spinning, and won't go away unless I quit the app. This is why I'm giving it 2 stars. I've been having this problem for months and I am getting really annoyed that I have to keep quitting the app every time I delete something.

Fox this. Because this is only one of the many problems this app has, but its the most severe and annoying one.

Fix it and I'll rate it higher.Frozen Screen Spent many hours successfully transporting pictures. Site then froze when I needed to export. All pictures are locked and frozen. I keep trying to re- access the app site with no successLog History If you could add the log history function that will be great, so i can track which files have been updated or upload by my friends or colleaguesUploading fails According to your upload meter I upload a picture repeatedly until I either force close the app or take a new photo and then it uploads that continuously. 

Worse than that, when I try uploading a file from my phone it gets stuck behind the never ending queue. Come on Dropbox, you screwed the pooch on this. Prioritize uploads as manual uploads top priority and camera uploads as last priority. 

I'm grateful for Dropbox and what they have given us...but now if it doesn't work it doesn't matter if it was free or not.Needs more protection Much of the previous comments due justice to the benefits of this App. However, there is very little protection of your files being deleted. It would be much more beneficial to remove theThank u!!!! U guys saved ma life!!!!!  when my iPod got reset because of the passcode,  It erased all my photos which I was sad,  that's when,  before my iPod got deleted,  I had the app DROPOX!!!!! It turns out that my iPod didn't erased all my photos because Dropbox saved them!!!!!!thank u so much!!!!Great for photos This is a great app I am a big on taking pictures but I only have limited space on my phone this app really helps me free up space on my phoneBuggy In theory it's great but once a PDF is selected it can be impossible to close it.  I have resorted to tapping relentlessly on my screen so some magic will show the tools.  The PDF just sits there.  Way more effective to go through a browser.  Really?  Irritating!Used to use it a lot The recent update crashes every time when I tried to view a file on my iPad. It is no longer use able.Video Playback only 15 min or Less! What happened? We're told to "Favorite" any stored videos we want to view that are over 15 minutes, but that doesn't work. Even when favorited (by tapping the star), besides it taking forever for the videos to download, the playback is still limited to 15 minutes - regardless of the program we select for the videos to be played in. I feel as though all the videos I've uploaded to Dropbox are being held hostage. Please restore full playback!!!Love Dropbox Mobile app isn't quite as great as the web version, but still nice. Nice work!Great App for business on the go! I use this app almost every day.  It's great for taking care of business on the go.Best!!! Great app, just do not understand fact be using my location all day even with the application closedBest productivity app ever Love it, and the new update is awesome. Can't wait till I get search in all my documents and music and photos. Also, can we tag people and automatically share?One of the best things to ever happen!! Wonderful app if you're always on the go especially for college students. It's easy and you can refer friends and connect on Facebook just to get more space!!Off line favorite gone? It used to be so easy to just click the star on files to access them when internet access was unavailable.  Why did you mess up with that? I use this app daily and have recommended it to all my friends.  Bring that functionality back, and if it is buried in any other way, care enough to explain it to your loyal (barely!) users.What's going on? This must be THE most updated app in the App Store. Week after week after week: "bug fixes and performance improvements". My suspicion is they rev the app just to keep reminding you it's there.

Back off guys, or actually explain what you are improving.Location I don't?? like the fact that it keeps pulling my location,?? it should at least take a break till the next time I use the camera. Great app thoughTrouble I love dropbox because I can get to things from any device. Especially helpful when I am on vacation. The problem is it won't update on my iPhone.needs added features This app needs the ability to search the files by title or by words and phrases in the documents. Also needs the ability to select and download multiple files at one time. Otherwise the app works well.One file at a time?! It's a bit silly (and counter productive) to only be able to share one file at a time...after update something missing!! I always use dropbox with Upad, but this newest version can't open PDF files with Upad anymore. plz update as soon as possible.Solid but Add features to let me edit office files, share folders instead of just files, and view more types of files (catch up to g drive) and you'll get five stars, and I can stop using google drive.Nice ????Missing something. Can't send photos to dropbox from camera roll anymore.  That needs to be brought back. I like to save some photos to dropbox and not upload all my photos.share links why can't i share folders from the app? I use this app everyday but i don't understand why this function is not available yet.Awesome app This app and program is awesome .  My only complaint would be you can only invite and add a shared folder via a computer and not in the app. Other than that I would have had to give it 5 stars .   Please add that to the app being able to add and invite mobility would complete this !Overall good Dropbox is great, although i wish this app had a better way to listen to music! If you could actually move from one song to the next automatically, that would be great. Or be able to browse the app while listening to music on your dropboxViewer I cannot seem to be able to view .odt files, is there a way you can update the app to make it available? Other than that, this app is awesome! Saved my academic butt! Now I have all my notes with me all the time so I can study them without having to search through notebooks and textbooks to find what I need. It's amazing, I suggest that any college student should download this app. :)Update is a step backwards! ?? I've been using Dropbox for quite sometime now, I have earned a fair amount of space, and I love being able to access all my files from my iPhone, iPad, MacBook, and the Internet via anyone else's computer.

But these last 2 updates have disabled the save to camera roll feature, which I use all the time and have come across several times since the new update. Please please please add this feature back! I know I can just do a screen shot but i prefer the clean cut copy you receive, without boarders from saving images to the camera roll!Good, but could be better: filenames truncated, etc I like Dropbox and it works well for me. But it has a few things that could be easily improved. 

1) Even on an iPad in landscape mode, Dropbox only allows about 2" of the screen for the file browser, meaning many filenames get dramatically abbreviated, so that I cannot tell which file I want. This is annoying, because I generally want to find a file, then view it, not both at the same time. 

2) It is not obvious that you can store files locally by marking them with a star. I also cannot find a way to do this without opening the file first.  In my case, I want to transfer a few files on to my iPad for offline reading, and don't really want to open each file.Bookmarks and Highlights I love this app but I do wish I could highlight words in PDFs and create bookmarks. Would this be possible at some piont?Improved PDF Viewer Longtime Dropbox user. Love the app. Thank you for the new PDF viewer! It was the only shortcoming of the app for me. Now it's perfect!A must have app for college student! A must have app for college student!Works pretty well Needs a way to be able to share a link to a folder, not just individual files.Why have you not implemented the ability to view long filenames? I was shocked to find out today that users have been asking for the ability to view long untruncated long filenames for 2 YEARS.  

Why can I view a long filename on the iPhone app yet NOT on the iPad app?  This is just silly.  Please, dropbox business managers and developers; demonstrate that you listen to reasonable requests for sensible GUI improvements and FIX THIS. 

Also,  I cannot believe that it is not possible to sort files by upload date or some other field.  As far as I can see the files are always listed alphabetically. 

I am a programmer so I know these are relatively easy fixes to implement.  It is mind bending as to why such glaring deficiencies in an otherwise awesome platform are not corrected.  For this reason that I have given a 2 star rating.Great app It's a great app but I would like to be able to highlight certain texts in Dropbox while I'm on the go. For now, I'll just have to wait until I either get home or to the office.  Other than that, I have no complaints. The setup is simple yet functional.Get's the job done. Simple &amp; easy. Helps me in schoolUnable to upload PDFs from my iPad to Dropbox Really would like to be able to move PDFs from iBooks to DropBox.  This could be a flaw in iBooks, but I can't save PDF files from Mail into DropBox either.  Want to share some work I've created with my colleagues and friends, and have no easy way to get earlier content I have stored in iBooks to Dropbox.It ok If can check or not check to opload camera it a best apps.Love this app This is the single most useful app I have ever used. Bar none. 

Dear designers: Would love to see the functionality of the media player upgraded to allow play of songs one after another (without individually selecting them). Our band shares a folder and we put our songs in there, but you can't listen to them consecutively. They have to be selected one at a time. 

Thanks for listening.Just keeps getting better Love the support for password protected MS Office docs, thanks!Great app. Some bugs after update Sometimes I listened to mp3 files I have on Dropbox. Lately the sound stops after the screen locks. This didn't use to happen. Also the play, re, fw controls you get after double clicking the home button no longer work with this app.Better than iCloud It is annoying that it adds all your pictures without warning (I take a lot of useless photos that I end up deleting but it's still in the cloud and having to redelete them in annoying). But, I hate carrying around a USB and tend to loose them and this us better than emailing it. All my docs are synced so I can get to it on my iPod touch, my laptop, and the schools iMac after I used the site to sign into my account. I wanted to do this with iCloud but I'm out if memory cause of mail! Why do I did to back my mail up its Soo stupid! I don't have pages and won't pay for that so iCloud is useless to me!Why does Dropbox need location services for photo uploads??? Photos taken on iPhone have location data imbedded in them, therefore why does Dropbox require location data turned on for auto uploading?? Of course it would also be nice if they would shut off location services after use!!!Comments on files There should be a way to share comments on files in drop box.Garbage Dead links, plus grabs all 400 of my photos without warning. Yea I feel comfortable with this app just uploading personal and naked photos of my girlfriend to some server. Yeah great thanks yea no instant delete. Try something else.Not bad Will be a LOT more useful if you can edit documents in addition to viewing them, otherwise its okaySimply the best cloud storage out there. Really great app for pictures, and a whole lot more! Even documents etc. Download it! You will love it!Outstanding!! 2Tiimes! DropBox is an asset to all productive types!! Awesome appUsed to be great but not in this release. In the update, the location service is on all the time for photo uploads. It was per on demand but now with this update, mostly will kill the battery life.Gps stays on all the time To sync photos it turns the gps on and it never goes off. Kills battery. Other features seem to work.beginner Was not able to gett it to work for me -- computer???? and ipad [ok].

wish thre were better directions. I will keep looking for an app that I can inderstand. Sorry.Hmm Provide the rudimentary ability to create editable text documents and you'll take a giant leap forward. The idea you don't have this simple feature is very strange. While you don't need the full feature set provided by Evernote, you should at least allow the ability to create and edit text documents.

C'mon, seriously.Won't work Keeps asking to connect to iTunes or push notifications.  Must completely shut down iPad to get back to home screen.  Worthless. Please fix!PDF annotation please. And other basic editing functions mUpdate Can't install the update.Fix Location Services Bug Good app but location service stays on 24x7 to support photo uploads. Fix this for more stars.Fantastic! Works the best of the cloud storage services (you listening Apple?). Smooth UI, seamless experience. Much better than anything else I've tried.Pretty good app but… ? Why can't I sign into separate Drop Box accounts?Will not stop asking to connect to iTunes I tried reloading but it still asks to connect to iTunes and will not work on my IpadThey made a great thing bad I've been using this app for a year, and until it's latest update, it worked great. Now it's not usable on my iPad2 at all. I get a push notification at start up, and the notification won't close, which makes the app unuseable. And this is an app I was relying on for business use. I tried to contact the Developers, but they've choosen to make themselves hard to contact directly. I need a fix for this problem. I use this app for my business.HORRIBLE APP! ALL 1,300 photos were deleted. I trusted Dropbox as a back up for my photos. I have no way of ever getting those photos back. The only kind of response I've gotten from them is a generic response saying they can't get back to me because there are so many inquires. Never will I ever use them again. DO NOT TRUST THIS APP!Cannot view PDF! Now we have bulk uploading of photos. But we can't download in batches/multiples? 

Hassle to download them one by one

PDF VIEWING ALSO NOT WORKINGIts a great app It's great but it crashes every time I go on it I can't even last 5 seconds can you guys pleas fix thisExport PSD crash app Please fixGreat app, missing one really important function. This app is really useful for having access to documents while I'm out.  The one big thing I think it lacks is a way to share folders while you're using the app.  I'd love to be able to share a folder via the app and I've needed to so this before while I was out, but unfortunately, this app as of 3/1/13 doesn't have that feature.  It would be really useful to have!Okay, but some bugs This should be a great way to upload my photos while traveling, but I am having a few problems. I cannot organize photos into folders because the app to freezes anytime I try to do this. The app also won't upload photos unless I keep the app open and don't use my iPad or let it go to sleep. If it goes to sleep or I use another app, it stops uploading. Very frustrating!Location services stays on Location services won't shut off with the current update version. Battery drain is a serious issue. Please fix!!Won't open Latest update won't open just hangs for 10 seconds then crashes... Normally a great appDropbox app If you want to store some apps in here will Dropbox let you store your apps on your IPhone into Dropbox or not? Say I have a lot of apps on my IPhone, can I store some of them in Dropbox?Causes my location services to always be active I noticed that the location services icon was always on for my iPhone 5 (running latest iOS), so I looked at which apps were using location services, and dropbox was the only one, so I exited the dropbox app (not even running in the background), but it was still using location services.

The icon didn't go away until I revoked dropbox's access to location services, and if I gave it permission again through the iPhone settings, the location services icon returned right away even though dropbox wasn't running.Drop box It is ok but, Why can't I just select certain pictures to down instead of every picture?need to fix! somethings wrong with the last update.
i only can view pdfs once. 
after opening for the first time, cannot view them anymore!

the latest update fixed the issue of crashes and also can view the pdfs without problem. thanks a lot for your work!  however there is still a problem which is that when you try using the "open in" option in other iPad applications, and ask to open in Dropbox, the filed just opened shows up in the iPad Dropbox application, but the Dropbox server is not updated... meaning that file is not found in the Dropbox folders if you access the folders in a different device/computer, etc...A Suggestion To the developers: can you fix it so we can see longer file names? For those using the YYYYMMDD before the file name, you can't see all of it.Works great.  PDFs fixed Fixed!  Thanks for the update.HELP I have liked this app until it stopped working a couple of days ago. There doesn't seem to be away to contact anyone for support. I deleted a photo and it is still deleting. It was just ONE picture. It is now stuck deleting that one photo for the past 24 plus hours! I hope this will be fixed soon. I've even restarted my my iPad and it still won't work. I can't use dropbox until this problem is resolved!Please clear the un starred files Non-starred files occupied more than 600 MB and I have no way to reduce it...it eats out all my ipad spaceAWESOME Love maybeCan't see PDF Can't see my PDF files.... Booooooo!Very bad It always says network connection error. I can't log on using my iphone5Storage App Great for sending and sharing large files. Wish they'd allow you to send and share the folders and files from the app.Can't view offline PDF files / Update: Works  now The latest update fixed the PDF bug. Great product again, therefore 5 stars.

------------
Have a ton of PDF files marked for offline viewing. Cannot view any of these files since the update. The is some problem with offline viewer - please fix it and I will change my rating. But for now it's only one star because I just lost access to all these files :(Delete feature Ability to delete photos from Dropbox while viewing individual photos instead of having to delete them from the multi viewer screen. So we can slide through photos and delete ones we don't wantlatest upgrade FATAL bug The latest upgrade is crap.  The notification box (I call it the nag box) that says Dropbox has notifications, Alerts, etc. on startup.... is in an INFINITE loop. click and comes back.  Worked perfectly and loved it until this last upgrade.  2.1.2.  I see a LOT of other people are complaining about the last update.  Iphone 4 running 5.1.1.It's now closer to perfection! The new update added a PDF viewer which allow you to view PDF highlight like the app from adobe.
I'd love to see the next update include feature allow me to view full powerpoint slide on iPad!!Love this app!! This is the greatest app invented to man. Dropbox is already a great idea. On the phone, even better.What happened? Had used Dropbox on my desktop. So downloaded Dropbox app to my iPhone  then tried to access it but it is asking me for a pass code which I NEVER setup nor asked to be required. Went to online support from my desktop and of course no help there except apparently I can change the pass code....but only if I can get in via my iPhone which is not possible !!!The Best Never have to worry about people finding those naughty pics on my phone again. Set up with a password is amazing.Where has this been all my life? A great concept with flawless execution. I could not be happier with this app and service.Footnotes omitted on Word docs It would be an advantage to have footnotes in Word documents  appear in the Drop Box version of the document and enable me to share my research papers via Drop Box.A wonderful application . :)A suggestion I love the new updates to Dropbox. But I would like to be able to share a full folder via the iPhone app. I still have to go to the website to do that and it's annoying having to navigate in the mobile browser to share a folder.DropBox?? I jyst love the name when i hear it 
Its the best app ever for uploading stuff 
I recommend all my friends n all to have it 
Cuz its fast and easy 
Love it.Great app! Awesome app :DWhat happened?? Updated to the latest version and...now all my Microsoft word documents won't open in the app, so I can't view anything.  Also lost the ability to export into pages for editing.  Hoping this is just a glitch that gets fixed fast, but really problematic for me since I use this almost exclusively for work.  Please fix cause I love Dropbox!Missing page # The Dropbox update is great. I like the multipage view for PDFs. However, the actual page number was removed from the main single viewing page. I hope they consider putting that back in for the next update.Sync tool This cloud storage tool is must to own and enjoy its convenient. Easy to sync with own device and easy to share with my friends and colleagues. Worth app must to recommend to everyone.Still waiting Caught in a loop forever after trying to load a video and also forever looping in the initial how to adobe file. Very sad.Most Amazing Photo Syncing App Ever! I've been in love with this app for quite some time! It stores any pictures on my iPhone, iPad, and iPod Touch on all of my devices and stores them on my PC and MacBook as well. yes... I have a lot of technology in my house. Until Dropbox came about, I didn't have pictures on anything except my iPhone and now they are everywhere!! if I'm ever on my computer and showing off some pictures but have to leave, I can always pull up the same stuff on my phone. it's truly amazing!Gps issue Background gps keeps active and is draining my batteryReally poor application First off, you can't download pictures from Dropbox onto iPad with Dropbox automatically uploading all the pictures from your iPad photo library. 

Secondly, I have a picture on Dropbox that I am trying to download onto my iPad, but every time I save it to my photo library, it appears in the library as a completely different picture that I have already erased from Dropbox account. Why?

I'd like to drop this application in a box and leave it in a dirty alley way for hobos to eat.Streaming Video Streaming video could be much better. Even on Wi-Fi I have to wait a long time and the result is a low quality video. You guys need to work on that area.Accidentally delete my drop box with all my photo How do I recover my photos after accidentally deleting my drop boxGPS won't disengage with this version Even if background uploads disabled it keeps GPS active and chewing up battery life. This needs to be fixed for iPhone ASAP.?? Definitely liking this app. Use it all the time. It would be really nice if it gives us 10gb free space. ^^Moving/organizing files (iPhone) Lacking capability to move files into folders, view what folders items are saved in from search, and dialogue asking what location in Dropbox a given file should be saved to. Please add these basic functionalities for iPhone!Location services stays on! Like the title says, GPS is broken since last update. Please fix!Reader broken After updating I can no longer view many if not most of my PDFs on my phone.not working since new release PDFs, Jpegs and Word Documents not opening properly.  Everything works on my iPad which I didn't do the update on, but  not on the iPhone, where I did.  Hope its fixed soon.2.1.2 Update fixed PDF viewer iPad 1-Latest version opens PDFs. Dropbox is back.I I want to be able to drag and drop files and distribute them to different folders. iPhone 5. It's really sad you can't move files.Good Very convenient for moving files without connecting to a computer!Camera PDF I'm new to drop box but I'm very surprised the camera doesn't take a picture and converts it to PDF.  It would make life a bit easier  let said you have invoice you want to upload to drop box and you want to upload them as a PDF file you can . The way I'm doing it now is using PDF reader app use there picture camera that converts it to PDF format them Important to drop box . Btw who cares about music and picture upload in drop box  is all about putting Documents invoice Letters and receipts on PDF .Fix the Reader I use my iPad to view many PDFs with annotations. The new reader was awesome for this. I was able to move/resize these within the reader, now I can't. This is a huge problem for me as many notes are cut off and they can't be resized to view. Please bring back this capability.
Otherwise, great app! I love that you are making continuous improvements.Lost Newest update lost many of my documents and other I can no longer open. Please fix!App is missing Downloaded the latest update and now my app has disappeared, and the App Store won't let me download it again.Perfect This app works perfect in the iPad. The PDF works fine too. I love itGreat app I like dropbox cuz it's easy to use and syncs among all devices you are using. I like it more since it enables a sharing folder to share darta with whoever you like securelyiOS5 requirement "This app requires iOS5". So what happened to supporting iPhone 3G users stuck on iOS4?Not safe I have many folders on Dropbox, among them some 200 photos I have taken, collected, uploaded. 

Every single .jpg in my dropbox has mysteriously vanished. Six months' work down the drain. 

If you use this, be sure to back up your backup.disappointment with pdf Totally disappointed with the latest update. The all new pdf reader is not working. Why would u want to change something that was already working. May switch to something else if it does not work soon.five stars excellentUpdates Why are they so many? It is freakin annoying update so regularly!Recent update Recent up date seems ok right now.  Hopefully fixed problem. Just wait and see.Dood... Is that all you guys do is make updates that do nothing different? Sick of my App Store having 1 new notification because you have useless updates.Won't open docs anymore Really like being able to access my files across devices, way more convenient than iCloud, but within the last few updates, I lost the ability to open docs (as in Word Documents).  I can open docx, but not doc, which is how Pages saves Microsoft Word accessible documents.  Basically, I'm used to being able to edit a lot of my files through Pages, but now I can't open the doc files in Pages anymore because the Dropbox app doesn't recognize it anymore.

Fix this, and I'll give you 5 stars for sure.Sharing Please include the ability to share (all types of sharing) from within the app and it will be a total win.Convenient but... I love the convenience of the iPhone app, but I REALLY wish I could SHARE FOLDERS through the app!!  There have been numerous times when I've needed to do this and can't.Won't update Latest version won't even update. :-(Love it! Great app! Simple to use; keeps important doc's handy and portable wherever you are. Easy to organize. Great for simple file storage and organization.Froze on &quot;installing&quot; UPDATE 2/21/13 New Update:
Same problem

Installed update and froze up. I can access through the "open" option on dropbox App Store page but not through dropbox icon on phone page. I deleted and reinstalled - same thing. I'm operating on the latest IOS for iPhone 4. Please fix.Wonderfull app Now working iPad mini after updatesCan't get link to files without initiating download of the file Useless for mobile users. Can't get a share link without first downloading the actual file to your mobile device over your cellar connection.... The last update fixed nothing. Still can't view 90% or my PDFs.

Deleting and reinstalling the app did fix it though.Fix the bug I have been getting kicked out of the program.What happened I have the Dropbox app on my ipad. Every time I click on it, I get kicked back to the home screen. What up?Mad What is taking so long to fix the crashing?  This used to be a great app.  So upset!A must have for document organization on iphone Works in conjunction wirh Google Drive, File Manager, Documents....Crap. Complete crap. I was pleased with some of the functionality of this app, and then it screwed itself over. Any app that will automatically upload your pictures off your phone to wherever the heck it is they store them without asking you is trouble. What's worse, there is no stop the upload operation until it is done. Then I have to search all over for the setting to NOT automatically upload my pictures? Because, of course, it's not actually in the settings menu on my iPhone, and they don't ask you if you want your photos automatically uploaded when you first install the app. I don't see the point of having this crap on my phone anymore.More Advance PDF reader PLEASE It is a great app but I wish that there was a more accessible way to read and highlight PDFs so  I don't have to download my pdfs and then highlight and reupload and then delete the old document. Just saying it is a waste.Dropbox On the Go For cloud storage, Dropbox is an excellent solution for me.  I don't usually save a whole lot of files to it, so the smaller, free account has been adequate so far, but when it comes to transferring files to other machines without a USB drive or accessing from my phone, Dropbox has been a very useful tool for me.Takes so much space! I keep deleting the app because it takes almost 4 GB of space in my small 16 GB iPad. I don't understand why it has to use so much space. My Google Drive only takes ~800 MB and I have 40 GB worth of information in there!!!

Dropbox has so much functionality and syncs with almost all other apps. But the large space use is definitely a deal-breaker.Not a bad idea I wish drop box had more memory like sugar sync for free. 

I also feel documents on iPhone should be editable and able to be saved even if saved as modified versions based on the device and permissions granted to it.It keeps sayin updating I can't open the goddamn appGreat up when it s actually working. Worked great before the last update, now it won t open.Does Not Work With iPhone5 After last update I had to uninstall. It crashes my iPhone5. This was a great app until this update. PLEASE FIX!! I miss it.After the last update one third of my PDF files fail to open in the built in reader They worked fine under the old built in pdf readerGreat but expensive to upgrade Like the drop box service, but upgrading is too expensive.  Suggest graded levels of subscriptionIrritated This freaking app keeps crashing!! Uuggghh then I can't open it!! Please fix this!! My drop box contains all my pharmacy school work! BIG INCONVENIENCE!!New Update Crashes and won't Launch Been a dropbox user for years.  I have 5 devices running it.  I can't imagine life without it now.  Please fix the update dropbox!!!Update problem Update froze before uploading completely on my iPhone. Uninstalling and trying again.Not working on my iPad How can I contact Dropbox to let them no that the app no longer opens on my iPad? 
Tom Jamesfavorite cloud service I enjoy this app ALOT! college assignments go on, then I can open it from any computer. Haven't had any problems with itIt won't open! FIX IT! I updated it to latest version and now it won't open. It shows the title and stuff as if it did open then it would crash and leave me confused in the home menu. FIX IT NOW! I'm an author and this app is vital!The best app Thank you for your great work Dropbox!!Location Service Stays On Please fix the location service staying on since last updateiOS 6 share sheets? Those would be useful!Battery Drains battery crazy.New version does not launch terrible update.Won't let me download it to my iPod Thanks for nothing dropboxUnable to move files I can't move files from one folder to another. iPhone 5, iOS 6.1.2Won't open due to pop-ups since upgrade I can't open since the last 2 updates. Pop-ups go crazy on the iPhone 5! I'm uninstallingApp The bestdon't give us buggy feature updates! When I updated to today's version of drop box 2.1.1  on my iPad and iPhone running iOS 6.1.2, certain word files that had previously been viewable, did not work. They work in the google drive app just fine. I have already tried deleting and uploading the file again to drop box. The end result is the same. 

The new PDF viewer is great, except that when you click to switch between full screen and GUI viewer modes, it zooms all he way out of your PDF. It's annoying, constantly losing your place while reading a file.... Next update, fix that and PDF annotating features!PDF copy and paste into an email is broken If you copy text from a PDF and paste it in body of an email it puts each word on a separate line. This "feature" just recently started within the last week or two. Used to work perfectly before. Please fix quickly. I use this a lot.New version won't launch I just downloaded the latest version--I have been happy with the previous version. Updated and now I can't launch Dropbox at all. It acts like it is launching and then crashes back out of the program. I hope this is fixed soon. Thank you.Crash App is invisible on my iPhone 4S after last update. Can't even see that I have Dropbox installed and reinstallation didn't resolve the issue either. Worked perfect prior to update.Music File Needs a play all button in the music file!

RJG1919GPS GPS stays running since last update.Nice app Great app, fixed crash issue after update.Usually very reliable Until the last update. Please fix.That's Great You should put the folders first... And then the files!
I would put a folder as favorite, thus putting all the files inside this as favorite too.Crash Still crashing after updateCan't open Updated and still crashing on open, iPad 3. Deleted reinstalled and it worked once now crashes every time on opening again. Hope they fix this before the weekend.Useful, stable and fast Latest version is stable and upload speed doesn't appear to be throttled.Great! Doesn't crash for my ipod. How do u put pics on it? I'm trying to put live wallpapers on it.Arrrgggghhh! I can't open my dropbox app on my iPad 4! Please FIX this issue Asap!Pull Down Refresh This app needs the pull down to refresh feature. A new file will not show up in the app unless I click another folder and then go back to the previous one. Seems like a simple and worthwhile thing to add to this app. Otherwise the functionality is quite good.Must-Have App I'm not sure why anyone would rate this app less than five stars. It is a must-have application for all iPhones.Sharing limited For crying out loud. below is what I've written as a review in previous versions. A few updates later and still no improvement. C'mon Dev Team! How long do we have to wait to be able to share entire folders from within the iOS app? It's still only limited to the web based interface.

" Still not able to share entire folders from within the app. Only individual files. Please address this in a future update."Crash My dropbox keeps closing when I try to open it. Why does itvdo this can anyone give me an answer. I am using the Ipad with the retina display ios 6.1Force close on open Force close on openCrashes After last update Feb 2013 Constantly crashes after last update. Please fix this version!Cool Thanks for fixing bug!Doesn't work On iPad 3, it will not open.Bugs seem to be fixed Looks like they took care of the bugs pretty quickly -- PDFs now load as advertised on my iPad3.  And thanks for the sort-by-date feature!What I love about Dropbox I love everything in Dropbox. It keeps your pictures and videos safe and keeps all of your stuff in there safe.Disappeared from my phone As soon as i updated to version 2.1. I can't open Dropbox. I can't delete it--but it is not on my phone. And I can't redownload it....help!

Updated: I see the suggestion is to delete and reinstall--HOW ARE YOU SUPPOSED TO DELETE WHAT ISN'T ON THE PHONE, despite the fact that the App Store says to open the app, but will NOT open when you press the button?

FURTHER UPDATE--version 2.1.1 brought back dropbox to my phone. Upgraded to 3 stars. Once I play with it, I will assess whether it deserves more stars...No es un simple App es un estilo de Vida Realmente la mejor App que puede existir en lo que a manejo y respaldo de archivos se refiere, toda aquella aplicaci?n que no tenga compatibilidad con Dropbox ya no es ?til o simplemente se descarta, gracias a esta Aplicaci?n me olvido de pasar las fotos de mi iPhone o iPad a la Pc ya que se hace autom?ticamente, me despreocupo por andar (como antes lo hac?a) con un Pen drive con la informaci?n del trabajo o archivos de importancia, todo se resuelve con mis dispositivos o en cualquier PC con internet, y si por seguridad de acceso se trata tambi?n es muy segura, felicito a sus programadores y dise?adores por tan valiosa App, si me dieran a elegir para quedarme con tan s?lo una App sin dudarlo ser?a Dropbox...Dropbox Worked for like ten mins and now it won't open, just keeps popping up blue then shutting off, I have turned off the iPad and then waited one min and turned back on the iPad, clicked on the Dropbox icon to open and it keeps doing the same thing, my iPad is up to date running iso6, so it should work cause it worked for ten mins then crashed, please fix thank youCrashes on launch Crashes on launch after the splash screen. Please fix!Keeps crashing App keeps crashing on main opening screen since new update on my iPad mini and iPhone 4S please fix.New Update crashes Since new update 2.1 on Feb 15th, I get a splash screen followed by a crash.
Otherwise, 5*Failing after today's update I rely on Dropbox for syncing daily annotated PDFs from my iPad to my home computer.
After today's update sync stopped working.Can't open App Love Dropbox but cannot open app on iPhone. It crashes every time I try to open it.Location Service Location Service wont turn off even after I quit the app. Please fix thisCrash and will not open FIX Just un install and reinstall. Works Awesome now. Love this app probably best ever!Crash Only getting logo screen and afterwards it crashes.PDFs aren't working right anymore PDFs aren't working right anymore, please fix asapGrey screen I'm having the same problem as others, some of my PDFs are not showing (instead, there's only a grey screen). I've been happy with the Dropbox app, but this recent update has made it unusable. Please fix.Don't upgrade to version 2.1 Previous version was fine. Latest version now can no longer be opened on iPad mini. It crashes as soon as I open it.Crashes This app used to work flawlessly. After the most r event update however I can't even open it. I get the logo screen and then the app crashes completely. The update has rendered it useless!!Crashing! Help! I can't open it on my ipad 3. Help! Crash! Crash! Crash!What happened? Thanks for the "upgrade" to version 2.1. I'm experiencing the same .pdf viewing problem as everyone else.  Doesn't anyone ever try this stuff before they put it out there?Reinstalled and it works fine Dropbox, you messed up my presentation this weekend when you wouldn't open when I needed you the most.  But I forgive you, because 1.You are Free. 2.You are so convenient. 3.You've changed the way I work. 4.My pictures just come to you like magic. 5.You open my PDFs, Docs etc. with ease.  

Baby, you're not perfect, but you get better and better as time goes on.  

Love, XOXOXOProblems Viewing PDF on iPad I updated the dropbox app on my iPad and can't view any of my PDF files. Viewing wasn't a problem before the update. Help?Crashing and won't recognize some jpgs After the last update, dropbox crashes every time safari attempts to open anything with it... Haven't tried with other apps, but this is a major problem with me since I've been using the two together, also it now will not open the last few .jpgs I've created on my Mac...Do not update: crashes, won't load Displays splash screen and shuts down.  Goodbye all my Dropbox folders.  Test it next time guys.Problem FIXED I had the same issue, it would NOT work and keep shutting down after freeze. So I just deleted and re-installed and works like a charm now. Don't know why it froze in the first place. 

iPhone 5Cannot see files in new viewer Screen stays grey. I cannot read any file after upgradeCan't Open!  Please roll back or something Need access  to my files!Gray screen I can open a PDF once, but then I get a gray screen.  iPad2.  I am sure you'll figure this out ASAP... Please?crash crash crash and then crash again...useless when I really need it.Best app Thank u so much for making this mobilePDF display is broken I love Dropbox, but v2.1 simply doesn't display any of the hundreds of PDFs I have stored in my Dropbox. The previous version worked fine. Looking forward to the bug fix soon or I'll need a new solution to remain functional with my work.crashing Won't open after last update, please fix!!!!!! I use daily for work, can't do much without this app. PLEASE FIX.Cannot open Normally 5-star app but now it will not openPDF Viewer problem gone after updating to 6.1 I had the same pdf viewer issues as others; however, they were resolved by updating to iOS 6.1Update not working I love Dropbox, but the latest update crashed on my iPhone 5. It will not install update and now I cannot use app on my phone. Help!Uninstall and reinstall Dropbox Since the update, it crashes what you should do. Is if you uninstall and reinstall the app it will work again. That happened with an update to instagram too. I gave it 3 stars cause it needs more features.App keeps crashing since last review I enjoyed using dropbox until this week now it keeps crashing every time i open it on my iPad 2. Please fix it!!Great but It was fine at first now it won't open big probGray screen when opening PDF's The only way to view PDFs now is to open them, see the gray screen, hit search, then cancel the search. Then it will appear. Extremely annoying.

Moving around the PDF is a bit smoother, but I liked how it zoomed in with double taps much better in the old version.Waste of time Get this app if you have a lot of time to waste configuring &amp; tweaking everything 
COMPLETE WASTE OF TIMEPDF viewer broken! Can no longer view PDF files after upgrading. Do not upgrade until they fix or roll back if you need to view PDFs.App would get 5 stars, but the latest PDF update really ruins the experience Please bring back the old viewer, it was phenomenal. I like the page preview feature of the new version, but the general PDF viewing experience is worse. Specifically, it is very disorienting how the viewer returns to the topic of the page if you tap out of full screen view. I also miss the 'page xx of xx' feature when scrolling.Keeps crashing The app crashes after last update please fixCan't open Dropbox, help Since the last update, the app no longer opens on my iPad ??. Please fix this??. ThxBug! Keeps crashing! Please fix for iPad mini.Good but missing important featre Need to sort docs based on date modified rather scrolling large folders. How can something like this be overlooked??!!Last update and it  froze It was fine all along until 2.1, please do something!PDF viewer doesn't work why does everything constantly have to be updated?? There was nothing wrong with Dropbox. The "enhanced" PDF-viewer isn't working on my IpadCurrent Dropbox is Broken Your latest update broke the ability to view a lot of PDF's. 

Thanks.Latest update The latest update broke the application.  Before the update 5 stars after the update 1 star.  Please fix.  iPhone 4S 6.1Notifications don't work It's ok. but I started using this app for the notifications but they don't seem to work. All settings are correct.Link to PDF pro With the latest update the link to PDF pro does not work!! This was one of my favorite tools for downloading files from Dropbox.Won't stop updating This app has been updating for 6 days now. I can't open it and it's totally useless to me. Used to be a really nice app. Now it's crap.Crash Won't open... Total freeze then shuts down.Crash and burn. It would be great app if it opened.  Worked for a few hours and then it didn't and now it won't open at all.App Crashes, will not open after update Since last update unable to use app, just get splash screen and then it crashes and closes. Hope fix in on the way soon. Also before adding new features lets clean up the interface and stop classifying videos as photos. Ever since the new interface it's taken more steps to find and upload my videos.I can't open I'd give 5 stars if I could open! Fix NOW!!!!App Crashes Thanks, Dropbox.  Here I was, thinking Dropbox is one of the greatest inventions since sliced bread.  One update, and I can't access my files or photos on my gen 3 IPad.  I know it is Presidents' Day weekend, but can someone fix this please?  Maybe you are enjoying time with family...sure would be nice to share pics with them...Was great but now unusable Was great but after the latest update, I can't even open the app.  Crash right at the splash screen.Update My iPad tells me there is an update, but it won't install????Crash at the splash screen Great app but it needs an update asap. It doesn't launch on ipad 2. Fix please.App crashes After the update the app will not even open on my iPad.  Otherwise Dropbox is the best.Excellent It's a really good cloud app, but what makes it stand out is the new .pdf viewer! Now I can read huge files on the iPad. You can't do that on Google Drive's app.Crashing New update is broke, can't open on iPad 3rd generation now.Total fail What a horrible joke. I've been using Dropbox for quite awhile and it has previously worked great. This new update totally fails. While it is true that they have added a page thumbnail viewer, that is ALL that can be seen with this new version. Individual pages just show up solid grey.

Allowing this app to update is a terrible mistake.

The old version worked. The new one does not.Update FAIL same problem as everyone else, don't update to this version.  It crashes and doesn't even open. (ios 6.1, iphone 5)Renaming a file I love Dropbox. I have the ipad app.. PLEASE give us the ability to rename files!!!!Help! I cannot open this app anymore. It crashes immediately! I loved it until the last update and used it a lot. I even purchased the Pro version. Now my work abilities are severely compromised!Great app Eventho im reading about a bug in my case so far so good.Can't view PDF The new version is not allowing me to view a PDF file once I have viewed it once. When going back to the file to view it I get a gray screen.Problemas al abrir A vez que abro la aplicaci?n se cierra ,esperamos la soluci?n en una nueva actualizaci?n )PDF viewer not working I just updated and now my PDF viewer is not working. Any files I had already saved as favorites on my Ipad will not open at all, they're only viewable as icons in a grid, not as full pages anymore. Please fix this ASAP, or instruct how to uninstall this Dropbox update.Reinstall If you can't open, delete and reinstall the app- your files should be right where you left them...Thanks for sort update but .... &gt;&gt; Delete and reinstall, works now &lt;&lt;

App now crashes when opening. I have 853 photos pending due to updating to 6.1 by iTunes restore feature. 

Please fix.  iPhone 4S 6.1
Works on iPad 2 6.1Won't open!! Hurry up and fix! Having the same problem as others - since the update, app crashes every time I try to use it. Dropbox is how I back up all my photos and journals - now I can't get to them! Get with it you guys!Latest update needs fix! Updated to the latest version on 2/15/13.  PDF viewer doesn't work.  I can load a PDF into iBooks to view there, but cannot view in Drop Box--please fix!Need a fix to PDF viewer Great app...BUT...need to fix the PDF viewer in the latest version. Only works with some PDFs on an iPad 1. Seems like it doesn't like files made with Mac OS print function and some other non-Adobe PDF generators.No longer awesome. There's a glitch with push notifications that the same window keeps popping up every time I tap an option. It's like the app is stubborn for me to use them. I'M BEGGING YOU TO FIX IT! OR BETTER YET, TAKE PUSH NOTIFICATIONS OFF!Last update crashes app Will not open since update. Some people use your free 2 GB plan, others pay for a lot of storage. Please help all of us out.Disappointed After updating yesterday I can no longer open the app and I'm afraid that I'll lose everything that's already stored..please fix the bug quickly..once that's done it'll be a great app!Can't update anymore Since the last update, this app wouldn't open. Now it won't even update. Kinda pointless.Code for Excel doesn't translate on iPhone/iPad I have used this app for a long time and it has always worked well. Annoying glitch though- Dropbox has stopped translating date code in Excel spreadsheet. Did up to six months ago- now only displays the code (not the actual date) in my spreadsheets and I really need to see the dates. Other than that, app performs well.BIG bug here! I had the same experience as everyone else. PDF files randomly appear or don't appear when downloaded. I had 51 different PDFs delivered via Dropbox and some were viewable while some just gave me the grey linen background. They were all able to be opened and viewed in a different app so the info is there, just not always viewable in Dbox.Bug When I open the app it stays at the logo for about three seconds and then it crashes. Im using iPhone 4 with iOS 6.1App is crashing now Cant get my files. It will not open. Please fix.I can't even open this app anymore. Useless. Don't waste your timeFlash drive USB It is like USB for me , I love it hasaaaaa and free . That all we need and I really appreciated it .   :)Love this app BUT... I love this app and how easy it makes getting pics I take with my IPhone  on to my computer BUT I am VERY disappointed that the last update has render the app useless for me!  PLEASE get rid of the bug ASAP so I can go back to using it!!!   THANKS!Do need search support I wanna search engine inside the file so that I can find the content what I want quickly.Unusable Version 2 is very jerky. Like UI and server exchange tasks are done in synchronous manner. Just can't browse picture gallery smooth - UI always freezes to do something (probable load another image)
Big (100Mb) PDF are unreadable as before: built-in viewer just crashes. Even can't open such big PDF in another viewer (like iBooks) - export never finishedChronological Sort... ...Thank you.Won't open! All my files are on there! This app won't open now! All my school and work files are on it!Issues I love this app, but it stopped working for me. At launch, it crashes. It just won't open.
Specs: iPad 4th gen. iOS 6.1Excellent app, Critical one bug App is excellent for drop user.
But, when I open PDF file once, read other files, open PDF again, file contents is not shown. I use iPad app and not sure if this is same to iPhone app.Sorting by Date! I asked them for this feature a few months ago and they said they were working on it; finally, they came through! Thanks! I love this app.PDF Problems I liked very much the upgrade to pdfs (divisions and search). However, they aren't displaying anymore. Fix it and it will be perfect.
Best wishesPDF viewer just grey I use this app daily, please fix, can view .jpgs but not PDFs, my iPad is older, please don't break for older versions of OS......Latest Upgrade Latest upgrade = gray screen of death! Boo!Update is helpful for PDF viewing I like the updated PDF interface. Dropbox is a must-have for me since I migrate between iOS, OSX, and Windows multiple times each day without any error (except by operator).Horrible Crash on launch. Doesn't upload while not in app. Things need to be fixed.PDF Viewer doesn't work Same problem as others - "new" PDF viewer doesn't work- just get a gray screen. It will show me all the pages in thumbnail, but when I select one to view, it just turns to a gray screen. PLEASE FIX!A must-have for all iPhone and Mac users Amazingly helpful app. 
Love the connection between my Mac, PC and phone that this app delivers.Support for cbr and cbz files comic book reader would be nice... is store all of my cbr and cbz files on dropbox so i can read them anywhereTERRIBLE with this update, my app won't open!!! pleaseeeeee fix this!!current version fix it -_- wont let meh open itApp crashes on launch. I'm running iOS 6.1.1 on a iPhone 4S -- just updated the app and it keeps crashing upon opening. Please fix.Can't see single page PDF Latest upgrade prevents seeing single page pdf view, only multi-page. Please fix - previous version worked fine.Excellent Thank you for the excellent engineering, as always, Mr. HoustonDropbox is lockboxed Dropbox will not open on I pad.  Did yesterday.  This seems like an unstable app.DropBroke Unable to open my existing PDFs (e-books).

I uninstalled the app then reinstalled the app. 

I was then able to open one of my PDFs after it was downloaded; however when I opened a different one then tried the first one again it wouldn't display.  

I can see the contents and thumbnails but individual pages will not display.

I hope this helps the devs!CRASH! KEEPS CRASHING ON MY 5Can't see .pdf files. I can't see PDF files. Something wrong with the current version. Please fix it ASAP.Yay, sort by date! This was a long wait, very glad to have this feature!Way of using previous version I just love using Dropbox. But iOS 5 is required to use it. How can I use it in iOS 4.1?2.1 killed Dropbox!! Grey screen when opening PDFs. NEED this to work. Now I have to try Google Drive or SugarSync.Whoa hohh Love the new PDF viewer, its so smooth and nice to look at.The update broke it Since the update, I can no longer open pdf files. That makes this once-essential app virtually useless to me.Sweet: new PDF viewer Search, chapters, pages grid, side scroll button, and dictionary are all great features. The only thing missing is annotation, but I don't always need that. I had an instance of a PDF not showing when viewing another time, but I just tapped the pdf again and I loaded just fine.
Specs: iPhone 5; iOS 6.0.1Love it!!! Been working great until tonight when it suddenly starts crashing on me every time I open it.Latest update starts uploading already uploaded photos Sir, i have been using dropbox since its early days... After this last ios update, my already uploaded photos are again reuploaded. I had deleted some pics 6 months back after automatic upload feature uploaded them into my dropbox account... Today again it is uploading all those hundreds of pics...please fix thisCan't view PDF files I have to copy my PDFs to iBooks or another app to view them.  Not good IMHO.Can't view PDFs w 2/15 update With Feb15 update I can no longer see PDFs in my Dropbox on 1st gen iPad, iOS 5.1.1.  Selecting a PDF document, in full page view, I see only the  "linen" background. Selecting thumbnails, I see page icons, but selecting one results in "linen" as in page view.
Not very useful at all, please fix!PDF viewer is a game changer...almost. I use several apps for PDF viewing and one feature that keeps me on the prowl for the holy grail of PDF viewers, is an app that supports PDF markup. Being a musician and heavy e-reader, I rely heavily on PDF markup. 

Dropbox, give us some simple PDF markup abilities, e.g., highlight, pen, erase, opacity, and you will put several PDF viewer apps to bed. Couple these features with the ability to share a folder of PDFs with other Dropbox users and you've converted me, and countless others, to PDF viewing through Dropbox.Improved Really nice app, very nice interface. Improved PDF viewer.A little tweak would be nice Terribly need a new way to sort files and folders.Can't read cached PDF please fix it. it's the most often used function for meNew version crashes Just updated to the new version on iPhone 4 and now PDF viewer seems to be broken. Most PDFs display blank. I have found that opening a PDF, quitting DropBox, and then restarting sometimes helps. Please fix this!!!New PDF Viewer... A new PDF viewer that STILL doesn't show Form data?!? I love Dropbox. I rely on it. But I also rely on Adobe Reader for iPad for the one thing Dropbox still cannot do.I love your app You are the best.pdf viewer is broken just a grey screen, no pdf on my ipad1Interface and bugs Please bring standard controls back! I'm still using 1.5.7 and it's definitely better than this... Just buggy.Great App, use it daily Love the features it offers...

Dropbox support, would there ever be a way to sync the photo folders with the camera roll on the iPad?  It would be awesome if I could use my Dropbox picture file as a slide show or "picture show"

Thanks!

LannyPDF Just installed latest release. Can no longer read PDF files. Not sure how this qualifies as an improved reader. Please fix ASAP.Love the new pdf viewer! Vertical scrolling, able to view the outline, and a grid view...it's everything i always wanted from viewing pdfs in dropbox!  No more goodreader for me! Now, if only dropbox could improve music playback (let us skip songs) and give us more than 15minutes of video playback (starring doesn't work), it would be perfect!Update Broken I have intermittent access to some of my folders from the iPad with the update that was released today (2/15). Very strange. I like the PDF viewer when I can get to my PDFs, but for now it is a role of the dice as to whether or not I can even get to those documents.Developers are responsive About two weeks ago I sent an email asking the developers of the iOS client if they had thought about allowing users to sort files by date, as I was currently using a different app to connect to Dropbox when I needed that capability. I received a prompt reply telling me I wasn't able to sort that way in the current version, but they would consider it for future versions. And here we are, less than a month later, with the feature implemented. Two thumbs up.Really useful, but... It is really useful for keeping the files in sync, but I'd like to see an option to make an intire folder offline as the same way that is possible to do with single files.Great PDF Update! Love the new PDF viewer. So much faster!!!??? Please do make enough tests before u upload the updated version, ok?!Dissappointed I have installed Drop Box in my desk top computer and in my        I Pad,   but they do not talk to each other.  Specifically, I want the I Pad to have access to my Roots Magic files that are in my desk top, and vise versa.  What have I not done that would  make this possible?Great Update Love the update for PDFs! Works great!Keeps getting better PDF viewer feature was an awesome add, I just hope it keeps getting better and better!Update PDF problem Dropbox is a great program and tool, but with the last update which included a new PDF reader, I cannot open a PDF in full screen view, only thumbnail.  Please update, or if this is user problem, please inform.  I now have to use another program to vie my PDF files.UPDATED APP-new review I used to use this app all the time, and it was incredibly nice. now? A MONTH of having my iPhone 5 and still no screen support. What's up with that? Heck, some of the worst apps I own have full screen support already. How about you actually show your customers that you care?

Is it also too much to ask for some MEANINGFUL updates? Like something besides stupid screen support? How about implementing some cool features from the desktop website into the app? Or something else?

Th competitive edge you guys have at the moment is embarrassing  -_-

You service truly is fabulous, and top of the line. But IOS support &amp; effort? it's embarrassing....

UPDATE 10/22/12--------------------

App has been updated, iPhone 5 support has been added, so I change my rating. Although i do wish the update brought more just iPhone 5 support, but nonetheless, it is now a 5 star app.

Update 12/18/12---------------------

New update brought better icon, nice new interface, and it feels much less dated (overall). A nice move! Recommended download...

update 2/15/13----------------------
PDF viewer works for me! notifications for new shared folders are just what I was hoping for! maybe an option in the settings for enabling notifications for any updated files would be cool? 

Anyway, very happy. thanks again!PLEASE expand the file/folder pane I love Dropbox and I am completely reliant upon it. The app is great, but desperately needs some enhancements:

1) Make the file/folder pane able to be expanded or the font to be smaller or both.  I have many similarly named files and I can't tell which file is which because the file name is truncated.  This is crucial for me!

2) Allow users to select what files they what to be "favorite" with radio button browsing rather than having to go to each file, launch it, the "favorite" it.  Basically, we need to be able to do the reverse of the "unfavoriting" that can be done in the "favorites" tab with the "edit" option.  

3) Make "favoriting" a file "persistent".  Now, if a favorite has a minor name change, it losses it's status as a "favorite". 

4) Make it possible to "favorite" an entire folder.   This would help with the third suggestion above.  

Good work on the app ..... Please just tweak it with these improvements.Sorting Seriously needs a way to sort so folders are on top like normal.Crashes on launch Just updated to v2.1 and was in the middle of moving pics to new folders etc, suddenly the app became unresponsive and I couldn't do anything. I force closed the app and even rebooted my ipad. Now the app won't launch.  It loads the splash page and then closes out.What happened Scared to download this update. After the last two my videos don't work, whether they are favorited or less than 15 minutes.  Have to download them in my photos to watch them.  Quite a pain.  Really do wish they would fix this.Amazing, but doesn't allow you to share folders We should be able to share folders through the app. PLEASE FIX THIS PROBLEM. 

 Every time I want to share a folder I have got to log in to dropbox's website....

Dropbox is great, I have bought the 100GB package and I don't regret!Just got better *update* gets better with every update! S glad that sorting by date as been added. No problems on my end with PDF viewer. 

I love Dropbox, and I use it every day. The current update allowing for the opening of password protected Office documents in iOS 6 is great! Had been waiting for this for a while.Love the app &amp; the service As a user with both a personal and a enterprise level account I really love this product. There are only a few minor suggestions that would make this app even more amazing.

 And since the support link doesn't contain an email to send features request/ideas, I guess its going here.

While in "preview mode" for photos:
Would be nice to have the ability to delete the photo you're viewing. Bonus if there was a "flick" up gesture to remove it while previewing a photo. 

While in list view, it would be nice to also have a faster way to delete multiple files at once. 

Also while in list view, the ability to select multiple items and download then into your phones. 

Keep those updates coming!PDF viewer is buggier than ever This update would be a step up if you could actually see PDF's with it....Finally, sorting by date! Yay!Good app It would be nice to change the name of the files. When importing things and putting it inside a folder the order is not how I want it.PDF search broken in new update Fails to find a simple phrase. I load the same document in Adobe Reader and a search for the same term works fine.PDF viewer does not work The PDF viewer does not work!  Do NOT upgrade until this major bug is fixed!  One star because unfortunately no stars is not an option.Can't see pdf! Just like Mentalthaker says,after upgrade I can't see my PDF!
Please fix it ASAP!
I am depending on it!Love, but .. Can we get push notifications for other things being shared, besides just folders. My bf is a photographer, he often sticks photos in our shared folder - would like a notification when things arrive. (I do have them turned on but never get them)PDF problems Maybe it's just mine but after the update I can't view PDFs properly. The first time you open a PDF if works fine but after you try to view it again the entire PDF is blank! Hope they fix it soon as I use Dropbox daily for work.Unable to load the cached PDFs.Add Ability to rename folders and files, file content search The new update is unable to load the cached PDFs. Getting a blank grey screen. 
1)Pls add ability to rename files and folders. Still missing.
2) Pls add File contents search across the entire dropbox and also within particular folders.Amazing I recommend everyone (and I mean everyone) Dropbox because its such an useful tool.  It's an iPod, photo viewer, movie player, and storage all in one application.  I use it everyday.  The only update I want is to have folders for the favorites tab.  I am an iPod touch user, so I use Dropbox offline most of the time.  When I put too many songs/movies, I can easily get lost.  Other than that, superb application.  If you haven't gotten it yet, just get it.New Update Good! Like how we can sort by date modified now ????Awesome Gotta love Dropbox!GIFs, anyone? The app keeps getting better and faster with each update, but GIF support is nowhere to be seen. It's kind of pathetic that iOS Messages supports animated GIF and this app does not.

PS. Could the new icon be any lamer?Wow The new PDF reader is AWESOME!!Sorting by date! The best app ever!Can't see or read any pdf file..... I just updated dropbox cuz update said pdf view has changed.
After i updated it. I can't see/read any pdf files through the new viewer. It stays with gray screen....fix this problem plzLove it! Love itBbb Can you make power-points??Good but needs more settings Great app. I love that I can upload and download from all my devices. I wish there was a setting where you could flip pages in you document like a book. Also I wish they could add settings such as highlighter and add comments.82 MJM CHRS Great app for references on the go. A must for any NCO or leader in the services. Recommend adding a function to rename files and move files around after you upload them; for organizing and file naming conventionTrouble Opening Files First time since I started using this like 5 years ago that some files won't open up. They just hourglass forever on my iPhone. The only way to remedy this is to open the file from my desktop and resale it into a new doc. Then it opens fine again. Makes it a bit unreliable since I don't know if the file ill need will be working. Once it hourglasses it won't come up till you do this even after restarts. Other files will open right up but some hang.Only one problem The only problem I have is it take too long to dowload my photos and vidsTerrible update, removes functionality This is a bad update, if you have not updated, don't!

With the latest version Dropbox has removed the ability to save favorited video files locally and play them. So for example that episode of downton abbey or glee that you put in Dropbox, and then favorited on your iPad will not be viewable

Instead the geniuses in San Francisco let you stream 15 minutes off their network servers. hey guys, why do you think I favorited the video? I want to watch it all,but I can't

Bad update, from a company that used to do so well. It all went downhill when Adam left.It is important to have it It is important to have itMissing features There is no way to share a whole folder without going to the desktop app.Pretty good app The app is like a 2nd photo stream that stores than pics.  The 15 limit on watching my videos becomes a bit of an issue. In order for me to watch the MY videos I must favorite it?! I have issue with that but otherwise it's a cool app.File names illegible This is not a review of the Dropbox service (which is great) but of this app, which can use a lot of improvements. The single most frustrating thing about it is that it displays only a dozen or so characters in a file name. Since I have thousands of files, some with long and descriptive names, it is impossible to find what I'm looking for unless I download the files to the iPad one by one. There is no way to resize the file list to make more of the files visible. Why not?Crash on iPad 1 I tried to launch it and it always crashes and exits. Even restarting the iPad could not address the issue. iOS is 5.1.1. Hope Dropbox team improves the QA process and perform more exhaustive testing before releasing a new version.Change the Icon ASAP!! The new icon is terrible! too boring!! Please change it as soon as possible. I have to delete Dropbox app just because of the ugly icon!!!Files with Style. This app not only looks great, but also provides excellent functionality.  Flash Drives are a thing of the past!Uploading files from iPad Pages, Numbers, Keynote I tried the "Open In Another App" and Dropbox does not come up as an option.  I have documents saved on my iPad Pages, Numbers applications.  And Dropbox was not able to upload any files from these productivity apps.  So I guess I'll have to email everything to my main computer to upload into Dropbox.  I use my iPad for a lot of school work and I even access the school online discussion tool so this Dropbox app will not work for me.Great App I love this app.  It allows me to store data in the cloud and share it with both my iPad and my PC.Rubbish Cannot open any saved files.Dropbox is Awesome! I only wish you could reorder files for the device (or have the order synced from my Mac). 
Also, odd, but some school work, which had a lot of formatting had a messed up layout when view in the iOS app (a .docx file).  The oddity did not appear on my Mac, only in the app.  Whether this is an iOS rendering bug or an app issue is unknown.  I worked around it by saving the file as a PDF. 

I've just started using dropbox and I love it!  I have a Mac, PC, iPhone, and iPad and keeping files in sync can be annoying!  I've been using iCloud and iWork, but I don't trust iCloud not to loose my data yet and it doesn't sync to Windows.Helpful I love Dropbox because its a perfect tool for keeping your files with you whenever. 
I just wish that photos wouldn't show as a list and you could change it so you see all your photos as a grid, much like the photo library on the iPhone.Goood ?? ???? ?????????
???? ????? ???? ???? ?????
????????. ???? ????? ??????? mms
????? ?????Why no &quot;Duplicate&quot; function? Clicking "Edit" allows one to select files and move or delete them. Why no "Duplicate", or at least "Copy" (to another folder)? I keep running into situations where I need to do that and end up going through a lengthy process of sending the file somewhere so I can save a copy back into Dropbox.

Other than that, I love Dropbox!!Very Helpful Helps keep files on the goSupport Full rateBest cloud service you can have Computer, phone, iPad, web browser. Great for document back ups and shares... Use it every day as my invisible flashdrivePretty good. First I love Dropbox. I would give it five stars if you could edit the name of the files through the mobile app. Instead you have to do it from the main website or a computer with the installed Dropbox folder. It's somewhat annoying.Servers I use this app for my minecraft servers, I just put my ftb server in the Dropbox folder and start it, it is on 24/7It's not ok I like the fact that I can download drop box on any device and share pics. What I don't like is the time it takes to download pics and that in order to download I have to always be connected to the Internet, this keeps the pics from downloading some times when I am away from wifi. 2.6.13 i'm still trying to figure out app support. pictures are not downloading and i am going to remove this app from my IPAD its worthlessSteaming Video Update Latest update says they improved video streaming. What they did is now they convert video to crap quality and only let you stream 15 min. You have to fav them and have them saved on your device. Lame!Sad I had high hopes.  The product just does not deliver.  Customer support kept giving me options to solve my issues rather than taking charge and getting me working.  24-7 support does not exist.  I received emails at 8-9 pm each day.  Dropbox word of advise.....read your reviews...Great idea - needs work I love that I can access my Dropbox files from my phone. However, I strongly dislike that I can't upload files from my phone to Dropbox without turning location services on. Having my files tagged with my current location is not what I want at all.  Very disappointed.Great app Easy to upload and download. Five stars for sureDropbox desktop GREAT, Device App NOT When I put things into my dropbox folder on my desktop, I can find files by date modified, by name, etc.  The app has an incomprehensible and un-modifyable sorting function.  It's almost impossible to find files within the app.  Once you find them on your phone, I believe you can "favorite" them.  But the challenge is to find them.? Can I download apps?passcode lock doesn't support a bluetooth keyboard issues:
1.bluetooth support is not there for passcode lock
2.MS Word documents show lot of weird charactersVirus warning Drop box introduced a bug to my mac.  I deleted it and it kept reappearing.  DON'T DOWNLOAD this app.Nightmare, no tech support anything but a cloud drive Save your money!!!!! Dropbox won't sync if you move pictures into another folder off root. It easily fills up your hard drive so buying 100 Gig is a joke.  It is slow and latent.  Tech support bounces email with an aw shucks, we are soooo busy, can't get to you.  Doesn't,t connect to many ipad adds that claim it does.  Did I mention it fills up your hard drive.  I want my money back and intend to dispute my credit card.Boo?? It will save my pictures but once it needs to save a video, it will get stuck on saving the video for 3 WEEKS!!!!!!! Please fix it!!!Bad App On My MacBook This app is ok for photos and documents, but hangs like crazy on video less than 1 GB in size.  Could drop one in but got the blue circle of death. Green circle with check mark never ever showed for videos only.  So, I could not transfer videos between my devices at different locations.I love Dropbox! This app could take it to the next level if the audio playback had a REPEAT option.Dissatisfied I can't get a shared folder through the app b/c I need to click on a verification email which I never received. What's the purpose of a password to open the app, then?Handy, Useful, Accessible, and Simple This is the very first "files" app that I have used and I've got to say that it keeps on getting better and better. It's been so good to me for the past 6 months that I have to write a review for it. 

First of all, it is HANDY because I love how I am able to upload all my files and photos in a very easy manner. It's not only USEFUL because I can upload things, but also for the fact that is is SIMPLY ACCESSIBLE. I have never had any problems with the upload or having my items load for me in the phone. I do recommend this app for those who are seeking apps of this kind. The interface looks really nice. I've never had any trouble finding my files because they made it really easy to navigate on the iPhone and the iPad. 

- A Happy UserCrashing problem The app WORKED greatly before (notice the emphasis on the past tense)....
But after this last update I cannot open nor export any .pdf nor .docx files.
And, as far as I tested, only pictures would work normally...Buys competition then deletes service. What about a REAL replacement for Audiogalaxy?  Looks like you guys pulled an Applebee's.Oh My Gosh!!! This app makes my life easier! My teacher puts worksheets in Dropbox at school, then I can open the work in another app, and edit it. When I'm finished, I put my file (as a PDF) back into Dropbox. Simple.Change folder and files names Great app but you should add the option of change folder and files namesAudiogalaxy I am so mad that you guys bought Audiogalaxy only to shut it down. That app was the best app ever. If this issue is not resolved I am canceling my Dropbox account entirely. I will also be recommending to everyone I know a boycott of your company until this issue is resolved.Keep making it better! Please show full filenames or give option to expand directory column. Also option to upload photos AND/OR videos from camera. I want options.

Thx!Good Good appJehad Best app everAmazing Very useful appAwesome Great app! You won't have to email your work to yourself anymore, when you save to Dropbox from any of your devices the file is automatically on all of them! AND you can access everything in your Dropbox from any computer online! Don't know how I ever got along without it.Quality I really love this app it's so great. &amp; it works perfectly. I just wish it didn't make my photos look bad &amp; take down the quality. I want to be able to upload my photos at their full quality. That would be a 5 star to me.Great app I use it all the time to quickly move photos from iPhone to computer and to share files with others. Very dependable and fairly intuitive.Ugly, but works The old icon was better; there's too much negative space in the new one.

It isn't clear what the checkmark in the top right is for. Certainly not deleting files.

And the color palette looks like it has gone through an Instagram filter. Colors are pushed just this side of pastel, giving the whole app a washed-out appearance.Best clouding service The latest app update hasn't given me any issues on my iPhone. It's simple to use and works like a charmCan't AirPrint Please fix bug that does not allow me to print from the app via AirPrint. Otherwise an absolute flawless app. Not sure why everyone is having issues.Select multiple photos Love the app but I would like to request the developer to add the feature to select multiple photos at the same time to delete or download.Crashes when trying to launch Cannot get app to launch now that I have a shared folder. Going back to Google Docs.Works wonderfully I have not seen anything in how the app functions that could make me give it less than 5 stars. It always works when I need it and does just what it says it will.This is my favorite app I have no idea why there are negative reviews. This is one of the best cloud apps out there, and so easy to use. I have it on 5 devices and pc's and it is a life-saver. I store quickbooks data file on it and can do my quickbooks from anywhere. GREAT APP!!! I'd give it 10 stars if I could.Good gone bad Since the last update the app crashes and says there's a problem when I try to delete files. I love this app but it needs to be fixed-I use it all the time!Missing a critical feature This app doesn't handle shared folder settings, which is critical to my use of Dropbox. Otherwise it's pretty solid.Not yet perfect Good app but Needs a Download option.Why can't we download a file to my iPhone? I am very happy with the app and knowing that I have access to my pics and docs on my PCs, but I am not happy that I have uploaded a video file from my PC that is 170 Megs that I cannot down load to my iPhone.  Why is the download option disabled?No, thank you. In the few months I have had this app, I have never been able to access it without it crashing or performing horribly. Definitely not an app for someone who needs their files quickly &amp; conveniently.Won't install I have an iPad 2, so cannot upgrade to iOS 5.  But this app won't install unless I have iOS 5!!!  So you can't use dropbox unless you have the latest iPad???Needs a music player for music files Needs options like repeat and shuffle ! A music player like "iDownloads plus pro" app so i dont have to keep manually switching songs when a songs over.. But I love Dropbox though definitely deserves 5 stars !It's cool I bought idoceo which tells me to use Dropbox to the transfer my files, it can't open in idoceo which is stressful. Please fix it or tell me what to do.It is all right Wish we could organize by date. I use Dropbox to upload my books to my iPad. Organizing by date would help immensely because then I would have to go through the entire alphabet and look at dates to see which is the most recently uploaded.No tech support No tech support unless you are a Pro or Teams member. They don't care about anyone else.Fantastic with a suitable file manager, you will be able to upload the file to dropbox and share the link.
keep it up ??Just got it It seems its very good but I did see some bad reviews so I'm just going to try itNeeds fix It was cool, until the last update where now I can't upload from my iPhone.. It starts uploading , the progress bar shows it going, then when radionics he'd, the progress bar just starts again and again going over and overGreat I have always loved Dropbox.
Now that MEGA came out I inmediatley signed up there.
After using MEGA for a couple of days I realized how great DROPBOX is ??

?????Best Dropbox....always the best!!!Great...but At first when I got this it was cool, but then when I changed my mined about having my camera uploads in my Dropbox it says that I don't have any photos in my library when I clearly have photos in my library....please fix!!!Usability Downside Cannot paste into email field at login and cannot space to use keyboard shortcuts, eg my email address!  Argh!!!
Will take up in rating when this gets implemented.Very easy to use. Works very similarly to the full version. I can upload, share, and even open media and different file types from the app.Good, but crashes... I tried to load a fairly large PDF once and the app crashed while attempting to display it.  Since then, it's been crashing every time I open it.  I'm trusting that a simple reinstall will fix it.Sin duda una de las mejores apps... Es una de las mejores aplicaciones que existe en general, su belleza y simplicidad hacen que el usuario no se complique mas... Yo ya ni USB uso, prefiero tener todo en internet y accesible desde cualquier dispositivo o cualquier parte del mundo sin depender de nada mas que acceso a internet...

100% o mejor dicho 1000% recomendada!!!
Me ha salvado muchas veces la vida...Good, but... Very useful app.  Thank you! If only I could see my filled in fields of the Word forms on it it would be awesome. It is a pain and a hustle not to be able to.  
Also I miss the old app logo, new one is  just so-so.
Otherwise it is great.Apple TV Support It's great but should put Apple TV support to view photos better in the Apple TV.Good U should get this app, it is very helpful!Good but... Dropbox is great. It lets me access my files from any device easily.. but it take up way too much memory on my device. It's supposed to save space! Not just use all of itGreat I hated the new app at first. I use it everyday anyway and I can see the improvements now. Sorry I initially rated it poorly. Dropbox has done a great job, even if I couldn't tell at first.Lego 24778990765788788 Download this app todayGreat app I have had this app with other devices and loved it.  Great way to store files and free up space.A must have!! I really like this app! It is my one stop place for all of my files. I store my homework and reference files for class in my Dropbox, and can access them anywhere! Plus integration with popular software *****A+ Probably my most useful app. A must have, in my opinion. :)Can't log in For some reason it won't log me in. I logged in on the website but it doesn't work on the app!!!Camera upload is glitchy The camera upload on this app is really glitchy and it's not letting me put any of my pictures on it.Awesome! I've never troubled myself to write a review before, but Dropbox deserves a great review!Nice Now i can transfer photos to my computer without worrying that somehow they will get deleted from my iphone! Best app.Wastes tons of local storage space for no reason I have no files "Favorited" in the app, so it should be using no local storage.  Yet my iphone settings for Usage reports that Dropbox is using 135MB for "Documents &amp; Data".

Fix this!  I don't have room for you to waste space like this!Terrible This app is useless it doesn't let me load anything !!!!! :(Best cloud storage I've used tons of online storage apps, but this is the best one out of all the ones I use. It does everything that it's supposed to and gives out free storage. Very helpful when I need to transfer files and it's quick too.Great App! I really like this app. I no longer use my flash drive. Dropbox is easy, convenient and very versatile. I have it in my MacBook Pro &amp; iPhone and I can share files easily between them. A definite must have.Great App This app is awesome... Thanks for the free space! I use it in conjunction with CloudOn to work with spreadsheets from my iPad. Very handy!

I just read a review where someone complained about the app icon being ugly. Really? Ok. That's ridiculous. Apparently, that person doesn't have enough to complain about in their life.

This app is great..... I even love the app icon :). Great app!!print plz why cant i print but i can air print on any other programSending files My only complaint to otherwise a perfect app is the ability to send the whole file instead of just a link when I needed to.Trouble I cannot open most of my files on my iPad. Keep getting the unable to view message.  Very frustrating!  They open on my laptop.No priority Was a great app until ios6.  Now I can not prioritize uploads.  Very disappointing.LOVE this app!!!!! I work in the field and always need access to my data. I can also backup my note taking app automatically to DropBox. It opens every file flawless!! This app is awesome!!Get it Its good. Turn off camera upload in settings or click cancel instead of enable during initial setup. Great app.Like Owning a Dog The reason I own cats and not dogs is because I can leave my cats at home with big bowls of food and water for a weekend and know they will be fine when I return, Dropbox is like owning a dog. Twice a day, almost every day, you have to update it. I don't know why the developers are constantly changing the codes which require an update. From my experience there are very few updates that actually alter my experience using Dropbox. I suspect the Developers publish a new update every time they right new code to allow more efficient connection in Moldovia (no offense to Moldovia intended). But living in the USA, I don't need it. It would be nice if the Developers would tell us what each update does so we can decide whether we want it. .Critical Easily the most important app on all my devices is Dropbox. If you are a multi-platform user this is a must have. I only wish there was streaming support for media files (btw @dropbox - I'd pay extra for that). I am a Pro subscriber and can say its worth every penny for any executive on the go. I also love the dead simple camera upload for my iPad &amp; iPhones but would like to see that integrated outside of a sync.BUG PLEASE FIX Until this update, I was able to view annotated PDF filed on the ipad Dropbox app. However now the annotations do not appear! I can only view them on the computer. Please fix this bug because the app is unusable without the ability to see annotations.Necessary but I'm not happy I invited to people to DB expanded my space and deleted most of my items off and it still says its to capacity so I can no longer add files ! HORRIBLE????? ????? ????? ?? ????Essential, but missing desirable features Dropbox is a must-have for me, but I'm surprised some basic file operations are missing, such as Rename or Edit (for plain text files). 

Also notably absent: the ability to paste in a file's URL to download it. 

But, what it does do, it does well. I hope we'll see these improvements in the future.Awesome Love this app. I can keep all of my important stuff with me on my phone.nightmare The automatic upload feature is ridiculous as there is no intuitive or easy way to stop it.  Also, the delete function is confusing and should have some sort of dialog box informing you that you are about to delete a photo on your ipad, not just in dropbox interface, and ask you to confirm that you want to do this.  My wife tried to stop the automatic upload and hit the delete prompt thinking that may stop it.  We now lost photos of our newborn which we cannot recover.  Thank you Dropbox - you just lost us photos we will never get back!Fallen out of love. I use DropBox frequently until the latest upgrade. The DropBox app no longer communicates with DropBox on my iMac.Excellent It does everything its supposed to. Also if you want to delete some pics click to check mark in the top rightOne of the best apps ever This is one app that I use every day.Shrooms iOSTerrible. It's stupid that it manually uploads all your photos by letting it access them. Completely unnecessary. No way to cancel upload either. Good thing this app was free.Indispensable! This is an app that is relevant to everything I do. I use it everyday! My top 5!Somewhat clunky, lacking essential features Seems to be lacking in file management capabilities. Hoped for a way to delete, download, multi-select, and more but most of these functions either aren't present in the app, or if they are, it's hard to find them.Great app but.... It takes forever to upload photos, 2-3 weeks after I started the photos finally became viewable. I had no problems installing the last update. I love the recent upgrades. Syncs perfectly. Sharing is easy. Overall, a great app but needs a few tweaks.Best ???? ??? ???
?? ?? ?? ?????? ??????
HI DEAR MR. ARASH
WE ARE PROUD OF YOU.....
?????????????Latest update won't load Every other app update installs just fine. This one won't. Very frustrating. Is anyone else running into this problem?Great app Great app but in v4.0 the timeline view is only available for the automatically uploaded pictures, not all your albums, pictures.Love it! Pretty useful. The best thing in this app is the instant photo upload and the 3 additional GB.Dropbox update The update has been installing for a week....not good just got an ipad 3. from the app how do i share a folder? working in landscape the keyboard obscures the form for adding an email recipient. Portrait I can't see the whole screen. So then I go to to safari and the dropbox website -- total jumbled mess. Now I will wait to go home to my desktop to add a share of a folder. not impressed.Owner Musikraft My life just got easier. Great applicationGreat service, one major issue App pauses upload after iPhone locks, makes it nearly impossible to upload large files.  Will not upload video over cell data, unfortunately my cell data upload speed is significantly faster than my wifi.Can't open files. With the latest update I can't open word documents. Yes they are saved in the right format. Its just not working please fix.Fix it! Installer has been hanging for DAYS on my iPhone 4s.  Totally useless...Good app, bad update For my purposes the app is awesome, but with the last update they took out scroll. I do not like that at all, especially for long papers or books. I don't want to have to try and swipe through the whole thing to get where I want!Big mistake in the update All of the sudden the audio streams in background again. Hope it continues to work. 

Back to five stars.Dropbox Outstanding.  I can synch all my files on all my devices: PC, Laptop, Tablet and Phone.New Update Constantly Hangs (Crashes) Used to be a big fan of Dropbox... But the new update is garbage. Now it constantly crashes... Please fix ASAP for us business users and real estate pros whom use it all of the time.DropBoxer I would like to be able with ease to delete any picture anytime but there is no delete button, you know highlight a picture then delete the picture my choice but there is NOT any BUTTON TO DO SO....PLEASE FIX ASAP thank you
PS right now I ca not delete any that's bad!!!!...STINKS Aside from the "glowing" feedback and all the media hoopla, this app really blows.  
Since the new upgrade, copying or especially MOVING files inside the app is impossible.  It times-out the app and crashes constantly.  
For me, it way more easier to store files in the storage area of my online email provider - GMX.  GMAIL has online file storage and a service very similar.  GO WITH THESE and KEEP YOUR HAIR.Dropbox As a teacher this app is a must!  I am able to do work at home then save it to my Dropbox and retrieve it at school.  I am able to share documents with other teachers by sharing so the work is not replicated.  Great app.Latest update The latest update caused the program to not back up or update changes to my data. Fix this , or the app is useless!!Not so useful any more. With the latest update you can no longer download ePub files to iBooks. The option to download is grayed out. Looks like I will be moving over to google docs or something else.App Fails on 411KB upload The latest revision (as of 10 January 2013) loops endlessly when trying to upload a 411KB file.  Had to email it to move to another device.Update broke it Photos won't sync and won't allow me to move already synced photos to folders. Please fix soon.Pie in the sky Not particularly please with this app.  Purchased  it to use with 5 units at different locations: iPhone; iPad; 3 laptops. Anticipated  at least 50g requirement so purchased more space.  Placed some photos and files in 'the cloud'.  Drop box only recognizes one laptop and I'm unable to access Drop box with any of the other 4 computers.  It is useless.Can't create an account Every time  I try to create an account it says an unexpected error has occurred. So I didn't even get a chance to use app before it malfunctioned and I had to delete it. I'm just glad I didn't have to pay for the app.Camera Upload This is the best cloud service EVER! But now with the latest update my Camera Upload on my iPod Touch 5 keeps failing! PLEASE FIX THIS SOON! :(Continually disconnects Even when connected via wifi, uploading 10 photos took over an hour, synced via Mac sync to dropbox took less than a minute.Last update fail No uploads, sadworks really well. Good app.  Had issues with pdf files opening on my idevices but the update seems to have fixed thatLatest Update The latest update freezes on Apple 4 phone.Ehh... I'd like this app more if it had the ability to download the music files and push them into the default music player, instead of streaming them.No longer deletes Since the upgrade I can no longer delete photos from my iPad 1. When I press "Delete" Dropbox goes into an endless loop. The only way out is to delete the whole Dropbox app from my iPad 1 and reinstall. No data is lost.&quot;Available offline&quot; doesn't really mean &quot;available offline&quot; I had two .mov files that I marked as favorite, thinking that they would be available offline. Tried to play them later only to be greeted with "file not available, no Internet connection."

Conveniently, dropbox let's me upload my files over to Google Drive. Done. Offline capabilities on Google Drive are actually real. Goodbye dropbox, have fun competing with google.Very productive ap! This works wonderful on my iPhone 4S. I have many things on my PC and it automatically syncs to my iPhone. I am never without important documents that I need to review or look up that are password encoded. Super easy and a huge time saver. Love it!!Video playback issues? I love this app and think it's great but with one of the latest updates I seem to be having some issues with previously downloaded video playbacks? I use guitar practice mini-videos and in the past the videos I saved as my favorites played instantaneously but now, every now and then I have to re-download them all over again? 

I want to keep them in my Dropbox because I use the mini-videos for guitar practice while overseas where often I have no or limited wi-fi (don't use network as it's very expensive to roam overseas). Not sure why I have to re-download those videos every now and then?  Often they'll work fine for weeks at a time and then all of a sudden I have to download them again?  Otherwise it's a great app and this is just a small glitch.Well thought out and easy to quickly access The fact that you can search within folders is extremely useful, and makes accessing files on the go far more convenient. I also think the latest style refresh is a big positive in the right direction. I use dropbox on all of my devices. I would like to see sorting within the app improved (e.g. by date), but it's good otherwise.Worst ever Wish I could give this one 1/4 star , works well with windows machine but with Apple products it's the worst ever can't open my architectural drawings sticks all the time , at times the device either iPhone or iPad just wouldn't open drop box . Needs major repairs !Incomplete App Association Now my apps can't get authenticated anymore with this new link association in the app. On top of that, there's no way to remove/undo authentications like on the webpage ??Muy bueno Lo mejor para archibarHow many time I'm gonna update this app I been updating this app since it came outAudio lectures not playable after update The update rendered dropbox useless to me. I export audio from my lectures to mp4 from Microsoft word. It used to play flawlessly on my iPhone using dropbox app. Now it says "unable to load photo." This is really really annoying. Ill change my star when this gets fixed. Why update something that worked fine before?15 min streaming limit I gotta say, overall I like this app, although the logic behind the 15 min cap on streaming alludes me. I thought they may have imposed it to reduce bandwidth, but with the limit it actually increases bandwidth. The reason is because I start downloading the whole file, then start streaming it. Once the 15 min is up, I then switch to the downloaded file. To me, this uses more data. Why can't I just stream the whole thing? Overall, though, I like everything else about this app.Whats not to love? I use this to share documents between all of my devices (iPhone, iPad, MacBook, PC Laptop etc... It does exactly what I need it to.Needs work Hey I can't delete any pictures!  keeps saying error!Good app Nice and smooth photo streaming from device to deviceNo thumbnail view Why is there not a thumbnail view for images like there is on the mobile site?Good app, but... This is a great app. I love how I can transfer files and pics straight from my computer to my iPhone and iPad. My only problems are that .gif files do not work, and videos do not play with sound. If this were fixed, this app would be superb!Bring back gallery view, please. I'd really like it if that brought that back. Don't know why the took it out...(?)Stuck! Mine has been stuck in the update mode for 3 days nowMissing basic functionality... Basic functionality like file rename or access to previous versions of a file are missing.Steaming Video Update Latest update says they improved video streaming. What they did is now they convert video to crap quality and only let you stream 15 min. You have to fav them and have them saved on your device. Lame!

Still mad about this but Dropbox is still a great app..Works Well I use this for both file transfer, storage and it integrates with other apps I useLove this app Thanx for fixing the app. Works great, love the service.User Having problem getting to update upgrade!?  It is stuck and I don't know what to do now???  Need response ASAP!!!Looks more like a Windows Phone app The new app looks like if it was designed for Windows Phone no iOS.no notifications Need to add notifications of when files are updated.Works fine I don't understand why people are giving less stars because of the applications new icon look. It doesn't matter what it looks like what matters is how well it plays out. You're the type of people that constantly worry about all the little things in life and don't stop to enjoy what you have. It's a great app. Be happy you're not in a 3rd world country where they don't have things like Iphones easily avalible. Stop worrying about the smallest of problemsLove it! Gorgeous, relevant design with a beautiful icon! The app works flawlessly as well! Keep it up!

DRAWBACK- the biggest drawback I have is that I can't view Form PDFs or editable PDFs. Please add support!Improvement Recommendation Allow users to choose between thumbnail view like camera uploads or current detail view for those picture folders we have with tons of pix inside.

Could you please implement the ability for Dropbox to pick off where we left off as opposed to going through all the files to get back to where we started from the last view? Similar to the option when watching videos on the iPad. We have the ability to choose to start where we left off or resume from the beginning. This would be instrumental for those who use this quite frequently and need to get in and out of the application without going through the folders to get back to the file we left off before closing it. Thanks!Great app! I love having such easy access to my documents whenever and wherever I go!Valuable resource I'm not sure how I got along prior to Dropbox.  I use it for sharing and collaboration with my coworkers, my dealer force and my dad and brother on the farm.  It is so simple to use.  This is a no-brainer!!hhj great appVideos stopped playing Latest version seems to have stopped playing my videos.  Sad.Extra 2GB storage capacity for FREE !? Dropbox it given 2GB If you use my Invite Link before install you will be able to receive 2GB Extra Storage capacity
????bit.ly/magendropbox????
????bit.ly/magendropbox????
????bit.ly/magendropbox????

"To collect 2GB extra need to completed sign up and installed Dropbox"
Thank to Dropbox i currently having 12GB storage."FOR FREE".Documents In word documents, headers and footer are not well placed as well as tables don't appear ... In excel too.. Cells are not separated and conditional formatting doesn't appear... Please help and fix it.. I need it urgently in my work
Thanks in advance.. :DIncredible! Makes everything super easyThe best cloud sync software ever It is the king of cloud sync and backup software . 

I use it on my Linux work book. I put all the files in Dropbox. So when I at home,I can check my code on my iPad.

I just wonder,whether you guys can launch some cheaper plans?
I want to pay for get larger.but 99bucks is a little expensive for me.and I don,t need 100 Gb.

30Gb is enough for me.so is there a plan30bucks per year?Its very helpful! It's useful and helpful. All my files and especially my photos are being synced FAST to my laptop. This is the app that I've been looking for. It's very convenient also to use.Unable to export photo Unable to export photo into phone. Bugs?Please please please, bring back the old icon I am a true Dropbox fan and all, I recommend to all my friends to use Dropbox service. But the new icon is just unbearable. It looks so awkward and ugly to be honest. And based from what I have read, it's not just me who thinks that, many others feel the same way. Please give people what they want, please please, stop using this uncomfortable icon and bring back the old one!!!Fix the icon! It's gone from the prettiest to the ugliest icon on my iPad. Ugh; hiding it in a folder until you fix this!Good Overall this app serves its purpose as a file viewer very well. Besides that, it lets you upload documents and images from other apps and your camera, and the favorites update automatically. It also includes other useful features, such as letting you share files in various ways, and letting you reorganize your files and folders. 
I have only minor complaints and suggestions. 
1) The new camera upload view doesn't seem to enhance anything.
2) You should be able to rename files and folders. 
3) The option to favorite and download entire folders would be very useful. 
4) You can only share files (other than images) through other apps and links. It would be nice if you could email the file itself as an attachment, from within the app.It's Nice! Dropbox for iPhone and iPad both work exactly as expected.  Any document that I place in the Dropbox folder on the desktop of my MacBook is automatically and almost instantaneously, depending on the size of the file, synced to my iPhone 4S and third-generation iPad.  Third-party support with services such as CloudOn in particular makes iOS functionality even more excellent.  Dropbox is by far the best personal cloud file service out there, and I certainly recommend Dropbox over SkyDrive and Google Drive.  I have found both SkyDrive and Google Drive problematic and finicky, especially the Mac OS X application for Google Drive. Dropbox is always flawless, and this iPhone and iPad Dropbox application certainly illustrates this reliability.OMG fix the icon! Great app!  However please fix the icon!  I used to love seeing the Dropbox icon on my home screen but now it is such an eyesore that I constantly think about how much I hate the new icon every time I click on the app, which is a lot!  I never really felt the phrase "if it ain't broke, don't fix it" was more appropriate till now!I love dropbox - please add slide show with AirPlay I love this app and service!!!!  if you could add slide show for pictures with cool effects and airplay capability this app would be perfect!!!!!

The coolest cloud solution period.  Keep up the great work and let me know when you IPOBest app The app that I use the mostAwesome As usual, an awesome app.I can't view files in full screen I use to just tap the screen to view word documents in full screen now I can't seem to figure why I can't. This app needs file viewing full screenSaved my photos! I would've lost hundreds of photos if it wasn't for this app! Thank you!One more thing!!! Dropbox is my favorite App in the App Store, thanks developer!
But the new icon looks strange, looks like design for Windows change the icon please!Pointless I thought it was a good idea to have since I'm always getting sent mp3s. But I can't even listen to the files! Every time I open a track the app freezes.Was nice Was nice , won't open since updateFix photo upload I like the app except for the photo upload feature... It's all or nothing. When you turn on the upload feature it automatically starts uploading ALL my photos. I don't want all my photos using up my storage space but I do on occasion need to move one or two photos around, isn't that what Dropbox is all about?
The app should allow you to manually copy a photo the same way you can copy a single file of any other format. Once that is fixed I'd give it 4 stars.Cannot open 225mb PDF Excellent for everything except for opening larger PDFs. Please fix!!!Crashes!!! This app keeps crashing as its loading my document. Im a student in college using my iPad and this is not very good considering this is my book file.Nice app but can't rename files Make it so I can rename files in the app (can only do on computer) and it's almost perfect.Good Please make an update to where you can play an mp3 then it automatically plays the next mp3.Perfect I have used Dropbox on my computer, iPad and iPhone for over a year now with no problems.  This is the best cloud storage that I have found.No Product Support Despite Two Months of Waiting Don't expect any product support with this software.

I am new to this sort of software, and I was concerned whether simply accessing photos several times each month would put me at risk of running over the monthly GB alloted by by phone carrier. They're downloaded from the Cloud, right? And anytime you download from the Cloud, you're transferring data, right? So it makes sense that, if you look at your pictures frequently, just accessing Dropbox on your iPhone will explode your data transfer byte usage.

I would have thought this a basic concern to anyone who has to pay a carrier for their cell phone usage; but (a) I couldn't find any documentation on this, (b) I couldn't even get an answer on the internet, which shocked me, and, most egregiously (c) I couldn't get a response from Dropbox itself, despite begging them multiple times for an answer to this simple question.

I'm not about to use this product if it's going to send my phone bill through the roof, and I told Dropbox so. They couldn't care less. When you send them an email asking for help, they send you back an email saying, effectively, "We're terribly busy, but if you really need help send a reply to this email." Well, don't believe it. I've tried it twice, and after weeks of waiting not a peep.

Incidently, I am also unable to access the Dropbox forums, despite having an account. When I try, I am told that my email address isn't verified -- this, despite the fact that they sent me a boilerplate email asking me why I wasn't using their product (isn't that a laugh). They have an automatic troubleshooter for this problem, but it doesn't work, either. If I could access the forums, I might be able to get a response to my concern there; but Dropbox wasn't interested in answering my separate email on this matter, either.

I say without malice that the support for this product is about as bad as I've ever seen in nearly 30 years of working with computers. Don't expect any help with it from Dropbox. As soon as I can get an answer to this question about data transfer from one of their competitors, I'll be going with them.

Great product idea. Abysmal product support.Not good for long docs The idea of the app is brilliant, but forget it if you have long documents. When you navigate away from the doc and then come back, the app doesn't bookmark where you left off; it starts over from the beginning. I'm a book editor and have several 400 page manuscripts going at once. This app won't work for me.Needs Basic Features And Improvements Pros:
??All your Dropbox files on iOS.
??iOS-like design.

Cons:
??Can't rename items.
??Can't sort items.
??Needs animated .gif support.
??Needs .psd support.

If you'd like to organize and rename, try something like iFiles.Crashing It would be nice to access my files!!!!!! Crashing repeatedly!!!Does what it's supposed to do Many reviewers complained about the UI and the design and the colors etc.

This is a fee app for a (for most users) free cloud service. 

I expect from this app to be able to connect me with my space on Dropbox and occasionally up- and download files. And this app does that just well.

So, forgive me for disagreeing with the previous reviewers. I think this is just right the way it is. Since it is free - and the cloud space is, too - I would like to say: It's great.Needs GIF support! Please add support for animated GIFs!Slow uploading I find this app slow when uploading photo/videos on my iPhoneMessed Up!! This latest update messed it up good.
I was hoping you were going to make the interface more appealing but, instead made it worst.slow syncing... cache problem? Whenever I re-upload a file from my desktop and try to view the latest file on my phone, even though the time stamp of the file has been updated, the file itself is still the old version, even if I delete the file via my phone, and upload the file again, it will still pull the previous version. Cache problem?  Frustrating at times; otherwise this is obviously a very useful app for all Dropbox users.UI/UX Please improve your photo viewing experience and provide full screen option to see photos, videos and documents.Pretty good, but major .pdf print bug Update 1/1/2013:
--still no Rename files after saving/uploading
--still no flexible time/date/size sorting.
Generally more stable than prior releases; used to crash on opening some .pdf docs.

Major bug!:
Printing .pdf documents to network AirPrint device (HP Officejet Pro 8600, 2-sided) creates unusable printouts: page breaks in .pdf are ignored, with white space gaps appearing mid-page. Workaround is to load into Mail or Safari .pdf reader thru Dropbox link and use iOS's printing.

Oh and, BTW, yes, the new icon/logo is a bland, flat step down, entirely inconsistent with the 3D/tangible metaphor aka look-and-feel of the best iOS apps. Way to go, Creative.Great App but... You can't share folders or anything with anyone from an iOS device. Also saw bug where it would repeat the same photo upload and not complete.Open in DropBox doesn't work anymore Good app but ever since the last update I can no longer open PDFs from using DropBox. The option is there but pressing open in Dropbox doesn't do anything.Best app I am using dropbox on all my computers and on my iphone. Great app with simple ui.Video upload cellular I am sick of companies treating users like little babies that don't know how to use the tools and products they offer. I want to upload video over the cell network. If it lets me upload 20 pictures but not a 30 second video that is same size as the total picture size, then there is something wrong. I know what I can use per month for my data plan. Let me use it how I want.Love the app BUT I would like the ability to share a complete folder not just one file at a time. I'm not sure if I'm just not seeing this feature? It seems like a basic function at this point, since you can do basically everything else within the app platform. Other than that, I am very happy with the experience.WOW WOWReuploads I have camera upload on and when I opened it, it started reuploading over 200 photos even though they were already there. Not good.Unbelievable So convenient so straight forward, I don't think I could live without it.Icon I believe Dropbox will not listen to us because they already paid whoever designed it but the new icon is horrendous designwise. It's clunky, it doesn't make good use of the space, it doesn't have that clever transparency the original one has. I am in design, whoever designed this is not as well-trained as the person who designed the last one. The look alone, attempting to to unsuccessfully simplify it, made me wary that this update was going to be one of those that break stability or something. I love Dropbox but everytime I see the new update since I was tricked into downloading it in order to write a review, I cringe when I want to use Dropbox. That's a pretty bad reaction now; it used to make me smile. It's a bad design. Hopefully the update is stable.

Found it! Like the update; logo design still awful.Amazing customer service. Here's is my last email from their team. This is the 2nd time I've had to ask for help and actually got competent help. My whole company operates off this system. And it's of great help. Thank you Marla.  

Hi Benjamin,

Thanks for your response and the information provided. That is what I needed. Thank you!

I was able to locate the events in question and I believe I should have now reverted your Dropbox back to directly before these events occurred.

I did notice that by performing this restore I did also delete a number of files that had been added after the deletion events, along with re-adding the other files. Please let me know if you would like to have any of those files restored and I would be more than happy to go back and restore them.

Please let me know if there's anything else I can do.

Best,
MarlaThe Best This is a must have capability!